Dr. Jennifer Melfi: What line of work are you in?
Tony Soprano: Waste management consultant.
%
Livia Soprano: Well, all I know is, daughters are better at taking care of 
their mothers than sons.
Tony Soprano: Yeah, and I bought CDs for a broken record.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: With today's pharmacology, no one needs to suffer with 
feelings of exhaustion and depression.
Tony Soprano: Here we go. Here comes the Prozac.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Louis Brazzi sleeps with the fishes.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Luca Brasi. Luca...
Christopher Moltisanti: Whatever.
%
Uncle Junior: (to Tony) You may run North Jersey but you don't run your Uncle 
Junior. How many fucking hours did I spend playing catch with you?
%
Brendan Filone: So my boy at Comley...said there's a truckload of Italian suits.
Christopher Moltisanti: Those unload fast. Mario'll take the whole load.
Brendan Filone: He said shipment moves Thursday, six a.m.
Christopher Moltisanti: Give me one good reason I should not jack this truck!
Brendan Filone: Hey, don't feel bad, its Junior's own fault. He gives us no 
choice except to do it again.
Christopher Moltisanti: Takin' that outrageous fuckin' tribute?
Brendan Filone: It's like not only does he shit on our heads, we're supposed to 
say thanks for the hat.
Christopher Moltisanti: It's not like I'm gettin' somewhere's playin' by the 
rules! Fuck Tony!
Brendan Filone: The books are closed...blow me.
Christopher Moltisanti: No, that's some true shit.
Brendan Filone: Come on, they're not confirmin' any new made guys, how come?
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuckin' chaos! Nobody knows whose runnin' things 
anymore. Guys, they don't even know who to make payments up the ladder to in 
some cases. I'm talkin' about the year two thousand. The millenium. Where do we 
go from here?
%
Brendan Filone: Yo, money, we said we'd meet out front. You're not even dressed.
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm taking a pass.
Brendan Filone: What? It's Italian suits, Christopher!
Christopher Moltisanti: There was a time in my life when being with the Tony 
Soprano crew was all I ever dreamed of. So what am I doing?
Brendan Filone: Come on, it's five fifteen.
Christopher Moltisanti: Maybe one reason things are so fucked up in the 
organization these days is guys running off, not listening to middle management.
Brendan Filone: Fuck Tony. That's a quote.
Christopher Moltisanti: We have to stick together, why be in a crew? Why be a 
gangster?
Brendan Filone: Hey coach? Suck my dick.
%
Special K: (A Comley truck approaches) Yo! Hey, yo! We need some help over here!
Brendan Filone: (Brendan Filone, Antjuan, and Special K hijack the truck) Okay, 
lets be very cool yo! Get down outta the cab!
Special K: You heard the motherfucker! Hurry up!
Hector Anthony: (Stepping out) Yo chill. I'm a friend of Billy's. Your friend 
on the inside.
Brendan Filone: Ya, cool. No probs here! Increase the peace, that's our motto.
Hector Anthony: I'm gonna take my lunch, okay?
Brendan Filone: Yeah, whatever. Come on! (Hector steps down and Antjuan tries 
to climb the truck)
Special K: Hold up man! You can't drive a Fisher Price. (Special K climbs the 
truck)
Brendan Filone: (Antjuan is holding his gun sideways) What is with the 
gun-point-sideways-shit! (Brendan fixes Antjuan's arm)
Antjuan: (Special K isn't able to drive the truck) Ha ha ha ha!
Brendan Filone: (to Special K) Get out! Come on, get down! (to Hector Anthony) 
You drive, I'll direct you! (Special K steps out and accidentally drops his 
gun, releasing a ricochet bullet that hits Hector Anthony)
Brendan Filone: Oh! Jesus!
Antjuan: Control yer shit fool! (Once they see Hector is dead, Special K and 
Antjuan run away)
Brendan Filone: Fuck. Oh fuck! Fuck! Fuck! Fuck, Junior fuckin' Soprano's gonna 
go ape shit! Fuck!
%
Tony Soprano: You boys...you boys...I'll tell ya...it's beautiful stuff though. 
(about Italian suits they were left with after Brendan hijacked a Comley truck)
Brendan Filone: Ton', I'm so sorry-
Tony Soprano: Shut up!
Christopher Moltisanti: Just so long as you realize I had nothin' ta do with 
this Ton'.
Brendan Filone: Ton', that's true, he stood home-
Tony Soprano: Shut up! You stood home? Did you do anything ta stop it? Did you 
offer any guidance? What do we mean when we say leadership, hm?
Brendan Filone: Ton', part of it's the crank, you know, but I'm goin' into the 
detox, swear to my mother.
Christopher Moltisanti: Brendan, shut the fuck up. You wanna get me clipped?
%
Tony Soprano: You know, you got a reputation for immaturity, and its not gonna 
be improved by not paying the tributes the acting boss demands of you.
Brendan Filone: Acting boss my ass Ton'. Come on, everybody knows you really 
run things since Jackie became the Chemosabe.
%
Brendan Filone: Un-fuckin'-believable. We just returned maybe the biggest score 
of my whole year.
Christopher Moltisanti: Listen you fuck! Uncle Junior's been breakin' Tony's 
balls 'cuz you hijacked that truck. You're lucky Tony doesn't shove the cab up 
your ass.
%
Mikey Palmice: I think you should've taken care of this Christopher Moltisanti 
thing the minute it first happened. You should've sent a clear-cut signal... 
You fuck with Junior Soprano-
Uncle Junior: Take it easy. We're not making a western here.
%
Hunter Scangarelo: We wanna score some crystal.
Brendan Filone: Yeah, you got money?
Christopher Moltisanti: Shut up, you ain't givin' them shit.
Meadow Soprano: Why not?
Christopher Moltisanti: How 'bout for starters your father will put a bullet in 
my head.
%
Brendan Filone: So why don't you call Tony, so he can call Junior, and see if 
we can change the fucking channel.
%
Brendan Filone: Kids, you think you can protect 'em, well you can't.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: This ain't negotiation time. This is Scarface, final 
scene, fuckin' bazookas under each arm, 'say hello to my little friend!'
Silvio Dante: Always with the scenarios.
%
Tony Soprano: What the hell are you doin'? (after seeing Vin pissing near Green 
Grove retirement community)
Vin Makazian: This place is an hour from my office.
Tony Soprano: An hour? What are you a woman, get a bladder transplant, my 
mother lives here.
Vin Makazian: Yeah, well, that's not real convenient for me.
Tony Soprano: That's not convenient, I'm sorry, why don't we meet down by your 
precinct, you know the government would love a few pictures of us together for 
the scrapbook. (sarcastic)
%
Uncle Junior: Hear about the Chinese godfather? He made them an offer they 
couldn't understand.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Brendan's dead. His brains are floatin' in his bathtub. 
Message job, through the eye.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Moe Greene Special.
%
Yo Yo Mendez: Chris ma man.
Christopher Moltisanti: Surprised to see me?
Yo Yo Mendez: Heard they took you for a little ride to the meadowlands.
Christopher Moltisanti: Oh yeah?
Yo Yo Mendez: Heard you had a little "bm" out there.
Christopher Moltisanti: Okay, so you got my cut.
Yo Yo Mendez: They came and took it.
Christopher Moltisanti: Who?
Yo Yo Mendez: Junior Soprano's boys. They said you was out and its they corner 
now.
Christopher Moltisanti: You let them do that?
Yo Yo Mendez: I don't argue too well suckin' on a smith and wesson.
Christopher Moltisanti: You didn't beep me?
Yo Yo Mendez: Word on the street, you're out o' commision. Sorry man, business. 
Chris, you know there's no one I'd rather give my ten points to than you!
Christopher Moltisanti: It's alright. It's not your fault.
Yo Yo Mendez: He..I'm glad to hear you you say that man. (Chris slam kicks 
Mendez right in the nuts and proceeds to kick his ass) Ayy!!! Sneaky mother 
fucker!!! Ah! Shit!! Oh!!
Christopher Moltisanti: I don't care if they shove a scud missile up your ass. 
This is my corner. You pay any one but me, I'm comin' back for your thumbs. And 
that didn't happen what you said.
Yo Yo Mendez: Kill you...(lying on the floor messed up)
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Clipping a famous rat would put me a cunt hair away 
from being made.
%
Tony Soprano: I'm in the waste management business. Everybody immediately 
assumes you're mobbed up. It's a stereotype, and it's offensive.
%
Meadow Soprano: A couple of weeks ago, me and some friends, we were doing 
speed. We did kind of a lot of it for a while.
Tony Soprano: You what?!
Meadow Soprano: It was just between homework and SAT's and just the general 
pressure of life, we needed something to keep going.
Tony Soprano: That crap will kill you.
Meadow Soprano: I know.
Tony Soprano: I oughta slap the shit outta you. Where did you get it?
Meadow Soprano: If I thought this was gonna be a lecture, I never woulda told 
you.
Tony Soprano: Take a reality check, what do you think I'm gonna say? Where did 
you get it?
Meadow Soprano: No way I'm telling you, especially after this reaction.
Tony Soprano: Why did you tell me?
Meadow Soprano: You were honest to me today. I won't be doing it again, it got 
too scary.
Tony Soprano: Jesus, right under my nose. Think you'd know.
Meadow Soprano: No dad, you won't.
Tony Soprano: I'm glad you told me, despite of everything.
Meadow Soprano: I'm glad I did too, I'm glad we have that kind of relationship.
%
Tony Soprano: My father was in it. My uncle was in it. Maybe I was too lazy ta 
think for myself.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Yo.
Tony Soprano: What do ya got?
Christopher Moltisanti: Wet shoes.
Tony Soprano: Hey, you chose this life. You don't wanna work in the rain, try 
for the fuckin' Yankees.
%
Mikey Palmice: (to Rusty Irish) Listen to me. I'm gonna give you a break. I'm 
gonna give you a break. When I toss you over... If you can fly, I won't shoot 
you down.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: When's the last time you had a prostate exam?
Tony Soprano: Hey, I don't even let anybody wag their finger in my face.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: (Melfi cracks up laughing) I'm sorry, I shouldn't have 
laughed.
Tony Soprano: Don't apologize.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Oh boy...
Tony Soprano: You got a nice laugh.
%
Tony Soprano: Alright, lemme hear it.
Jimmy Altieri: Rusty Irish.
Tony Soprano: What about him?
Larry Boy Barese: He took a header off the falls.
Raymond Curto: That's the closest that junkie fuck ever got to a bath.
Larry Boy Barese: Yeah, well I got news for you. That junkie fuck was my 
biggest earner. During the football season, he moved more cards than 10 guys 
put together. And another thing, a certain friend of ours should've checked 
with me before he did a favor for the old man Capri.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: What's the one thing, every woman, your mother, your wife, 
your daughter, have in common?
Tony Soprano: They all break my balls.
%
Tony Soprano: All due respect to New York, I don't think you should be tellin' 
my uncle how ta run things.
Johnny Sack: You think I got the balls ta drive in from New York and tell your 
uncle how he should run his family? I shouldn't expect to see the Statue of 
Liberty again if I did that, huh?
%
Tony Soprano: I was proud to be Johnny Soprano's kid. When he beat the shit out 
of that guy, I went to the class, I told them how tough my father was.
%
Livia Soprano: He goes to talk about his mother. That's what he's doing. He 
talks about me, he complains. 'She didn't do this, she did that.' Oh, I gave my 
life to my children on a silver platter, and this is how he repays me.
%
Uncle Junior: I bet that gym teacher shit a brick when your little friend puked 
on his boots, huh Anthony? (Anthony Junior laughs)
Tony Soprano: Wanna encourage him Uncle Jun'?
Uncle Junior: Hey, whatever happened ta boys will be boys?
Carmela Soprano: He stole from the church.
%
Old Woman: How come he's not in school?
Livia Soprano: Because he was a bad boy.
%
Tony Soprano: (to Dr. Jennifer Melfi) Don't start talkin' ta me about 
legitimate business. What about chemical companies? Dumpin' all that shit into 
the rivers and they get all these deformed babies poppin' all over the place.
%
Jeffrey Wernick: (Christopher watches Jeffrey Wernick on television) They will 
undoubtedly be focused on the, as yet unsolved, execution style slaying of 
Soprano family associate Brendan Filone. Was it part of a power struggle? My 
sources tell me that Filone...
Christopher Moltisanti: No one would ever had ranked him as associate.
Jeffrey Wernick: ...is a loyal soldier, if you will, and he winds up dead...for 
no as yet apparent reason.
Christopher Moltisanti: Soldier?! Brendan Filone...associate, soldier?! Fuck 
you! (Christopher throws his remote at the television)
%
Bakery Clerk: You motherfucker! You shot my foot!
Christopher Moltisanti: It happens.
%
Georgie: Fucking amazing though, huh? You know what, that news guy, he said the 
words Brendan Filone, I'm telling you, the hairs on the back of my neck stood 
up. I mean, I knew the guy.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: I got no identity. Even Brendan Filone's got an 
identity, he's dead.
%
Meadow Soprano: Boot your computer, the cops are coming.
Anthony Junior: So?
Meadow Soprano: You want them to see all that porno you downloaded?
Anthony Junior: Shit.
%
Uncle Junior: 'Cause he's a fucking mental weakling.
Mikey Palmice: I know.
Uncle Junior: You don't know shit Mikey. He's seeing a psychiatrist fer 
chrissake. How about that huh? My nephew is seeing a psychiatrist. It makes me 
wanna cry.
Mikey Palmice: No shit...
Uncle Junior: Indictment's being prepared. He's spilling his guts.
Mikey Palmice: I fucking knew it.
Uncle Junior: No, you didn't fucking know it, I just told you.
%
Anthony Junior: Hey grandma how come yous not supposed to breathe in a cemetery?
Livia Soprano: Who says?
Uncle Junior: It's a joke for chrissakes...say why.
Anthony Junior: 'Cuz you'll make the dead people jealous.
%
Larry Boy Barese: Hey mama Livia, how are you? Do you remember me, Larry Boy 
Barese.
Livia Soprano: I know who you are. You lit an apartment house on fire and 
scared your mother half to death.
Larry Boy Barese: Momma's movin' in here on the 15th.
Livia Soprano: Oo, I like your shoes Larry Boy.
Larry Boy Barese: Eh, Momma hasn't been well in the mind. Last week she threw a 
jar of artichokes at me.
Livia Soprano: Well, she better not throw any artichokes at me.
%
Coach Don Hauser: You tell your friends I know all about them.
Paulie Walnuts: If you did, you'd do what they want.
Coach Don Hauser: Heh...is that a threat? How quickly things change. Let me 
tell you something Guido...
Paulie Walnuts: My name is Clarence.
%
Charmaine Bucco: Your mobster friend gonna do something crazy?
Artie Bucco: If I had any balls I would do it myself.
%
Massive Genius: You people are alright. Godfather? I've seen that movie 200 
times. Godfather II was definitely the shit. The third one, a lot of people 
didn't like it, but I think it was just misunderstood.
%
Carmela Soprano: You know, Tony, it's a multiple choice thing with you. 'Cause 
I can't tell if you're old-fashioned, you're paranoid, or just a fucking 
asshole.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Hey, whose fuckin' welfare check you gotta cash to get 
a burger around here?!
%
Friend: Hey, did you ever see that picture of Galante dead with a cigar hangin' 
out of his mouth.
Dr. Bruce Cusamano: It's a fuckin' beautiful hit.
%
Massive Genius: Bold men make bold statements.
Christopher Moltisanti: Why'd they send you over, I'm lookin' for a burger, not 
converted rice!
%
Tony Soprano: I'm not gonna hurt a man that I love because of some cop gossip 
from a degenerate fuckin' gambler with a badge. You understand me?
Vin Makazian: You know... You got an amazing ability to sum up a man's whole 
life in a single sentence. "Degenerate gambler with a badge." You're a pisser, 
you're a real pisser.
Tony Soprano: Well I'm sorry, I'm under a little bit of pressure here. I don't 
have time to suck your dick.
%
Tony Soprano: Jimmy and Pussy. Two fat fucks with black hair.
%
Mikey Palmice: I may be getting bumped up a notch or two. Tony Soprano's on his 
way out, and I mean as in forever.
Jojo Palmice: Oh, my god. He's going to jail?
Mikey Palmice: No, the other forever...
%
Tony Soprano: So, your father tells me you're takin' up uh...astronomy in 
college.
Kevin Bonpensiero: No...business.
Tony Soprano: Well, how come he keeps sayin' you're takin' up space in school?
%
Tony Soprano: This better be good. I was takin' my kid fishin'.
Vin Makazian: Ah, Jesus, what...no hiya Vin, how's it doin' Vin, what do ya 
think Vin...
Tony Soprano: I...I...I thought we understood each other, right? I don't give 
two shits about you, your family, or whether you take it up the ass.
%
Jimmy Altieri: (At a funeral) Junior. Hey.
Uncle Junior: Jimmy. How ya doin' kid?
Jimmy Altieri: How many o' these things we gotta go ta? Brendan Filone's mother 
at the kid's funeral...the way she carried on...
Uncle Junior: Fuckin' manners.
Jimmy Altieri: I just want you ta know, I always thought ya had that right too, 
you know...(Jimmy does a gun motion with his hand)
Uncle Junior: Jimmy, lemme tell you somethin'. Don't worry about what I know.
%
Mikey Palmice: Junior, are you alright?
Uncle Junior: Pork chop boy was here, that fuckin' Altieri. Runnin' his mouth 
about the Brendan Filone hit. Is that what him and my other capos talk about 
behind my back at that fuckin' old folks home?
Mikey Palmice: Well, the meeting's adjourned at the green grove.
%
Donnie Paduana: They'll do it fucking tomorrow, my personal guarantee.
Mikey Palmice: Let me tell you something Donnie, if they don't, some hikers are 
gonna find your personal guarantee rolled up in a tube and shoved up your ass, 
you understand?
%
John Clayborn: (Gets out of car) Yo sir. Excuse me.
Christopher Moltisanti: (In car) What?
John Clayborn: Could you pull forward so we could get out?
Christopher Moltisanti: Alright, give me a minute?
John Clayborn: Police department.
Christopher Moltisanti: Where's your badge?
John Clayborn: Man, I said move this piece of shit fucking now!
Christopher Moltisanti: Get the fuck out of my face.
John Clayborn: (Walks back to his car and sits next to Rasheen Ray) We gonna 
have to waste this motherfucker too?
%
Tony Soprano: Nothin's gonna happen.
Carmela Soprano: Wake up Tony. It already did.
Tony Soprano: I took an oath Carmela.
Carmela Soprano: What are you, a kid in a treehouse?
Tony Soprano: Did you ever tell anybody about me goin' ta see Melfi?
Carmela Soprano: Is that why they tried to kill you? Because you're seeing a 
psychiatrist?
Tony Soprano: What're you talkin' about? It was a carjackin'.
Carmela Soprano: At least have the decency not to lie to me.
Tony Soprano: What do ya wanna do Carmela? You wanna move to Utah? Be Mr. and 
Mrs. Mike Smith? We...we can sell some Indian relics by the road. Maybe start a 
rattlesnake ranch.
Carmela Soprano: This is our chance ta get out Tony. We could start a whole new 
life.
Tony Soprano: Have some Mormons over the dinner. Eat some tomatoes that have no 
taste.
Carmela Soprano: You know what I want Tony? I want those kids ta have a father.
Tony Soprano: They got one. This one. Me. Tony Soprano. And all that comes with 
it.
Carmela Soprano: Oh you prick.
%
Jimmy Altieri: I got enough cologne on?
Christopher Moltisanti: You smell like Paco Rabanne crawled up your ass and 
died.
Jimmy Altieri: Whoah, easy for you to say. I don't get young ones like before.
%
Tony Soprano: (Artie Bucco holds a rifle to Tony's face) My mother?
Artie Bucco: Oh, don't say she's lyin' Ton'...because why would she!!!?
Tony Soprano: What she tell you, my mother?
Artie Bucco: Don't make it worse. Do me the respect of not treating me like a 
fuckin' idiot piece of shit. When you blew up the restaurant, you made me party 
to a criminal conspiracy, did you ever stop ta think about that?
Tony Soprano: I don't know what she told you, my mother, of all people...two 
arson investigators gave that fire a clean bill o' health Artie. Why the fuck 
would I blow up your restaurant?
Artie Bucco: To help me! You fuckin' bent psycho! You hear your uncle's gonna 
hurt my business by stagin' a hit in my place and that's yer solution?! To burn 
it down for the insurance money!!! What kind o' stupid, sick, twisted logic!
Tony Soprano: Ask yourself a question. Am I that fuckin' stupid, huh? Am I that 
fuckin' stupid, really...?
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I have patients who are suicidal!
Tony Soprano: Well they're not gonna feel any better about their life if you 
get clipped.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: My friend Brendan, you shot him in his bathtub, naked. 
No chance to run.
Mikey Palmice: I swear to god, it wasn't me! It was Junior. He hated that kid, 
it was him.
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah right, it was Junior. Mr. Magoo.
Mikey Palmice: Oh c'mon please. Please. (Chris shoots Mikey)
%
FBI Interrogator: You prefer Corrado or Junior?
Uncle Junior: I prefer Mr. Soprano.
FBI Interrogator: Your tenure as boss was a short one. Actually, it was unusual 
in several ways. Let me put this to you as simply as I can. You can avoid 
sentencing on these charges if you will testify that in fact, you were not the 
boss of North Jersey, that in fact, your nephew Anthony Soprano was and is. 
That he de facto controlled your capos with the backing of two of the New York 
families communicating through their emissary, John Sacrimoni. We want Johnny 
Sack. But more than him, we want Mangano and Teresi.
Uncle Junior: I want to fuck Angie Dickinson, let's see who gets lucky first.
%
Sean Gismonte: You're supposed to push Webistics.
Worker: I, I was just givin' them alternatives, shit!
Matthew Bevilaqua: Webistics is our pick o' the week.
Worker: Why? It's got a three million float, competition's robust, and their 
technologies' two years behind, your stock's a dog.
Matthew Bevilaqua: (Sean and Matt beat the crap out of the worker) You fuckin' 
think a minute!
Manager: Hey, stop that! Hey, I'm still the manager here, this is unacceptable. 
Where's Moltisanti? I'm gonna make a call if you don't think I know who really 
runs this operation.
Matthew Bevilaqua: Get back in your fuckin' office! (looks around the room) 
Anybody else got a problem with Webistics???
%
Psychiatrist: I watch the news like everyone else. I know who you are, and I 
saw "Analyze This". I don't need the ramifications that could arise from 
treating someone like yourself.
Tony Soprano: "Analyze This"? Come on, it's a fucking comedy.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Shut up about that!
Adriana La Cerva: Why, they're still gonna kiss your ass. They don't care if 
you're a junkie.
%
Tony Soprano: You owe me the fuckin' explanation, and you know what I'm talkin' 
about.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Yeah, well, remind me Tony, never to get sick again, 
huh? Remind me, please, never to have a serious illness, because, with you, and 
Silvio, and Paulie, and all you pricks, weakness could spread as fuckin' 
treason!
Tony Soprano: You know what? Fuck you! I don't wanna hear about your fuckin' 
back anymore! Who's your fucking boss, huh? Who's your fucking boss? Who gets 
the explanation? What am I, supposed to trust you? You fuckin' off the 
reservation cocksucker!
%
Raymond Curto: You heard about Jimmy Altieri, right?
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Yeah, flipped...fuckin' ass hole.
Paulie Walnuts: He had two ass holes when they buried 'im.
%
Tony Soprano: I think it's time for you to start to seriously consider salads.
Bobby Baccilieri: What do you mean?
Tony Soprano: What do I mean? I mean get off my car before you flip it over, 
you fat fuck.
%
Tony Soprano: Talk to me.
Jack Massarone: These fuckin' ditsoon activists, they're killin' me. They're 
picketing my place twenty-four seven. Three days I'm down already.
Tony Soprano: Who?
Jack Massarone: Ah this hard on, Reverend Herman James, Jr. He's an old song, 
not enough minorities doing the joint-fitting.
Tony Soprano: You were told the joint fitters union is under my uncle's 
jurisdiction.
Jack Massarone: I know. But if you could pave the way for me to talk to your 
uncle, so he could maybe send some guys down and you know, make it 
uncomfortable for these people. Like you did with your unions before.
Tony Soprano: It's gonna cost you.
Jack Massarone: Besides what you're already raping me for those no-show 
electrician jobs?
Tony Soprano: You're not such a fucking citizen when you want a construction 
bid to go your way, are ya Jack?
Jack Massarone: Ok...ok. Take it easy.
Tony Soprano: I'll see what I can do. Meantime, call animal control. Watch you 
don't get followed meetin' me.
%
Black Guy: We wanna talk to your foreman.
Christopher Moltisanti: You wanna talk to the foreskin?
Black Guy: You a wise ass motherfucker huh?
Christopher Moltisanti: Well, keep your mother off the streets and I won't fuck 
her!
%
Tony Soprano: Now Bobby you're gonna hear some high end shit. And A, I hope you 
can understand it, and B, I hope you keep it between this room and Junior. 
Because if you don't, I promise you, they're gonna find pieces of you in eight 
different dumpsters.
Bobby Baccilieri: I inherited Junior. I don't think you got reason to talk to 
me this way. I always liked you.
Tony Soprano: Bullshit. But we'll assume you do now.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: To the victor, belongs the spoils.
Tony Soprano: Why don't you get the fuck outta here before I shove your 
quotations book up your fat fuckin' ass.
%
Richie Aprile: Did you ever meditate?
Beansie Gaeta: Me, meditate? Ha, are you crazy?
Richie Aprile: Not as crazy as I used to be, still crazy enough to take an eye 
out.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Hey, I remember every blowjob I ever got. How 'bout you, you 
remember your first blowjob?
Silvio Dante: Yeah, of course.
Paulie Walnuts: How long did it take for the guy to come?
%
Tony Soprano: I thought I told you to back the fuck off Beansie.
Richie Aprile: I did, then I put it in drive.
%
Meadow Soprano: It wasn't my fault.
Tony Soprano: If I had a quarter for every time I heard that since you learned 
ta talk, I'd have a private jet on twenty four hour standby.
%
Meadow Soprano: I could've taken ecstasy but I didn't.
Anthony Junior: Don't puke on the floor.
Tony Soprano: What're you doin' up! Go ta bed.
Anthony Junior: She fools around with ecstasy and you yell at me?
%
Annalisa Zucca: My husband? Fuck you. He is never coming back. So you have to 
fucking deal with me.
Tony Soprano: Up your ass.
%
Tony Soprano: I can't watch this again.
Silvio Dante: This is a DVD, it's the advanced bootleg.
Paulie Walnuts: These are the alternative takes, Ton'.
Tony Soprano: What, you gonna call Coppola and give ideas how to fix it?
%
Worker: Commendatori, you are already checked in.
Paulie Walnuts: Commendatori, like a commander, I like that, that's respect.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Ton', you give this guy a golf club, he'll probably try to fuck 
it.
%
Paulie Walnuts: (about DVD's) Somebody should tell Paramount Pictures ta get 
their shit together. We're gonna be stealin' thousands more o' these things.
%
Whore: Business slow! We tell you! We pay security, what for? Kid break window, 
you do nothing! We pay no more!
Christopher Moltisanti: What'd she fuckin' say?
Dominic: Nothing, don't listen to her. C'mon, honey, let's go. Honey, out 
front. C'mon. Now! Fucking bitch.
Christopher Moltisanti: You got money for blow, but not for us?
Dominic: Chris, please, I'm sorry--
Christopher Moltisanti: "Business slow." Half the fucking neighborhood's out 
there waiting for blow jobs. You drug addict motherfucker. This shit's 
unacceptable.
%
Tony Soprano: Jesus fuckin' Christ. How come every piss I take is a fuckin' 
news story?
%
Richie Aprile: You crossed the line on me once, Anthony, and I held my tongue. 
She may be your sister, but back the fuck off. You know, all due respect.
Tony Soprano: Respect? What the fuck do you know about respect? I put you back 
in business, you cocksucker.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: (about Furio Giunta) He's with us now?
Tony Soprano: Uhuh...
Christopher Moltisanti: Guess I didn't get the memo.
Tony Soprano: Would you have read it if you got one?
%
Johnny Sack: Don't get up.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: I wasn't gonna.
Johnny Sack: You piece of shit.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Aight come on Rich.
Richie Aprile: Get your hand offa me, I'll put one in your head.
%
Tony Soprano: Back off and respect the title you fuckin' jerk off.
Richie Aprile: It's your ball. You make the rules.
Tony Soprano: No, I don't make 'em, they've always been there.
%
Richie Aprile: You got some fuckin' balls, you know that?
David Scatino: What I do?
Richie Aprile: I should stab you in the fuckin' eye!
%
Silvio Dante: I'm losing my balls over here! This fucking moron's playing 
hazel. Get the fuck out of here!
Matthew Bevilaqua: I was just trying to sweep the cheese away--
Silvio Dante: Why? Why now? Leave it there.
Matthew Bevilaqua: I don't know, I was just--
Silvio Dante: What? Where do you get these fuckin' idiots, huh? Where do you 
get them? He's sweeping the cheese, I'm trying to get-- leave the fucking 
cheese there, alright! I love fucking cheese at my feet! I stick motherfuckin' 
provolone in my socks at night, so they smell like your sister's crotch in the 
morning. Alright? So, leave the fucking cock sucking cheese where it is!
%
Richie Aprile: How did you get in here? (To David Scatino)
Tony Soprano: Same as you. Through the front door.
%
Adriana La Cerva: I heard they fired their produce guy.
Christopher Moltisanti: Enough! I'm so sick and tired o' hearin' you people 
talk about food, food, food! That's all anybody ever talks about is proscuitto, 
cheese, and fuckin' fava beans. I'm, I'm drownin' here!
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ. Take it easy.
Christopher Moltisanti: We're not even engaged yet.
Tony Soprano: Yeah well, when you're married, you'll understand the importance 
of fresh produce.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck the importance.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Sounds to me like Anthony Jr. may have stumbled onto 
existentialism.
Tony Soprano: Fuckin' internet.
%
Livia Soprano: I know your father forbids your comin' down here.
Anthony Junior: He doesn't. Honest. He just doesn't want us ta talk about you 
in the house.
Livia Soprano: Well, you can go shit in his hat.
%
Adriana La Cerva: Jon Favreau? He's great. He's also a writer. You should show 
him your script.
Christopher Moltisanti: Swingers? He can suck my dick. That swings too.
%
Carmela Soprano: You stole my car! Where's the trust in this house?
Anthony Junior: When I get confirmed I'm gonna become a man. So how come I 
can't drive?
Tony Soprano: Oh yeah? Who was that MAN that we had to pick up from camp last 
year for bed wetting?
Anthony Junior: It was the year before last.
Carmela Soprano: You could have killed those girls.
Anthony Junior: That would have been interesting.
Carmela Soprano: What? What did you say?
Anthony Junior: Death just shows you the ultimate absurdity of life.
Tony Soprano: What is this?? Are you trying to get me to lose my temper because 
I'm about to put you through that goddamn window!!
Anthony Junior: See? That's what I mean. Life is absurd.
Carmela Soprano: Don't say that! God forgive you!
Anthony Junior: There is no God.
Carmela Soprano: Ey!!
Tony Soprano: Ey!!
Carmela Soprano: Where is this coming from?
Tony Soprano: Do they teach you this crap in school??
Carmela Soprano: Is this that new English teacher Mr. Clark...emm... Where is 
he from? Answer me!
Meadow Soprano: Overland.
Meadow Soprano: You want him to read anything other than Hustler? Hello. He got 
assigned &#733;The Stranger&#733; You want him to be an educated person? What 
do you think education is? You just make more money? This IS education.
Anthony Junior: Do you ever think like: Why were we born?
Meadow Soprano: Madame de Stael said: In life one must choose between boredom 
and suffering.
Tony Soprano: Go to your room! (Meadow leaves)
Anthony Junior: No, I'm serious. Why were we born?
Carmela Soprano: We were born because of Adam and Eve, that's why. Now go 
upstairs and do your math.
Anthony Junior: Algebra?? That's the most boring.
Tony Soprano: Well, your other choice is sufferin'. You wanna start now?!?
%
Matthew Bevilaqua: To kick upstairs to Tony Soprano would be an honor.
Sean Gismonte: He the man.
Christopher Moltisanti: I thought you said I was the man. He the man, I the 
man, who the man?
Sean Gismonte: Are vee not men?
%
Richie Aprile: You know, maybe when I'm over there, I could fuck his wife.
%
Richie Aprile: (about Christopher) The attitude on that camel-nose fuck. He 
ever lays his hand on my niece again I'm gonna tear him apart piece by piece.
Matthew Bevilaqua: Camel nose!
Sean Gismonte: Man, you can't make that shit up.
Richie Aprile: The fuck are you talkin' about? I just did. Did you ever notice 
he's the only motherfucker who can smoke a cigarette in the rain with his hands 
tied behind his back? That nose is like natural canopy. (Sean and Matt laugh) 
You know the kid has his good points.
Matthew Bevilaqua: Yeah, yeah, I know. I'm not sayin' anything against him. 
He's my homie.
Richie Aprile: Your what?!?
Matthew Bevilaqua: He lives up near me.
Richie Aprile: Well, why didn't you say that? If you wanna talk like a fuckin' 
mulignan, we'll send you to slip-and-fall school.
%
Matthew Bevilaqua: This is fucked.
Sean Gismonte: What?
Matthew Bevilaqua: This. Us. Look at us. We're like two fuckin' scared rabbits 
or somethin'. Douchebags.
Sean Gismonte: Don't say that.
Matthew Bevilaqua: Sean, for chrissakes, grow up to reality. We are nowhere. 
Buyin' fish, punchin' safes, what is that, and for what?
Sean Gismonte: We're just gettin' started. It's what you do.
Matthew Bevilaqua: We got stockbroker licenses. I went to Pace college.
Sean Gismonte: Fuck. It's true huh?
Matthew Bevilaqua: We're fucked.
Sean Gismonte: We gotta do somethin' to get ahead in this world.
%
Sean Gismonte: Is that all Tony said? Did he say anything else?
Christopher Moltisanti: The fuck do ya want 'im ta do? Give ya a kiss on the 
lips?
%
Tony Soprano: Do you eat steak?
Paulie Walnuts: What the fuck you talkin about?
Tony Soprano: If you were in India, you would go to Hell for that.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm going to hell, T.
Tony Soprano: You're not going anywhere but home.
Christopher Moltisanti: I crossed over to the other side.
Tony Soprano: You what?
Christopher Moltisanti: I saw the tunnel and the white light...and I saw my 
father in hell.
Paulie Walnuts: Get the fuck out of here.
Christopher Moltisanti: And the bouncer said that I'd be there too when my time 
comes.
Paulie Walnuts: What bouncer?
Christopher Moltisanti: "The emerald piper", that's our hell. It's an Irish bar 
where it's St. Patrick's day everyday forever. Mikey Palmice and Brendan Filone 
were there too. They were friends.
Paulie Walnuts: Those two guys hated each other.
Tony Soprano: You gotta relax, you just need some rest.
Christopher Moltisanti: They're friends now. They were playing dice with two 
Roman soldiers and a bunch of the Irish guys.
Paulie Walnuts: Doesn't make sense.
Christopher Moltisanti: The Irish, they were winning every roll.
%
Paulie Walnuts: You didn't go to hell. You went to purgatory, my friend.
Christopher Moltisanti: I forgot all about purgatory.
Paulie Walnuts: Purgatory, a little detour on the way to paradise.
Christopher Moltisanti: How long you think we gotta stay there?
Paulie Walnuts: That's different for everybody. You add up all your mortal 
sins, multiply that number by 50, then you add up all your venial sins and 
multiply that by 25. You add them together, and that's your sentence. I figure 
i'm gonna have to do about 6,000 years before I get accepted into heaven. And 
6,000 years is nothing in eternity terms. I could do that standing on my head. 
It's like a couple of days here.
%
Paulie Walnuts: There's no denying it. I'm dragging a bunch of fucking ghouls 
around with me and Mikey's their fucking ringleader.
%
Tony Soprano: Why don't you just take it easy, will ya? We just wanna talk to 
ya. That's all.
Matthew Bevilaqua: It wasn't me. It was Sean. Just Sean.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: You're shakin'.
Matthew Bevilaqua: You're gonna fuckin' kill me for somethin' I didn't do.
Tony Soprano: Don't you think we coulda killed you already, if we wanted you 
dead. Relax. We just wanna talk to you.
Matthew Bevilaqua: Tony, it was...it was Sean! You got to believe me, it was 
Sean, he got nuts! He said we're being pissed on and disrespected and that we 
should score points with Richie. But I told him hey, Rome wasn't built in one 
day! Anything Tony, I'll tell you anything you wanna know.
Tony Soprano: What'd Richie say?
Matthew Bevilaqua: It had nothin' to do with Richie, he didn't ask for it. He 
got mad when I told 'im. Sean did it on spec.
Tony Soprano: Alright. Come here. Come here. Come on. Are you sure nobody else 
was involved. Take a minute, think it over.
Matthew Bevilaqua: It was Sean all the way.
Tony Soprano: Alright. You're a good kid.
Matthew Bevilaqua: I'm thirsty.
Tony Soprano: See if we got somethin' to drink.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: What can I get ya? You want a Fanta? Somethin' like that?
Tony Soprano: How is that? I mean, you sure you want a diet drink? You don't 
want somethin' with some sugar in it?
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: There was only diet.
Matthew Bevilaqua: It's good.
Tony Soprano: You finished?
Matthew Bevilaqua: Thank you T.
Tony Soprano: 'Cuz that sugarless motherfucker...the last fuckin' drink you're 
ever gonna have! (Tony pulls the gun out)
Matthew Bevilaqua: Ah! T, No! Mommy! Mommy! Please, Tony, please! (Tony and 
Pussy shoot Matt)
%
Tony Soprano: What do you wanna talk about?
Richie Aprile: Fucking Dick Barone!
Tony Soprano: Well, as long as the two of you are happy.
%
Richie Aprile: You know, Jun', it kills me to sit back and watch. Forget it.
Uncle Junior: No, finish what you were gonna say.
Richie Aprile: Well I forgot already.
Uncle Junior: Then un-forget.
Richie Aprile: I can't not notice that he's fucking you. This Scatino bust out, 
is like a license to steal. What's he throwing your way? U gatz. This garbage 
thing, he's already taking your townships. Now he's fucking with mine?
Uncle Junior: What am I supposed to do about it? I'm under indictment.
Richie Aprile: Sorry, Junior, I don't want to rip open old wounds, but...
Uncle Junior: I'm in no shape for disharmony.
Richie Aprile: You and I both know he's gotta go.
Uncle Junior: That's my nephew you're talkin' about. How dare you in my own 
home!
Richie Aprile: C'mon junior, this fucking guy was supposed to be laid out on 
midland avenue a year ago. I know it. You know it.
Uncle Junior: Let me tell you who's not a good kid. That niece of mine. I left 
my brother's house one night and my wallet was light. I'm talkin' about a 
10-year-girl here, Richie. A word to the wise, that's all i'm saying.
%
Janice Soprano: (In middle of sex with Richie, while Richie holds a gun to her 
head) Oh, Richie baby you're the best. You're the best one. Oh baby. Oh, you're 
the best one ever. Oh..ah..ahh..oh baby you're the best. Oh baby you're the 
best. Oh, Richie. Oh, Richie!! Oh baby you're the boss. Oh, you're the boss. 
Oh, you're the boss. Oh baby! Oh, you're the best. Ah..ah! It should be you. 
Ah! It should be you. What? What?
Richie Aprile: Fuck that come from? It should be you? What are you tryin' to 
say Janice?
Janice Soprano: What?!
Richie Aprile: Don't what me! Why'd you say that?
Janice Soprano: I was making love to you baby!
Richie Aprile: You know what you said.
Janice Soprano: I was in the heat of passion, I'm doin' it like you like.
Richie Aprile: "Boss" this. "Boss" that. It Should be you! That's not part of 
it. How can you think of shit like that during sex? You're not in the moment.
Janice Soprano: I find powerful men erotic.
Richie Aprile: Is that another dig in me?
Janice Soprano: Oh, Jesus, Richie.
Richie Aprile: I got to be loyal. Without that, we crumble.
Janice Soprano: Tell that to Paul Castellano.
Richie Aprile: I'm old school, Janice.
Janice Soprano: All I mean is my brother needs help.
Richie Aprile: Teaching him manners is one thing.
Janice Soprano: My Uncle Junior still has friends and Junior thinks the world 
of you. When your opponent gives you an opening, be swift as a hare.
Richie Aprile: When I think of that jacket I gave your brother and he spit on 
it. I could slice an ear off his head.
Janice Soprano: Richie wait, wha-- ma, (Livia comes down the stairs) if you 
need something, call, I'll bring it up.
Livia Soprano: Are you smoking marijuana? I want to watch the tv.
Janice Soprano: Well, we should get another one for your room.
Livia Soprano: Listen to her. Like Rose Kennedy with all our money to throw 
around.
%
FBI Agent 1: You have to be absolutely 110% sure this is the man you saw.
Witness: This is definitely the man I saw.
FBI Agent 2: And the other man?
Witness: No.
FBI Agent 2: And the other man?
Witness: Unfortunately, I didn't get a good look at him. The light was 
reflecting off the windshield. But he was heavy set. It was really dark. I 
didn't want them to see me. I heard gunshots but I, I thought it was kids with 
firecrackers, and then when two men drove out in a car, I crouched down in the 
ragweed.
FBI Agent 2: Sure.
Witness: It began to dawn on me, what had happened. Like I told the responding 
officers, I didn't finish changing the tire, I walked to a phone and called 
right away.
FBI Agent 1: Thank you Mr. Arthur.
Witness: So goddamn fed up with crime, I..I'd hate myself if I didn't come 
forward, help you put these people behind bars.
FBI Agent 2: Thanks to people like you, we may just do that.
Witness: May I ask who the dead man was?
FBI Agent 2: Just a poor kid, got hooked up with the wrong crowd.
Witness: Crack?
FBI Agent 1: Something like that. (The witness leaves and the FBI Agents stare 
at photos of Matthew Bevilaqua's bullet riddled body)
%
Witness's Wife: Oh my God! (reading newspaper)
Witness: What?
Witness's Wife: Oh my God! Jeez God no.
Witness: What the hell is it?
Witness's Wife: The victim has now further been identified as Matthew 
Bevilaqua, a Soprano family associate.
Witness: Fuck, gimme that! (reading newspaper) Officials close to the 
investigation are keeping tight-lipped as it may involve a high ranking mafia 
member.
Witness's Wife: Oh my God!
Witness: Where's that detective's number?
Witness's Wife: On the fridge.
Witness: Those lying cocksuckers. Where on the fridge!
Witness's Wife: On the fridge!!! On the fridge!!!
Witness: Where on the fucking fridge?
Witness's Wife: Oh, I knew it, I knew it! But you had to be a big man!
%
Michael Mcluhan: Mr. Soprano. I'm Michael Mcluhan from the US Marshals Service, 
here to reattach your electronic bracelet.
Uncle Junior: They give you the important jobs, huh?
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: The RICO Act, Eliot. We sat there and we talked about the 
fucking RICO Act.
Dr. Elliot Kupferberg: You treat different patients, your base of knowledge 
expands.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Two years ago, I thought "RICO" was a relative of his.
%
Silvio Dante: We got Eisenhower's dinnerware from allied headquarters in 
London. We got a couple of Hermann Goering's personal pearl handled lugers, and 
get this... We got the jeep that Patton drove around in, in Sicily.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: We have ways of dealing with you Mr. Soprano! (German 
uniform, German accent)
%
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: (in German uniform) I know nothing! Nothing! (comedic)
Silvio Dante: Ton', I am looking at the fucking history channel here!
%
Tony Soprano: You don't sell that shit around those routes, you hear me?
Richie Aprile: I'm workin' with Junior on this.
Tony Soprano: I don't give a shit if you're workin' with Wal-Mart. Knock it the 
fuck off.
%
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: You respected my father, you should respect Richie.
Tony Soprano: Those who want respect, give respect.
Richie Aprile: See, he just told you to shut the fuck up. And he told me to go 
fuck myself. (To Jackie Jr.)
%
Tony Soprano: See obviously, Richie, you're fucking deaf, I told you ten times, 
then I find out you're still dealing blow on those garbage routes.
Richie Aprile: For that I'm losing a fucking bid?
Tony Soprano: Next time you'll find yourself in the back of one of your trucks.
%
Tony Soprano: What is that?
Irina Peltsin: "Chicken soup for the soul".
Tony Soprano: You should read "tomato sauce for your ass", it's the Italian 
version.
%
Richie Aprile: Put my fucking dinner on the table, and keep your mouth shut.
Janice Soprano: No, you shut up. Just because he's a ballroom dancer, you think 
your son is gay. What if he was gay, what difference does it make? (Richie 
slams Janice in the face)
Janice Soprano: Ow! Fuck!
Richie Aprile: What are you looking at? You gonna cry now? (Janice goes, gets a 
gun and points it at Richie)
Richie Aprile:Get the fuck out of here, I'm in no mood for your- (Janice shoots 
Richie)
%
Janice Soprano: What'd you do with him? (about Richie)
Tony Soprano: We buried him... On a hill overlooking a little river, with pine 
cones all around.
Janice Soprano: You did? (joyous)
Tony Soprano: C'mon Janice, what the fuck? What do you care what we did with 
him, huh?
%
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Hello. (on phone)
Artie Bucco: Hey, man, it's Artie. (on phone)
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Yeah, I know, what's up?
Artie Bucco: Listen, I'm at the Soprano's house. And Tony's a little green 
around the gills. Flu, i'm guessing. But maybe he ate something didn't agree 
with him.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Food poisoning?
Artie Bucco: No, what, salmonella? No! But he had a reaction. You guys ate at 
an Indian restaurant. It would help if we knew, did you have any symptoms?
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: No. Well, once during the night, I did have a slight 
touch of diarrhea. That's all, it passed.
Artie Bucco: Nothing. Touch of diarrhea.
Tony Soprano: You motherfucker.
Artie Bucco: A touch. Nothing right, puss? Not what like Tony's going through, 
right? Like from bad shellfish or anything.
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: What the fuck? Am I gonna get sick now?
%
Tony Soprano: How long? How much do they know?
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: A year and a half. No, less.
Silvio Dante: A year and a fucking half you been running your own fucking 
gossip column?
Paulie Walnuts: Motherfucker!! (pushes Pussy angrily)
%
Big Pussy Bonpensiero: Not in the face okay? You give me that? Huh? Keep my 
eyes?
Paulie Walnuts: You were like a brother to me.
Tony Soprano: To all of us.
%
Tony Soprano: I had a dream I fucked your brains out. Right on that desk, and 
you loved it.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Well you threw that at me like a rock.
%
Tony Soprano: Things are good...what the fuck...Richie Aprile's in the Bermuda 
Triangle...all my enemies are smoked.
%
Lilliana Wosilius: Who wrote the star spangled banner?
Stasiu Wosilius: Martin Luther King.
Lilliana Wosilius: Stasiu...you know this.
Stasiu Wosilius: I want to eat.
Lilliana Wosilius: Francis Scott Key.
Stasiu Wosilius: Kurva Tvaya Mach (Fuck his whore of a mother)
Lilliana Wosilius: What holiday was celebrated for the first time by the 
American colonists?
Stasiu Wosilius: Martin Luther King.
%
Tony Soprano: (to FBI agents, from his car) Listen, I'll save you some gas, I'm 
just goin' down ta the stationery store, then I'll be right back. You don't 
gotta follow me like yesterday. Aight?
%
Patsy Parisi: I miss him so much.
Tony Soprano: Yeah, well that's natural. But you're with us now. So why don't 
you...uh...leave the morbid shit back at Junior's crew and...uh...have a happy 
birthday.
%
Paulie Walnuts: How the fuck would Patsy know we clipped "Spoons"?
Tony Soprano: What? That fuckin' twin telepathy...?
Paulie Walnuts: Somebody's puttin' ideas in this kid's head.
%
Tony Soprano: You got a problem?
Patsy Parisi: What Ton'?
Tony Soprano: I said, do you got a problem?
Patsy Parisi: With what Ton'?
Tony Soprano: I don't know, I heard maybe you got a fuckin' problem, like you 
don't like bein' here...
Patsy Parisi: I like bein' here.
Tony Soprano: You sure?
Patsy Parisi: Yeah.
Tony Soprano: Y-you sure?
Patsy Parisi: Yeah.
Tony Soprano: No...don't say y-you're sure if you're not sure.
%
Carmela Soprano: If you want her to be with him, just keep it up. Keep playing 
the race card. You're gonna drive her right into his arms. (about Meadow dating 
Noah)
Tony Soprano: Not if I cut off those fuckin' arms.
%
Tony Soprano: You're a captain, Ralphie, when I say you're a captain.
Ralph Cifaretto: And I'm gonna turn up my hearin' aid so I don't miss it.
%
Tony Soprano: What I mean is we're Italian?
Noah Tannenbaum: Oh, my dad is Jewish and my mother's family is African 
American.
Tony Soprano: Tanenbaum. Right. But on your application to Columbia, you didn't 
check Jewish did you?
Noah Tannenbaum: No. They can't ask about religious affiliation.
Tony Soprano: Oh, right...right...o' course. What'd you check?
Noah Tannenbaum: African American.
Tony Soprano: So we do understand each other; you're a ditsoon.
Noah Tannenbaum: Excuse me?
Tony Soprano: Charcoal Briquette...a mulignan.
Noah Tannenbaum: What's your problem?
Tony Soprano: I think you know what my problem is. You see your little friend 
up there. She didn't do you any favors bringing you into this house. Now I 
dunno what the fuck she was thinkin', we'll get to that later. See I got 
business associates who are black and they don't want my son with their 
daughters and I don't want their sons with mine.
Noah Tannenbaum: Fuck you!
Tony Soprano: See, that's the kind o' thing I'm hopin' to avoid. So when my 
little girl comes down the stairs, you're gonna say how nice it was to meet me, 
then you're gonna go drop her off at school and you're gonna say Goodbye.
%
Uncle Junior: I'm fucking fed up.
Tony Soprano: Hey, I'm on the street. That's the arrangement. Stay home, clip 
your coupons. Be a happy man.
%
Janice Soprano: I mean...I...I do know what mom's wishes were, but not to have 
a wake or a funeral, I mean makes us look like we're unloving children, not to 
mention cheapskates.
Tony Soprano: Who gives a shit what it looks like, the woman expressed her 
wishes.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: The wife of a made guy doesn't hostess.
Adriana La Cerva: I'm so proud of you. I love you Christopher.
Christopher Moltisanti: You better.
%
Janice Soprano: You better hope you have all your shit outta here 'cuz I'm 
callin' the locksmith.
%
Dino Zerilli: Look. (Reverting Jackie's attention to Chris)
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Take away Tony Soprano, he's a zero with shoes.
Dino Zerilli: Yeah, but he's wearin' a stripe now.
Jackie Aprile: My uncle Richie was gonna-
Dino Zerilli: Yeah, but he never did.
%
Tony Soprano: What time is it?
Jackie Aprile, Jr: I'm here, aren't I? Out of respect to my father.
Furio Giunta: Got a make to phone call. (Furio leaves)
Tony Soprano: Sit down. You want somethin' to eat?
Jackie Aprile, Jr: I'm not hungry.
Tony Soprano: That's too bad, I said lunch meet. You want a drink? Lose the 
glasses. I'm gonna say a few things. I'm gonna say some bad words. You're just 
gonna have to deal with it. Now I know what you're thinkin', you're thinkin' I 
clipped your uncle. On the one hand, you'd be a shithead to believe me when I 
told you I didn't do it. But I didn't. Now I got some bad news for you. Look at 
me. Look at me. Your uncle was a rat.
Jackie Aprile, Jr: No fuckin' way.
Tony Soprano: Sit down. Sit down. Sit the fuck down. Your uncle was a rat and 
now he's in the witness protection program.
Jackie Aprile, Jr: That's my father's brother you're talkin' about.
Tony Soprano: Jackie, I'm a member of your family almost...you think I'm the 
only one that knows this about Richie, you ask anybody. This hurt all of us.
Jackie Aprile, Jr: Jesus Christ.
Tony Soprano: You're dad and me, you know how close we were? He never wanted 
this for you. He wanted you to be a doctor.
Jackie Aprile, Jr: Give me a fuckin' break!
Tony Soprano: Let me tell you something...besides the money, which there is a 
shitload of, doctor's a very powerful position.
Jackie Aprile, Jr: I'm no doctor. You know how hard you have to work to get 
your MD? How many years it takes? I was even thinkin' maybe osteopathy...but I 
don't think I have the grades for that even.
Tony Soprano: What? You're not gonna drop out of Rutgers, are ya?
Jackie Aprile, Jr: No, but those fuckin' Pre-Med courses almost killed me. I 
only did it 'cuz my dad was sick.
Tony Soprano: But you should know, he never wanted this life for you, and I'll 
tell you somethin', I don't want it for my son either.
%
Svetlana Kirilenko: Bill, don't waste breath, this cunt is gonna be sorry she 
ever fuck with me!
%
Silvio Dante: She's so fat, her blood type is Ragu.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Ginny Sacramoni, what she needs is her own zip code.
%
Paulie Walnuts: She's so fat, she goes campin', the bears have to hide their 
food.
%
Furio Giunta: I like a woman you can grab onto something.
Paulie Walnuts: You grab onto Ginny Sacrimoni, your fuckin' hands'll disappear.
%
Gigi Cestone: Jersey's a small state, she moves in...she could tip it over.
%
Tony Soprano: Alright, obviously you told the cops you don't know who did this.
Vito Spatafore: I'm upset. But please, I know how to keep my mouth shut.
Ralph Cifaretto: Oh unless of course there's a salami sandwich around.
%
Carmela Soprano: Maybe the fact that you stick your dick into anything with a 
pulse...you ever thought of exploring that as a root cause?
%
Tony Soprano: How you doin'? I got new shoes. Soles are a little heavy.
Officer Wilmore: License, registration, and insurance card please.
Tony Soprano: You're with the township right? I think I had dinner with your 
boss last week. Tony Soprano.
Officer Wilmore: Would you please remove the license from the wallet. Do you 
know why I stopped you sir?
Tony Soprano: Yeah I do. I'll tell you what, why don't you and your wife have 
dinner, on me. And you can tell her about it.
Officer Wilmore: You offering me a bribe sir?
Tony Soprano: Course not. You gotta relax a little.
Officer Wilmore: Would you uh...shut the engine please sir?
Tony Soprano: Just out of curiosity, what happens if I don't feel like shuttin' 
the engine?
Officer Wilmore: Dispatch 582, request backup.
Tony Soprano: Ah, you gotta be fuckin' kiddin' me.
Carmela Soprano: Tony...
Responding Officer: 582 what's your dilemma?
Officer Wilmore: Dispatch, cancel backup.
Tony Soprano: Is this the high point of your career?
Officer Wilmore: Wait in the car.
Tony Soprano: Our tax dollars, hard earned fuckin' work.
Carmela Soprano: Makes you sick! You think they'd be out arresting dope dealers!
Tony Soprano: Can you believe this shit?! This, this fuckin' smoke's actually 
writin' me up!
Carmela Soprano: Stay in the car, Tony!
Tony Soprano: Affirmitive Action cocksucker!
%
Vito Spatafore: He's gonna be a vegetable, Tony! A fuckin' retard!
Tony Soprano: No, he's gonna be fine.
Ralph Cifaretto: Well, look at the bright side. He wasn't that smart to begin 
with!
%
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Just say the word. My fuckin' pleasure!
Tony Soprano: Why don't you go grab us some coffee.
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Come on, are you kiddin'?!
Paulie Walnuts: Better yet, go to the ear, nose, and throat department. Get 
your hearin' checked.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: Oh, what? Not even a hello?
Tracee: Fuck you, asshole.
Ralph Cifaretto: Oh that's nice. Very nice. That's how you talk to a man in 
front of his friends?
Tracee: Yeah, right...what man!?
%
Ralph Cifaretto: I have come to reclaim Rome for my people.
%
Gigi Cestone: They're gonna find this piece o' shit in a trunk someday.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: Skipper! Where's Tony?
Gigi Cestone: Gettin' his weasel greased.
Ralph Cifaretto: Oh, your kid brother's here.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: I have to start taking care of your for the baby. If it's a 
boy, we'll name him Ralph after me. If it's a girl, we'll name her Tracee after 
you, this way she can grow up to be a cock-sucking slob just like her mother.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm not fuckin' kiddin' Tony. He's a sick fuck. He was 
sniffin' her fuckin' panties.
Tony Soprano: What?
Christopher Moltisanti: You heard me.
%
Furio Giunta: You know, there are worse things that can happen to a person than 
cancer.
%
Uncle Junior: Anthony is a cunt hair away from owning all of Northern Jersey. 
And I am that cunt hair.
%
Tony Soprano: Well...you know, you're gettin' better. That's the important 
thing. You look better too.
Uncle Junior: If you're gonna lie to me, tell me there's a broad waitin' in the 
car who wants to tongue my balls.
Tony Soprano: Hey you want that, it's a phone call away.
%
Uncle Junior: No need. You say sign, I sign. You tell me to take a crap on the 
deck o' the Queen Mary, an hour later, they're hosin' it down with disinfectant.
%
Gigi Cestone: What's wrong with you? The skips here.
Ralph Cifaretto: I'm on a roll here...
Gigi Cestone: You'll be on a slab you keep it up.
%
Dino Zerilli: So what's this shit I hear about Tony havin' a fight with Ralph 
Cifaretto...somethin' about thanksgivin'?
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: I was there.
Dino Zerilli: What? Tony's? Wow....thanksgivin'?
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: After dinner. Take Meadow out.
Dino Zerilli: Did you fuck her yet?
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Her body is mad ripe.
Dino Zerilli: Yeah, but did you fuck her yet?
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: She's creamin' fer me man.
Dino Zerilli: Ha ha...you didn't fuck her yet!
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: I don't know if it's even a smart thing...she's Tony 
Soprano's daughter.
%
Mary DeAngelis: (bell rings) Oh my God!!! Who could that be!!!
Carmela Soprano: It's the Boston Strangler...Jesus, Ma.
%
Eugene Pontecorvo: At the very least, Tony owes you an apology.
Ralph Cifaretto: The money I put in his pocket from construction alone, he 
should hit his knees, this prick. What? You think I'm afraid of that fat fuck? 
No offense. (to Vito Spatafore) I could see if it was his daughter or a niece 
of his, but all this over some dead whore. (whore pronounced hooah)
%
Ralph Cifaretto: I'm tellin' ya John, he's not leavin' me a lot of options here.
Johnny Sack: Don't talk crazy. You wanna commit suicide, pills are a lot easier.
%
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: You should get the nurse to help you...that's what they get 
paid for...maybe she'll be fine and give you a cheap thrill.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Amazing thing about snakes is that they reproduce spontaneously.
Tony Soprano: What do you mean?
Paulie Walnuts: They have both male and female sex organs. Thats why 
somebody you dont trust you call a snake. How can you trust a guy who can 
literally go fuck themselves?
Tony Soprano: Dont you think that expression wouldve come from the Adam 
and Eve story? When the snake tempted Eve to bite the apple?
Paulie Walnuts: Hey, snakes were fucking themselves long before Adam and Eve 
showed up, T.
%
Tony Soprano: What are you doin' here?
Carmela Soprano: Answer your father.
Anthony Junior: I got sent home.
Tony Soprano: Why? Why?!!
Anthony Junior: I got in trouble.
Carmela Soprano: Your son broke into his school Friday night and vandalized the 
swimming pool.
Tony Soprano: How do you vandalize a swimming pool?
Carmela Soprano: They threw a bunch of stuff in it, they broke things.
Tony Soprano: Why'd you do that for?
Anthony Junior: Screwin' around.
Tony Soprano: On your mother's birthday?! (smacks Anthony Junior in the head)
Anthony Junior: It wasn't. It was after midnight.
Tony Soprano: What are you, fuckin' stupid, huh?
%
Officer 1: You make this pizza?
Pizza Restaurant Owner: Who make-ah this pizza?
Officer 1: We're askin' you...
Officer 2: Is this your store logo sir?
Pizza Restaurant Owner: That's-a my box.
Officer 2: This pie was found at a crime scene.
Pizza Restaurant Owner: My pizza never hurt nobody.
Officer 2: Come again sir?
Pizza Restaurant Owner: You no find any bacteria in here!
Officer 2: Some kids broke in a Verbum Dei High School, broke things, they left 
this there.
Pizza Restaurant Owner: Now you tell me their names, I go put-ah my foot up-ah 
their ass.
%
Tony Soprano: Don't tell me you were happier when she was goin' out with that 
uh...Jamaal Ginsburg, the hasidic homeboy.
%
Silvio Dante: Tony, guess what we found in the bottom of the Christmas box.
Tony Soprano: Santa Outfit.
Silvio Dante: You guessed.
Tony Soprano: Burn the fuckin' thing.
Christopher Moltisanti: This is the first Christmas in history I remember him 
not bein' Santa.
Raymond Curto: Ahh...Big Pussy.
Paulie Walnuts: We were talkin' the other day about that fat piece o' shit. 
When he got back from Boca in Christmas in '95, how he wasn't himself.
Tony Soprano: What happened to uh...not wastin' your breath on the cocksucker?
Raymond Curto: Two faced fuck. To sell out your friends and save your own ass. 
It's despicable. That's one ride I would've loved ta been along on.
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah...me too.
Tony Soprano: Enough o' this shit. Put up the fuckin' decorations.
Silvio Dante: Well we still gotta find somebody ta play Santa. (everyone stares 
at Tony)
Tony Soprano: The fuck outta here.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: (Everyone looks at Bobby, Silvio points it out to Tony) What?!
Christopher Moltisanti: Ho fuckin' ho!
Tony Soprano: You're right. (to Silvio)
Bobby Baccilieri: What are you talkin' about?
Paulie Walnuts: You wanna play Santa Claus at the party this year?
Bobby Baccilieri: Nah...I can't do that.
Silvio Dante: Why not?
Bobby Baccilieri: I don't know. I don't know how.
Paulie Walnuts: Eh, what's to know. You ask 'em what they want for Christmas, 
you give 'em a nice toy, and that's the end of it.
Bobby Baccilieri: Nah...not me...I can't.
Paulie Walnuts: Yes you can.
Bobby Baccilieri: I can't.
Paulie Walnuts: Why not?
Bobby Baccilieri: I'm shy.
Paulie Walnuts: (angrily, to Bobby) The Boss o' this family told you you're 
gonna be Santa Claus. You're Santa Claus! So shut the fuck up about it.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Pussy...I loved that cocksucker like a brother and he fucked me 
in the ass.
%
Silvio Dante: One thing you gotta admit, he made a great Santa Claus.
Tony Soprano: He did.
Paulie Walnuts: In the end, fuck Santa Claus.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: (in Santa suit) You were just here.
Kid: I was not.
Bobby Baccilieri: Yeah you were. You were on my lap five minutes ago.
Kid: No, I wasn't.
Bobby Baccilieri: Yes you were. Now you're goin' on Santa's list and you're 
gettin' nothin'!
Kid: Fuck you, Santa.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Gimme your shoes. I can go get help.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck you. You're not leavin' me here.
Paulie Walnuts: You don't trust me?
Christopher Moltisanti: It's stupid. Pitch dark out there.
Paulie Walnuts: And what's your fuckin' plan? Eat ketchup packs?
Christopher Moltisanti: We shoulda stopped at Roy Rogers.
Paulie Walnuts: And I shoulda fucked Dale Evans, but I didn't!
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Could be him out there stalkin' us!
Paulie Walnuts: With what? His cock? Think about it Chrissy. Even if he's 
alive, he's unarmed and bleedin' like a sieve, he's in the woods, he's in his 
pajamas. It's the fuckin' Yukon out there.
Christopher Moltisanti: Probably thinks we left anyway.
Paulie Walnuts: If he's alive, which he ain't. What's that?
Christopher Moltisanti: Nathan's bag. Fuck, there's some ketchups and shit.
Paulie Walnuts: They clean?
Christopher Moltisanti: I don't know. They were in the bag. They're a little 
halfway frozen.
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck it. Gimme some. Not bad. Mix it with the relish.
%
Paulie Walnuts: You said yourself I hit 'im in the head. Fuckin' Rasputin this 
guy.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: One time we went huntin'. Saw a sign said 'Bear Left.' 
(pause) So we went home.
%
Paulie Walnuts: We were drivin' south and the sun's settin' there.
Christopher Moltisanti: What good's that do us?
Paulie Walnuts: At least we know what direction we're headed.
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah but we're still fuckin' lost.
Paulie Walnuts: We're not lost. Stop gettin' cunty.
%
Paulie Walnuts: You think we're diggin' a hole. That's right shithead, get to 
work. I know the ground's kind o' hard, but give it some o' that Siberian 
action.
Valery: Ya sech pubyuvyal sukye. (Cocksuckers, I'll kill you both)
Paulie Walnuts: Shut up!
Valery: Vishto davitzishtov na chaladna. (You think the cold bothers me?) 
No...dvam colodna. Amenya niet. (I wash my balls with ice water!) Ya payatsiev 
caladeeva deechadyeel. (This is warm.) Amerikozeh Sronye. (You American pieces 
of shit.) Poo! (Valery Spits)
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck's he sayin'?
Paulie Walnuts: Who gives a shit. Keep diggin'. Not that it matters now. We 
didn't come ta your house ta kill ya! That mouth o' yours. You gotta learn to 
shut the fuck up.
Christopher Moltisanti: So how far is it to Atlantic City? (Valery swings the 
shovel right into Chris's head and slams him hard. Then he hits Paulie with the 
other end of the shovel right in his stomach and runs off.)
%
Christopher Moltisanti: I think he's dyin'.
Paulie Walnuts: Must've cracked his windpipe. That's it fer him.
Christopher Moltisanti: What, are you a fuckin' doctor now? What're we gonna do?
%
Paulie Walnuts: Youre not gonna believe this. He killed sixteen 
Czechoslovakians. Guy was an interior decorator. (about Valery)
Christopher Moltisanti: His house looked like shit.
%
Paulie Walnuts: I can't believe it. I fuckin' loved that car.
Bobby Baccilieri: Probably kids or somethin'.
Christopher Moltisanti: What if it was the guy?
Tony Soprano: You got the money.
Paulie Walnuts: It was in the car.
Tony Soprano: It's all I asked you ta do Paulie.
Paulie Walnuts: Sorry T, it couldn't be helped. Guy fuckin' lunged at us. 
(Chris nods yes) Listen Ton, I know I fucked up, but-
Tony Soprano: It's okay, really. Just forget it.
Bobby Baccilieri: What do ya think? Wanna look fer this guy or what?
Tony Soprano: You tell me. Is it worth it?
Paulie Walnuts: I hit 'im in the head Ton. I saw it with my own eyes.
Tony Soprano: Is it possible this fuck made it outta here alive?
Bobby Baccilieri: It's hard to say. Flesh wound maybe. Head shot, I dunno. On 
the other hand, anything's possible.
Tony Soprano: You're a captain. What do you wanna do? (To Paulie)
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck it. Lets go home.
Tony Soprano: Alright. But lets be clear on this right now. This cocksucka 
crawls out from under a rock, he's your problem, not mine. You deal with Slava, 
you take the heat. You pay the price. Capice?
Paulie Walnuts: Fine.
%
Paulie Walnuts: (Chris pisses) Ohhhh!!! Do that by yer own window. (window 
pronounced windah) I don't wanna smell yer piss.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck you.
Paulie Walnuts: What'd you say?
Christopher Moltisanti: You heard me.
Paulie Walnuts: Dont make me pull rank on you kid.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck you, Paulie. Captain or no Captain, right now 
we're just two assholes lost in the woods.
Paulie Walnuts: Do yerself a favor, Chrissy and go back to fuckin' sleep.
Christopher Moltisanti: Why? So you can choke me?
Paulie Walnuts: What?
Christopher Moltisanti: Think I'm stupid. I heard ya on the phone tryin' ta 
blame this on me.
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck you talkin' about?
Christopher Moltisanti: You fucked up with the Russian prick, now you're 
worried about Tony. You wait till I'm asleep then you'll choke me so he'll just 
have your version.
Paulie Walnuts: Choke ya right now you fuck!!
Christopher Moltisanti: (Chris pulls his gun out) I'll leave you here you 
one-shoe cocksucker.
Paulie Walnuts: Put it down Chrissy.
Christopher Moltisanti: You know how fast I can run, I'll leave you in the 
fuckin' dust.
Paulie Walnuts: All the shit weve been through, you think Ill really kill 
you?
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah, I do. (Chris laughs and calms down)
Paulie Walnuts: Promise me you won't leave me here.
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm not gonna leave ya.
%
Dino Zerilli: Since we're kickin' up, we were hopin' you could, you know, watch 
our back?
Ralph Cifaretto: 350 buys you a hello. Watchin' your back...that's gonna 
require a little more initiative on your part.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: Tell me Romeo, now that ya moved back home, are you gonna be 
humpin' Tony Soprano's little girl on our couch?
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Fuck her. Tony, too, with his stay-in-school bullshit. He 
coulda reached out to somebody at Rutgers.
Ralph Cifaretto: He should break the Dean's legs 'cause you're too lazy ta read 
a fuckin' book?
%
Patsy Parisi: What's a matter, you don't like me?
Gloria Trillo: Look, I'm not back in ten minutes, they call the cops, standard 
operating procedure.
Patsy Parisi: (pulls out his gun) Here's some standard operating procedure. 
Stay the fuck away from Tony Soprano, shut the fuck up and listen. It's over. 
Capice? Over and done. You call, or go anywhere near him or his family and 
they'll be scraping your nipples off these fine leather seats. And here's the 
point to remember: my face is the last one you'll see, not Tony's...we 
understand each other? It won't be cinematic.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: There was this old, old moustache named Feech La Manna. Now 
what the hell Feech meant, who the fuck knows, but he was made on the other 
side, so you know, he was an original.
Dino Zerilli: He was an O.G.!
Ralph Cifaretto: Whatever.
%
Pizza Restaurant Owner: Guys, if you're gonna smoke, take it outside. (Spanish 
customers ignore the owner)
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Fuck's the matter? You don't speak English?
Spanish Customer 1: Who the fuck are you?
Dino Zerilli: The owner's a dear friend of ours, that should be enough for you.
Spanish Customer 2: Fuck him too! (Dino slaps the shit out of the 2nd Spanish 
customer)
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: What'd you fuckin' say! (pulls out a gun)
Spanish Customer 3: Whoah...Whoah! Chill Chill!!
Spanish Customer 1: Relax!!!
Pizza Restaurant Owner: Jackie...what are ya doin'?!
Dino Zerilli: It's alright, its under control.
Jackie Aprile, Jr.: Go find a fuckin' Taco Bell before I cap your asses.
Dino Zerilli: The fuck outta here!!!
%
Tony Soprano: I tell ya one thing though, I'm not gonna make the same mistake 
with AJ. He got expelled. Him we're sendin' to military school.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You know, we never discussed exactly what you want for your 
children.
Tony Soprano: I don't want 'em to end up in Boonton with their face blown off...
%
Kelli Aprile: My brother's whole stupid pathetic dream was to follow in our 
father's footsteps. What, I got to paint a picture? He was killed by some fat 
fuck in see-through socks. Take your pick, they all look alike.
%
Paulie Walnuts: You're late.
Ralph Cifaretto: Well, tomorrow I could be on time, but you'll be stupid 
forever.
%
Paulie Walnuts: I can't believe this!
Ralph Cifaretto: Why not? Last year, you believed a flyin' saucer was over East 
Rutherford.
%
Carmela Soprano: You wanna train him to be a professional killer?
Tony Soprano: Oh will you stop! They're soldiers. And the United States Army 
hardly ever goes to war anymore.
Carmela Soprano: They were marching with rifles, Tony.
Tony Soprano: The barrels are plugged! They're symbolic!
Carmela Soprano: Symbolic of what?
Tony Soprano: Respect!
Carmela Soprano: He will be subjected to the discipline of kids hardly older 
than himself. Does that seem smart? Boys his age still kill frogs and small 
animals.
Tony Soprano: The Cusamano's Binky? The cherry bomb with the nails in it, you 
think it was AJ?
Carmela Soprano: No, that is what I'm trying to tell you. He is still a child. 
He's a normal child. He's made some mistakes. God knows, he's got a shitload to 
learn about life. That does not mean that I'm gonna let you send him to the 
type of school whose whole reason for being is to make him follow orders by 
instilling fear.
Tony Soprano: He thinks the world owes him a fuckin' livin'.
Carmela Soprano: What could've given him that bizarre idea?
Tony Soprano: We tried it your way for fifteen years now, with Berry Brazel to 
validatin' his feelings and that fuckin' school did the same thing and what a 
surprise. He thinks the world runs on his feelings! Well, he's gonna go learn 
to be a man.
Carmela Soprano: I will not send him to that place.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: World really went downhill after the World Trade Center. You 
know, Quasimodo predicted all of this.
Tony Soprano: Who did what?
Bobby Baccilieri: All these problems, the middle east. The end o' the world.
Tony Soprano: Nostradamus. Quasimodo's the hunchback of Notre Dame.
Bobby Baccilieri: Oh, right. Notredamus.
Tony Soprano: Nostradamus and Notre Dame, that's two different things 
completely.
Bobby Baccilieri: It's interesting though they'd be so similar, isn't it? And I 
always thought, "OK, Hunchback of Notre Dame. You also got your quarterback and 
your halfback of Notre Dame".
Tony Soprano: One's a fucking cathedral!
Bobby Baccilieri: Obviously, I know. I'm just sayin'. It's interesting, the 
coincidence. What, you're gonna tell me you never pondered that? The back thing 
with Notre Dame?
Tony Soprano: No!
%
Murf Lupo: We had a little scare. Thought it was a shunt in his heart, he 
passed some gas. He seems better. (about Uncle Junior)
Uncle Junior: Why don't you go on Joe Franklin, tell the whole tri-state area.
%
Carmela Soprano: There is no reason you shouldn't be able to pass Social 
Studies.
Tony Soprano: You passin' Social Studies?
Anthony Junior: You just revealed your own ignorance...it's only been five 
days, we didn't get grades yet.
Tony Soprano: I what? I reveal my own what? (Tony smacks AJ in the back of the 
head)
%
Christopher Moltisanti: (about Tony) Fuckin' asshole. Ever since I questioned 
his judgment on some Ralphie-Jackie Jr. problem. Like he's fuckin' infallible. 
Pope Tony the twenty third or some shit.
%
Tony Soprano: And I provide for my children.
Carmela Soprano: Yes, Tony. You do. But I don't know how you do it, because you 
won't tell me. Well, let me tell you something, or you can watch the fucking 
news...everything comes to an end.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: I hear Ginny Sack's getting a ninety five pound mole taken off 
her ass.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: So I was thinkin' right...what we do is start our own 
group. I'll be the singer and you two can back me up.
Danielle: Yeah right...ha ha ha...
Adriana La Cerva: Puh-lease!!
Christopher Moltisanti: What?!! It's so hard to rap? Mah bitch. Mah Ho. Mah Ho. 
Mah bitch. Mah bitch bitch. What? A joke? You don't wanna back me up?
%
Tony Soprano: So how's yer love life?
Janice Soprano: Why don't you mind your goddamn business?
Tony Soprano: I don't know, it kinda feels like it is my business considerin' I 
had to haul your last boyfriend outta your kitchen in a hefty bag.
Janice Soprano: You're a miserable fuck. You know that? You're just like Ma.
Tony Soprano: Oh yeah?
Janice Soprano: Yeah really, with your condescension and your sabotage. For 
your information, Ralph is a great guy.
Tony Soprano: Trust me, I got more information than I need about Ralphie.
Janice Soprano: Well it's always something, Tony. What are you, threatened by 
the fact that he has a sense of style?
Tony Soprano: Oh a sense of style?
Janice Soprano: Ralph Lauren? Collegiate?
Tony Soprano: Let me ask you a question Janice, do I know this guy better than 
you? Cause I'm tellin' you, he's no fuckin' good.
Janice Soprano: My happiness really drives you crazy, doesn't it, Tony?
%
Little Paulie Germani: Ralph told this funny fuckin' joke though at umm..at 
Albert's party. He goes, "Ginny Sack had a ninety five pound mole surgically 
taken off her ass."
Paulie Walnuts: He said that?
Little Paulie Germani: Yeah...
Paulie Walnuts: And you think its funny?
Little Paulie Germani: Uh...it's some bad taste...huh?
%
Christopher Moltisanti: And don't think I forgot about you goin' through my 
fuckin' fiance's underwear drawer.
Patsy Parisi: That wasn't me you fucking jerk!
%
Native American Protestor: Mussolini was Hitler's bitch!!!
%
Ralph Cifaretto: You need a lot right now, and I don't think there's anything I 
can do.
Rosalie Aprile: You can be there for me. You can comfort me.
Ralph Cifaretto: What about me? What do I get out of it?
Rosalie Aprile: There it is. Right there. What do you get! How 'bout yer every 
need taken care of sexually, everything. All yer shit! It's all about you, 
isn't it?!!!
Ralph Cifaretto: It's not all about me, but I mean...let's be realistic.
Rosalie Aprile: Let's be realistic?! What, you wanna leave me?
Ralph Cifaretto: (pause) yeah...
Rosalie Aprile: Then get the fuck out!!!
Ralph Cifaretto: It doesn't have to be like this.
Rosalie Aprile: How should it be, huh? How the fuck should it be?! (Ralph 
leaves)
%
Carmela Soprano: He was a victim of his time.
Anthony Junior: Who cares? It's what he did.
Tony Soprano: He discovered America is what he did. He was a brave Italian 
explorer. And in this house, Christopher Columbus is a hero. End of story.
%
Reuben 'The Cuban': Christopher Columbus was no better than Hitler.
Hesh Rabkin: Hey...whoah...whoah..whoah...whoah. Back up. Hitler?
Reuben 'The Cuban': Yeah. I'm not the only one who thinks so.
Silvio Dante: Yeah that Indian..uh..from the protest was whinin' about the 
wilderness, they had him on TV and he called Columbus Hitler.
Reuben 'The Cuban': 'Coz its true man.
Hesh Rabkin: You're talkin' outta your ass. Columbus and Hitler? You're 
trivializing the Holocaust. Frankly, Reuben, if you've got that kind of covert 
anti-semitism, I'd like you to leave my house.
Reuben 'The Cuban': Anti-semitism?
Hesh Rabkin: That's right.
Reuben 'The Cuban': Fuck you too ma man!
%
Janice Soprano: How much money did you make today, slut?
Ralph Cifaretto: three hundred.
Janice Soprano: That's all bitch? Oh, I'm gonna put you back on the street ho, 
make you work that ass.
Ralph Cifaretto: Put me back on the street baby, yeah.
Janice Soprano: Work that ass you little cunt.
Ralph Cifaretto: You work it baby.
Janice Soprano: Mommy's little tramp. Mommy's little Whore. Pimp you out bitch.
%
Johnny Sack: I want you to sanction a hit on Ralph Cifaretto.
Carmine Lupertazzi: What, you fuckin' kiddin' me?
Johnny Sack: He violated my wife's honor.
Carmine Lupertazzi: Ralph slept with Ginny?
Johnny Sack: He insulted her. He made a very insensitive joke about her body to 
some friends of ours.
Carmine Lupertazzi: What did he say?
Johnny Sack: I have to repeat it? My word's not good enough?
Carmine Lupertazzi: Not if you want him clipped over it.
Johnny Sack: He said she was havin' a 90 pound mole removed from her ass. The 
implication was that her ass is so big, she can have a mole that size removed 
from it.
Carmine Lupertazzi: It's an off-color remark; it was highly inappropriate. You 
want, I'll demand he's taxed. But clip him? (shakes his head no)
Johnny Sack: Is, is it all just about money?
Carmine Lupertazzi: I'll crack him good. I'll ask for two hundred grand.
Johnny Sack: Two hundred grand for insulting my wife? What's next Carmine, he 
get to fuck her for a million?
Carmine Lupertazzi: He wants to fuck her?
Johnny Sack: I'm making a point, I'm talkin' about my wife's honor here, my 
honor.
Carmine Lupertazzi: We depend on this guy. There are millions of dollars at 
stake. We can't afford it John.
Johnny Sack: A room full of guys making fun of my wife and you're not gonna let 
me deal with this?
Carmine Lupertazzi: Not that way. My answer's gotta be no.
Johnny Sack: I want a sit down then with Ralph, fucking thief. Get this 
Fernandez paving bullshit dealt with.
%
Tony Soprano: Twenty years I've been friends with John. Now he's gotta go.
Christopher Moltisanti: All over a stupid joke.
Ralph Cifaretto: I was fuckin' around. Fer chrissakes, you never made a joke 
about Ginny Sack?
Silvio Dante: Not like that.
Tony Soprano: Of course not!
Ralph Cifaretto: Yeah, well fuck him and his high-fillutin' bullshit. Who does 
he think he is? Sir Walter Raleigh?
%
Ralph Cifaretto: You know what that crazy bitch was into?
Eugene Pontecorvo: What?
Vito Spatafore: What?
Ralph Cifaretto: She wanted to stick a dildo up my ass, make believe she was 
pimpin' me out. I told her get the fuck outta here.
Eugene Pontecorvo: Hehehe... (laughing)
Vito Spatafore: The fuck?! (laughing)
Ralph Cifaretto: Whole family's nuts.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: (on phone) Yeah. John, it's me.
Johnny Sack: (on phone) And?
Ralph Cifaretto: And I'm calling to tell you how appalled I am. I just got 
back. I talked to Tony. I love Ginny. I would never say anything like that.
Johnny Sack: That's not what I heard.
Ralph Cifaretto: From who John?
Johnny Sack: I don't betray confidences Ralphie. Denyin' you said it?
Ralph Cifaretto: Fuck yes, I'm denyin' I said it.
Johnny Sack: I don't believe you.
Ralph Cifaretto: Just...just tell me who said this. I'll put a bullet in their 
fuckin' eye.
Johnny Sack: You're a real weasel you know that?
Ralph Cifaretto: John, please. Look. Last year, when Tony and I had our, our 
thing, that misunderstanding, you were the voice of reason. You were the one 
that told me to apologize.
Johnny Sack: Oh, so you're apologizing?
Ralph Cifaretto: If that's what it takes.
Johnny Sack: Why would you apologize? I thought you didn't say it.
Ralph Cifaretto: I didn't say it.
Johnny Sack: You know somethin' Ralph, not only are you a thief, you're a lying 
fucking prick. I should've let Tony chop your head off a year ago.
%
Johnny Sack: He's got a bad history Tony. Cute cocksucker could wind up dead.
Tony Soprano: What are you sayin' here?
Johnny Sack: He's a two faced fucking prick.
Tony Soprano: I thought Ralph was your friend.
Johnny Sack: Right. That's rich. Did you hear what my friend said about my 
wife? Made a crack about Ginny's weight. Something about her havin' a ninety 
pound mole on her ass.
Tony Soprano: Well that's uh...that's deplorable. Who told you this?
Johnny Sack: What's important was that it was said.
Tony Soprano: Well if he did say it, I didn't hear it. Cause he knows better 
than to make a remark like that when I'm around.
%
Carmela Soprano: You bought a racehorse?
Tony Soprano: No, I didn't buy it.
Carmela Soprano: It followed you home?
%
Adriana La Cerva: Let's be honest. What's our future here, Christopher? 
You...you could end up in jail or something horrible could happen.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuckin' negative shit. Stop with that.
Adriana La Cerva: Somebody could have it in for you. You wouldn't know.
Christopher Moltisanti: Who?!
Adriana La Cerva: I don't know.
Christopher Moltisanti: What the fuck kind of shit is this? Who told you that?
Adriana La Cerva: Nobody.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuckin' negative shit coming out of your mouth! I had 
that fuckin' bird watching me when I got made. I'm already under a 
what-do-you-call-it, possibly. So stop with that.
Adriana La Cerva: I worry about you, that's all. I love you so much.
Christopher Moltisanti: So if you love me, stir my eggs okay?
%
Janice Soprano: Bobby...my uncle loves you. He needs you. So you're gonna get 
up tomorrow morning, and you're gonna get dressed. And you're gonna get in that 
car and you're gonna do what needs to be done, aren't you?
%
Bobby Baccilieri: You're Teddy Genaretti, aren't ya? The shop steward for local 
one eighty four?
Teddy Genaretti: Guilty. You a joint fitter?
Bartender: What can I get you?
Bobby Baccilieri: Wild Turkey neat. I saw your Caravan in the lot. It's a nice 
car for a family.
Teddy Genaretti: Do I know you?
Bobby Baccilieri: Jim Blake.
Teddy Genaretti: What local you in?
Bobby Baccilieri: Bad back. It's just that I follow these things, you know, 
this election coming up. Dick Hoffman for president? I heard he's got one 
eighty four's vote. I think it's a mistake.
Teddy Genaretti: Pension's been ripped off for the last twenty five years.
Bobby Baccilieri: Hey, I'm sure you guys got grievances, but Dick Hoffman? What 
do you owe this guy? It's all talk. He's out of touch with reality, Dick. You 
think if push came to shove he'd give a fuck about you?
Teddy Genaretti: I know what you're trying to do.
Bobby Baccilieri: You look like a smart guy. I can see why your local puts 
their faith in you to do the right thing. I'm just saying, if it was me? I got 
kids that depend on me, like yourself. And to waste my votes on somebody like 
Dick Hoffman? I might as well put a bullet in my head, here, here and here. 
(pointing at his head)
%
Agent Dwight Harris: Here's what's problematic. You don't even know where your 
boyfriend is half the time, so how do you know if he's in trouble or not? He's 
into heroin, organized crime, he's associating with some very dangerous 
people...not to mention Tony Soprano himself.
Adriana La Cerva: See, that's where you're wrong. Tony would never let anything 
happen to Christopher. They're cousins, he loves him.
Agent Robyn Sanseverino: He loved Pussy Bonpensiero. What happened to him?
Adriana La Cerva: He went in the Witness Protection program.
Agent Robyn Sanseverino: Dwight? He went into the program? You know anything 
about that?
Agent Dwight Harris: No.
Agent Robyn Sanseverino: I think we would've heard. And your uncle Richie, I 
suppose he's in the program, too.
Adriana La Cerva: He is. Isn't he?
%
Tony Soprano: Did you ever know anybody that uh...ever committed suicide?
Janice Soprano: Plenty. I used to live in Seattle, Tony.
%
Artie Bucco: The cobwebs are now removed.
Tony Soprano: The fuck are ya talkin' about?!
Artie Bucco: You saw this whole thing, didn't you? You knew exactly what was 
gonna happen. You can see twenty moves down the road. Please...I don't blame 
you, I envy you. It's like an instinct, like a hawk sees a little mouse movin' 
around a corn field from a mile up.
Tony Soprano: You think it's my fault you're fuckin' lyin' in here?
Artie Bucco: It's just that somebody mentions fifty grand, to bankroll a French 
digestif, and your mind goes through all the permutations at like, internet 
speed and realizes, "Oh, worst case scenario, I eat for free."
Tony Soprano: You fuckin' suicide. You're disgraceful!
Artie Bucco: I'm sorry.
Tony Soprano: Nah, fuck that!!! Does anybody else know it was me that loaned 
you the money?
Artie Bucco: Like who?
Tony Soprano: Like who? I don't give a fuck who. Adriana, Father Intintola, my 
wife...anybody? (Artie nods no) Alright...ya...ya...ya got mugged. Outside o' 
yer house. It was a street crime. Kids, they took yer wallet and yer watch. 
Where are they?
Artie Bucco: Why?
Tony Soprano: Come on! (Tony takes Artie's belongings) Why? You don't care what 
people think. Well, I do. Enough people hate me! You fought back. They ripped 
yer earrin' outta yer ear, you were bleedin', you went inside yer house, 
you...you took a bunch o' pills to kill the pain 'cuz you knew you'd have to 
wait at the emergency room for a couple o' hours.
Artie Bucco: Ton', they pumped my stomach, they saw the Armagnac.
Tony Soprano: You got fuckin' mugged. Do you understand me? I didn't loan you 
shit!
%
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Oh...it's you. Hello. Come in.
Artie Bucco: Jean-Philippe, yer home. Qu'est-ce que c'est, man? Message machine 
broken?
Jean-Philippe Colbert: l'm sorry, I...l've been wishing to call you...I...
Artie Bucco: Nice crib. You were supposed to give me my money two days ago.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: I know. Credit Lyonnais, they didn't come through with 
the second round of financing yet. My partners are sick about it.
Artie Bucco: Well, that's not my problem Jean-Philippe, I want my money.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: I just told you. I don't have it.
Artie Bucco: Well, when are you gonna get it?
Jean-Philippe Colbert: I don't know okay. I don't know. Doesn't look too good.
Artie Bucco: Whoah...whoah...whoah...whoah...what does that...what does that 
mean?!
Jean-Philippe Colbert: I mean, I don't know if its going to happen alright. 
They...they were not convinced we are a business model. They didn't agree there 
was as much potential for Armagnac. The problem has been it seems that people 
cannot figure out how to market Armagnac. The hip approach like with Stoli, 
fails.
Artie Bucco: You said it was the next vodka!!!
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Hey, so we are big boys, we must move on.
Artie Bucco: Frog eatin' fuckin' faggia di cazz'.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: What did you say?
Artie Bucco: I said I want my money!!
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Are you stupid? That money spent. Operating expenses, 
notaires, travel.
Artie Bucco: No. You have my fifty thousand dollars.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: It's business. It's a risk.
Artie Bucco: I have a daughter who needs braces.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Listen to me, I don't have it right now.
Artie Bucco: You fuckin' French fuckin' lyin' cocksucka!!! (Artie starts to 
fight with Jean-Philippe)
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Fuck to your mother! Sale rital... (Jean-Philippe rips 
off Artie's earring)
Artie Bucco: My earrin'!! You ripped my fuckin' ear!
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Du con.
Artie Bucco: Ow! I want my money.
Jean-Philippe Colbert: Fuck you. If I see you again, I'll kill you. 
(Jean-Philippe throws Artie out.)
%
Artie Bucco: (Talking to himself in the mirror) Oh! Jean-Philippe! Yer home. I 
called ya five times. Qu'est-ce Que C'est?...Message machine broken? Nice crib. 
Whazzat uh...Berber carpet? Those, uh... fuckin' shoes you wear, what are they, 
uh... designer? Hmm? You fuckin' avoiding' me mother fucker? Wheres my 
money? Oh, what are you gonna cry now, Huh? Stand up you frogeating Faccia 
de Gatz'. I will fuck you up!
%
Tony Soprano: So, over the next couple of years, more and more, I'm gonna be 
givin' my orders through you and then finally...only through you.
Christopher Moltisanti: But what about Sil, you got that with him...and Paulie.
Tony Soprano: Those other guys, Sil...Paulie, there's one thing they're 
not...they're not my blood. You hear what I'm sayin' to you. It's a matter of 
trust.
Christopher Moltisanti: It's very wise
%
Assemblyman Ronald Zellman: The heart wants what the heart wants I guess.
Tony Soprano: Heart also wants what the dick wants.
%
Vito Spatafore: What can I get you Paulie?
Paulie Walnuts: After four months inside? How 'bout laid?
%
Silvio Dante: Oh! It's Papillon. (To Paulie)
Paulie Walnuts: Oh, hello Sil! How are ya?
Christopher Moltisanti: I heard you were gettin' laid up there all the time.
Paulie Walnuts: Come here, you little prick. Hello, Chrissy. (Paulie hugs Chris)
%
Adriana La Cerva: What if we didn't have kids?
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck that. What's the point of bein' married?
Adriana La Cerva: I mean, what if we can't? If I can't...would you still love 
me?
Christopher Moltisanti: 'Course I'd still love ya...why?
Adriana La Cerva: There's something you should know. A long time ago, years 
ago, I had a medical procedure. It was before we met. My uterus got pierced.
Christopher Moltisanti: Both of 'em?
Adriana La Cerva: There's only one. That's ovaries.
Christopher Moltisanti: So, what does that mean, you can't get pregnant?
Adriana La Cerva: Well, my doctor said it might be hard. A friend of mine gave 
me the name of a specialist in Manhattan.
Christopher Moltisanti: You knew you were damaged goods and you never fuckin' 
told me!?
Adriana La Cerva: How could you call me that?
Christopher Moltisanti: Jesus fuckin' Christ, how could ya lie to me like that!
Adriana La Cerva: I tried to tell you once. I wanted to. I was afraid that you 
wouldn't propose.
Christopher Moltisanti: You don't get it, Adriana, I don't have a son, the 
Moltisanti name ends, that's it!
Adriana La Cerva: We could adopt.
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah, that's great! Some kid with chinky eyes called 
Moltisanti! He'd get his ass kicked every day!
Adriana La Cerva: You said you'd still love me.
Christopher Moltisanti: That doesn't mean I'll fuckin' marry you!
%
Assemblyman Ronald Zellman: Tony! What's goin' on? What's up? (Tony removes his 
belt) Look, why don't you just calm down and...
Tony Soprano: I'm perfectly calm.
Assemblyman Ronald Zellman: Well, we can talk about whatever is botherin' you.
Tony Soprano: Yeah?
Assemblyman Ronald Zellman: Tony, this is crazy... ah, Tony, Tony! (Tony beats 
Zellman with his belt) Come on...fuck!
Irina Peltsin: Tony, no!
Assemblyman Ronald Zellman: Ow! Tony, ow, Tony! Ow!
Tony Soprano: All the girls in New Jersey, you had ta fuck this one? Go ahead, 
cry like a bitch.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: I like my drinks with extra olives. You should know how your 
regular customers like their drinks.
Adriana La Cerva: My regular customers are the ones who pay.
%
Janice Soprano: Three thousand dollars.
Tony Soprano: How'd you come up with that figure?
Janice Soprano: It's a number that I thought you'd say yes to.
Tony Soprano: You thought right.
Janice Soprano: So, what have you heard?
Tony Soprano: You pay me three thousand dollars, I'll answer your questions.
Janice Soprano: He bottoms from the top.
Tony Soprano: I don't even know what that means...
Janice Soprano: Means...he has to control things but he pretends he doesn't. 
Like he'd make me fuck him with a strap on and call him my bitch...shit like 
that.
Tony Soprano: What about plain old fuckin'?
Janice Soprano: I'm tellin' you, he can't get hard that way, and if he could, I 
don't think that he'd want to.
%
Valentina La Paz: Like last night, I just wanted him to fuck me, just so I 
could get back at you, but all he wanted me to do was drip candle wax on his 
balls and then he went into the bathroom and jerked himself off...now I don't 
call that having sex with someone.
%
Valentina La Paz: Besides, it's good luck.
Ralph Cifaretto: What?
Valentina La Paz: It's good luck to step in horse shit. Ask any horse person.
Lois Pettit: It's true.
Ralph Cifaretto: Then why aren't you people walkin' around all day lookin' for 
piles o' horse shit to stomp around in?
Lois Pettit: It only works if it's an accident.
Ralph Cifaretto: Fuckin' sick, all o' yous. Fucko, where's the hose?
%
Paulie Walnuts: I don't understand. When I was a kid, you two were old ladies. 
Now I'm old, and you two are still old.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: (on phone) Mrs. Marianucci Gaultieri?
Nucci Gaultieri: (on phone) Yes?
Ralph Cifaretto: Hi, this is Detective Mike Hunt, Beaver Falls, Pennsylvania 
police department. You have a son Peter Paul?
Nucci Gaultieri: Oh, my God! What happened?
Ralph Cifaretto: He's alright, ma'am, but I'm afraid he's in a little trouble. 
We found him in a public men's room in Lafayette Park. I don't know how to put 
this delicately...he was sucking a cub scout's dick.
Nucci Gaultieri: What? No, it's a mistake.
Ralph Cifaretto: Ma'am, I wish that was all, uh, but I'm afraid we had to have 
emergency surgery performed upon arrival at headquarters, after discovery of a 
small rodent in the rectal passage.
Nucci Gaultieri: OH, MY GOD!
Ralph Cifaretto: A gerbil, ma'am. Uh, the county does not cover medical 
procedures deemed caused by criminal sexual activity. Section four, paragraph 
fifteen. We'll need an insurance number.
Nucci Gaultieri: Oh, Madonn'! I have Blue Cross, Blue Shield. Is that all right?
Ralph Cifaretto: Ma...Ma'am, c-could you hold on for one second, I have the 
hospital on the other line. (Ralph hangs up and laughs)
%
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ, you did it! You cooked that fuckin' horse alive!!!
Ralph Cifaretto: No, I did not! But so what?!
Tony Soprano: So what?!
Ralph Cifaretto: It was a fuckin' animal! A hundred grand a piece. My kid's in 
the fuckin' hospital! I don't hear you complainin' when I bring you a nice fat 
envelope. You don't give a shit where that comes from! Don't give me that look. 
It was a fuckin' horse! What are you, a vegetarian? You eat beef and sausage by 
the fuckin' carload.
%
Ralph Cifaretto: Hadda be Paulie told Johnny...
Eugene Pontecorvo: You think so?
Ralph Cifaretto: He hates my success...thinkin' about that birthday 
dinner...who was there when I told the Ginny Sack joke?
Vito Spatafore: Not Paulie. I remember Albert sayin' he didn't get a gift.
Ralph Cifaretto: It was little Paulie, the witless fuckin' nephew. He told 
Paulie, Paulie tells Johnny. Fuckin' telephone game like high-school girls! 
Wanna play phone games? That party was the only time I ever mentioned Shamu's 
fat ass.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: (shocked at Ralph's wig) Ahhh! Holy shit! I had no 
idea. Did you?
Tony Soprano: 'Course I did. You're so high on scag, you wouldn't know if he 
had your mother's muff on his head.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: (about Ralph) That poor fuckin' guy...
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck him and his alligator tears.
Tony Soprano: Paulie, his kid's in the hospital. A little fuckin' sympathy, huh?
Paulie Walnuts: That gives him a pass? I don't care if he's got a hundred kids 
in the ICU with arrows in their heads...he's a piece o' shit. You know it, and 
I know it.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm sorry T-
Tony Soprano: Shut the fuck up and listen ta me. You're my nephew Christopher 
and I love you, and that's the only reason you're alive right now. If it were 
anybody else, anybody, they woulda had their fuckin' intervention right through 
the back o' their head.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: What the fuck! What's goin' on?
Tony Soprano: Have a seat.
Dominic Palladino: Christopher, hey! I'm Dominic. I know you don't know me, but 
uh...
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah, you're the guy who...uh broke into Stew Leonard's 
that time, you stole all those pork loins.
Dominic Palladino: Yeah, but that's not why I'm here today. Christopher, we're 
here to talk about your drug problem.
Christopher Moltisanti: What?! Jesus Christ, you fuckin' kiddin' me!?
Adriana La Cerva: Sorry, baby, please.
Christopher Moltisanti: No, fuck this shit.
Paulie Walnuts: You been told once...now sit down!
Tony Soprano: Sit down!
Christopher Moltisanti: Ma!? Jesus!
Dominic Palladino: Christopher, this won't be easy for any of us, but I want 
you to know that we're here today because we care about you.
Christopher Moltisanti: What was this, your idea?
Dominic Palladino: All we ask is that you listen. Adriana, you wanna begin?
Adriana La Cerva: Christopher, I love you very much, my only dream is that we 
have a happy life together. The last few months things have got very bad with 
us because of you using drugs all the time. Yer high all the time and I can't 
take it.
Dominic Palladino: Be specific hon.
Adriana La Cerva: When we first started goin' out, we made love all the time, 
now because of the drugs-
Christopher Moltisanti: Jesus, is this fuckin' necessary?
Dominic Palladino: Go ahead Adriana.
Adriana La Cerva: You can no longer function as a man. Last week when I came 
home to learn that you had killed our dog, that was the final straw.
Tony Soprano: Whoah...whoah...whoah...whoah...whoah...whoah...you killed the 
dog? What'd you do that for?
Christopher Moltisanti: It was an accident.
Paulie Walnuts: What was it, barkin'?
Adriana La Cerva: He sat on it while he was high. (crying)
Tony Soprano: Ah, Jesus Christ!!!
Christopher Moltisanti: I fell asleep...she got suffocated or somethin'.
Dominic Palladino: Are you done Adriana? Alright. Silvio.
Tony Soprano: You killed little Cosette! I oughta suffocate you, you little 
prick!!!
Dominic Palladino: Tony, we're going in order, Silvio.
Silvio Dante: When I came in to open up one morning, there you were with your 
head half in the toilet. Your hair was in the toilet water. Disgusting.
Christopher Moltisanti: I told you I had the flu!
Silvio Dante: I said my piece Chrissy!
Christopher Moltisanti: Great! I can't even defend myself now?
Dominic Palladino: No one's attacking you Chris.
Tony Soprano: Look, it doesn't change anything! But I can verify that he was 
sick for a little while. Still, this thing with the dog. How could you not see 
it on a chair?!!!
Dominic Palladino: You're getting emotional Tony.
Tony Soprano: That's 'cuz I know what it's like to lose a pet!
Carmela Soprano: I happen to know that you were high at my mother in law's 
wake. You were talking nonstop for twenty minutes...nothing but gibberish.
Tony Soprano: My mother's wake! Jesus Christ...
Dominic Palladino: Paul. You wanna read your statement?
Paulie Walnuts: I don't write nuthin' down, so I'll keep this short and sweet. 
You're weak, you're outta control, and you've become an embarrassment to 
yerself and everybody else.
Christopher Moltisanti: Ho ho!! Listen ta you!
Dominic Palladino: Guys, guys! whoah...whoah..whoah...we said...non-judgmental.
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck that! Let 'im take his medicine!
Christopher Moltisanti: Seriously Paulie, you wanna talk about fuckin' up?
Paulie Walnuts: Watch it Chrissy!
Christopher Moltisanti: What, I thought we're bein' honest here! You got some 
balls you know that? All o' you. You wanna talk about self control. How 'bout 
you Sil? Fuckin' every slut you got workin' in the place when you got a wife 
and kids at home?
Dominic Palladino: Guys, guys!! Whoah...whoah!
Adriana La Cerva: Christopher!!!
Christopher Moltisanti: Or you Paulie!! Yeah, remember last winter in the woods 
with the Russian guy...
Tony Soprano: Christopher, I am fuckin' warnin' you!!!
Christopher Moltisanti: There he goes, Mr. Type "A" Personality!
Tony Soprano: We are here to talk about you killing yourself with drugs, not my 
fuckin' personality!
Dominic Palladino: That's right...
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm gonna kill myself?! The way you fuckin' eat, you're 
gonna have a heart attack by the time yer fifty! (Paulie gets up and grabs 
Chris by the shirt)
Dominic Palladino: Paulie, sit down...
Paulie Walnuts: You're talkin' to the boss here!
Joanne Moltisanti: Good, maybe someone will smack some goddamn sense into 'im?
Christopher Moltisanti: Great, my own mother. Fuck you, ya fuckin' whore! 
(Paulie punches Chris in the face slamming him into the ground and Silvio and 
Benny beat up on Christopher while he is on the floor)
%
Uncle Junior: Me with the competency hearings, you with the head shrinkers, 
this one in rehab now.
%
Drug Dealer: Whaddya want around here?
Christopher Moltisanti: Can you do an eighth of scag?
Drug Dealer: Five hundred.
Christopher Moltisanti: Alright, wrap it up.
Drug Dealer: (pulls his gun out) The fuck out the car bitch!
Christopher Moltisanti: Motherfucka! You know who I am?
Thug: Who the fuck is this?
Christopher Moltisanti: Do you know who the fuck I'm with?
Drug Dealer: You ain't no fuckin' cop, that's fer sure.
Thug: Ha ha. (One thug pulls Chris's gun away from him and another thug jacks 
Chris's car)
Drug Dealer: Fuck you gonna do with that bitch?
Christopher Moltisanti: Stick it up your mother's twat!
%
Adriana La Cerva: Where's the dog? Oh my God. Cosette?
Christopher Moltisanti: What?
Adriana La Cerva: Christopher, she's not breathing...her neck feels broken.
Christopher Moltisanti: The fuck?
Adriana La Cerva: Oh my God! She's dead.
Christopher Moltisanti: I fell asleep.
Adriana La Cerva: What?
Christopher Moltisanti: She musta crawled under there fer warmth.
Adriana La Cerva: Are you fuckin' crazy? You fuckin' killed her.
Christopher Moltisanti: I didn't kill her. I musta sat on her.
Adriana La Cerva: Oh Jesus, Oh my poor baby.
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm sorry, it was an accident fer chrissake. How long 
I've been sayin' she shouldn't be on the furniture.
Adriana La Cerva: It's 'cuz you were fuckin' high Christopher. You and your 
fuckin' smack fuck lifestyle.
Christopher Moltisanti: I'll get you another dog.
Adriana La Cerva: I don't want another dog.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: Got home tonight, kids were kind o' quiet. Then bedtime, all 
hell broke loose, cryin', wouldn't be left alone! Sophia especially. They've 
been playin' with that goddamn Ouija board again.
Janice Soprano: Oh no.
Bobby Baccilieri: They've been tryin' to contact Karen. What?
Janice Soprano: I don't know what to say Bobby. I came over this afternoon with 
some pound cake.
Bobby Baccilieri: I saw it.
Janice Soprano: I heard them in his room with that Ouija board...I 
thought...this is not good. But then after the other night, I didn't wanna 
overstep my bounds.
Bobby Baccilieri: It's my fault.
Janice Soprano: Hey, you're under a lot of stress. You're a single dad.
Bobby Baccilieri: No, you were right...it's bad for them, it's unwholesome.
Janice Soprano: You want me to go up?
Bobby Baccilieri: I think they're asleep. Finally. I had to read to Sophia for 
like, an hour. She couldn't even handle a "Nancy Drew." It was too mysterious.
%
Carmela Soprano: You know how much little Bobby likes you.
Anthony Junior: What am I, daycare?
%
Janice Soprano: You went to the cemetery today, didn't you?
Bobby Baccilieri: How do you know?
Janice Soprano: 'Cuz you got cemetery mud on your shoes.
Bobby Baccilieri: Mud? What are you, Marge Higenbrinder now? What do you know 
about the mud? You been spyin' on me? What, I can't go to the cemetery? I gotta 
get permission from you?
%
Tony Soprano: The old guys were different. Men in the front. Wives in the back.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You like that arrangement.
Tony Soprano: Actually, I think the wives should ride in a little cart, behind 
the car...like in the cartoons. Like behind Noah's ark, there's a little boat 
with the skunks.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: So wives are skunks?
Tony Soprano: Ah, Jesus fuckin' Christ! It's a fuckin' joke. Does it have to be 
like a cancer hospital in here?
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: But Carmela is in control in the dream...
Tony Soprano: Why, cuz she's drivin'?
%
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ! The money I've been droppin' in here, I could've 
bought a fuckin' Ferrari. At least I would've got a blowjob outta that.
%
Minn Matrone: I've been driving since I was a young girl.
Paulie Walnuts: Horse and buggies don't count.
%
Silvio Dante: You have any idea what Albert kicked up last week?
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck that fuckin' parakeet. I got a relationship with Tony 
Albert'll never have. No matter how far he sticks his tongue up Tony's ass.
%
Paulie Walnuts: It's your fault anyway. All this shit started with that Russian 
prick when I had to go pick up your five grand.
Silvio Dante: You know things might be a little different, Paulie, if you'd 
accept some responsibility for a change.
Paulie Walnuts: You're a wormy cocksucker, you know that?
Silvio Dante: Ohhhh! I'm just tellin' you how you're bein' fuckin' perceived!
Paulie Walnuts: Just worry about how you're fuckin' perceived! Nobody knows 
what the future holds, my friend.
%
Carmela Soprano: You always leave your door open like that?
Meadow Soprano: I'm cooking, it's hot.
Finn DeTrolio: I'll protect her, don't worry.
Tony Soprano: Ya hear that? Anybody bothers her he'll knock their teeth out, 
then he can put 'em back in, too.
%
Prosecutor: Ladies and gentlemen, Corrado Soprano is not some harmless old man 
being persecuted by the government but a ruthless and calculating mob boss who 
controls a vast criminal enterprise. Over the past few months, you've heard 
from FBI agents who have documented clandestine meetings at his doctor's 
offices. Tales of bid rigging, sweetheart deals, secret payoffs, and even 
murder. No, Corrado Soprano is not some harmless old man, but a killer who 
orders up murder like you and I order up coffee.
%
Irina Peltsin: (on phone) Is this Mrs. Sopranos?
Carmela Soprano: (on phone) Yes it is.
Irina Peltsin: I used to fuck your husband.
%
Carmela Soprano: You call my house again. You ever speak to one of my children 
again, I will track you down and I will kill you. We have got guns here. I mean 
it.
%
Carmela Soprano: Let go of me, your son will be home. You want him to see his 
father like this.
Tony Soprano: Yeah, you'd love that wouldn't you? I'm not leaving here Carmela.
Carmela Soprano: I don't love you anymore. I don't want you. You are not 
sleeping in my bed Tony. The thought of it now makes me sick.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Like we said, you're gonna keep this quiet.
Credenzo Curtis: I got the mouth on the statue nigga.
Stanley Johnson: Word.
%
Carmela Soprano: Can I tell ya somethin' Tony?
Tony Soprano: Don't pretend like I got a choice.
Carmela Soprano: The last year, I have been dreaming and fantasizing and in 
love with Furio.
Tony Soprano: (laughing) he..ha...what?
Carmela Soprano: Every morning when he'd come to pick you up, I would look 
forward to it all night long in bed, next to you. Those nights when you were 
actually in the bed. And he would ring the doorbell, I felt like my heart would 
come out of my chest. He would smile, and we'd talk, and then you would come 
down the stairs. And I felt probably like someone who was terminally ill and 
somehow they managed to forget it for a minute. And then it all comes back!
%
Paulie Walnuts: Always playin' that blood relation card! Tony's little favorite!
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck you!!!
%
Paulie Walnuts: I'll tell ya, after a meal like that, what I can use is a nice 
piece of ass. Who knows, maybe I'll call down, have them send one up to the 
room.
Christopher Moltisanti: Why don't you just fuck yourself, save a little money.
Paulie Walnuts: What's your problem?
Christopher Moltisanti: Stop tryin' to bait me, Paulie. You know what my 
fuckin' problem is.
Paulie Walnuts: No, why don't you tell me!
Christopher Moltisanti: You want me to tell you? Fine! Steaks! Three pound 
lobsters! The shrimp fuckin' cocktails you made everybody get, then on top of 
everything else, you send those skanks a bottle of Cristal?
Paulie Walnuts: I was bein' a gentlemen, Chrissy, you oughta try it sometime.
Christopher Moltisanti: Not to mention the lyonnaise fucking potatoes you 
didn't even touch.
Paulie Walnuts: What? I lost my appetite!
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck you!
Paulie Walnuts: Excuse me?
Christopher Moltisanti: You fuckin' heard me!
Paulie Walnuts: I'm tellin' you, Chrissy, I don't give a fuck anymore who 
you're related to!
Christopher Moltisanti: Go ahead, Paulie! Go for it! Your big fuckin' moment!
Paulie Walnuts: You little fuck!!
%
Tony Soprano: As long as you don't step on anybody's toes...
Michele "Feech" La Manna: Me? I'm Fred Astaire.
%
Paulie Walnuts: So we open the fuckin' trunk. This suffocatin' Russian 
cocksucka pops up. He's still alive! (They all laugh)
Christopher Moltisanti: We lead 'im through the snow. This asshole's shiverin', 
I mean he's wearin' fuckin' pajamas and slippers in like eight degree weather.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Of course, what's wrong with me?
Tony Soprano: I dunno...but we'll find out. Leave it ta Dr. Tony.
%
Jack Massarone: So they go through labor, big deal. Try a prostate exam.
%
Tony Soprano: I tell you, I'm havin' a time. Stay out late. Come home drunk. 
Fuck anyone I want.
Silvio Dante: Yeah, so whats the difference? (Compared to when Tony was married)
Tony Soprano: I dunno, it's the mindset.
%
Tony Blundetto: (to Paulie Walnuts, about his hair) You got ta let that dry 
before you put on a second coat? Fuckin' Grandpa Munster over here.
Silvio Dante: (laughing) Ohhh...
Tony Blundetto: (to Vito Spatafore, about cards) You gonna deal those? They're 
not candy bars. You can let some of 'em go. (everybody laughs)
%
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ, I'm gone for one hour, all of a sudden it turns 
into a fuckin' slumber party.
Tony Blundetto: Somebody woke up on the wrong side o' the bed.
%
Tony Soprano: I'm tellin' ya, I'm havin' a fuckin' time. Stay out late, come 
home drunk, fuck anyone I want.
Silvio Dante: Yeah, so what's the difference?
%
Lorraine Calluzzo: I'll suck your cock, I'll suck all your cocks!!!! (frantic 
and afraid)
Phil Leotardo: You'll suck our cocks? She any good? (pauses) Why am I askin, 
you, you probably showed her how. (to Jason Evanina)
%
Phil Leotardo: Next time, there won't be a next time.
%
Paulie Walnuts: Which entitles you to shit. In my book, you get points for 
stayin' out of the can!
Michele "Feech" La Manna: Good thing for me then, that your book means UGOTS to 
me! Now do yourself a fuckin' favor, and get the fuck out of my store!
%
Angelo Garepe: He's grabbin' with both hands, John. This could get ugly. 
There's a lotta potential for bloodshed.
Jason Evanina: Potential? They almost killed us!
Lorraine Calluzzo: Jason, men are talkin' here.
%
Tony Soprano: Free spirit Janice! Rebel without a cause! While I sit here mired 
in her bullshit, tryin' to be a good son, while you're off droppin' acid and 
blowin' roadies!
Bobby Baccilieri: ROADIES?!!?
Tony Soprano: Oh, you don't wanna know!
%
Michele Feech La Manna: (about Tony) Jesus fuckin' Christ, how many times this 
guy gotta say hello!!
Tony Soprano: What, did I interrupt one of your impermeable stories? Go ahead..
Michele Feech La Manna: So, we had these girls in a hotel room, long story 
short, I got my shoe in her snatch-
Tony Soprano: And it falls off and she keels over, Che puzz'. (holds his nose)
%
Tony Soprano: (to Anthony Junior) Look at your face! If you got some kind of 
sexual proclivity with that teacher or whatever, now is the time to tell us! I 
mean, what went on up there! Poppers and weird sex!!
%
Officer: That your garage?
Michele Feech La Manna: Nah, it's where I make the weapons of mass destruction.
Officer: Let's go out and open it up.
Michele Feech La Manna: You wanna see my fuckin' garage?! You never seen an oil 
stain before?
%
Michele Feech La Manna: It's important these young guys know the history.
Silvio Dante: Tell 'em 'bout the time...uh...Tony and Jackie Aprile knocked 
over your card game. (Feech La Manna sighs) Oh, that he doesn't like ta talk 
about.
%
Tony Soprano: (to Tony Blundetto, about playing cards) Isn't there somethin' in 
your parole about hangin' out with degenerates like this?
Michele Feech La Manna: Hey, come on, he gets away with anything. Last time his 
parole officer made the unannounced visit, he gave him a massage.
%
Tony Soprano: Nah, I always think.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Really?
Tony Soprano: Yeah.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Having sex with your mistress' cousin, like the mistress 
wasn't enough ta piss off your wife.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: For example, you could tell her she means a great deal to 
you, but you think of her as a daughter.
Tony Soprano: Even if I wanna fuck her brains out...?
%
Adriana La Cerva: What, so you're just not gonna talk? I almost got killed, 
Christopher.
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm just curious. What the fuck were you doin' in the 
middle o' the night in the middle o' nowhere in a car with my uncle?
Adriana La Cerva: He was drivin' me home.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuckin' Dover?
Adriana La Cerva: We were talkin'. We...we...we were goin' ta get something ta 
eat. I get off o' work, I don't want ta go right home. You weren't even there.
Christopher Moltisanti: No, I was in a fuckin' Ride-A-Rent bustin' my ass with 
a bunch o' rednecks makin' a livin' ta buy you alcohol, and coke, and all the 
other shit you shovel into your mouth. Two o'clock in the fuckin' mornin'?! 
Don't fuckin' lie ta me, I can't stand it!
Adriana La Cerva: Nothin' was goin' on, Christopher.
Christopher Moltisanti: I should've made ya walk home.
Adriana La Cerva: I swear ta God.
Christopher Moltisanti: You know how this looks? Don't talk ta me, shut your 
mouth!
%
Silvio Dante: (A series of phone conversations) Adriana got caught givin' the 
big guy a blowjob.
Bobby Baccilieri: And when the paramedics found them, she had his cock still in 
her mouth.
Hesh Rabkin: Now, statistics show that most single-car fatalities are the 
result of guys poppin' their load behind the wheel.
Uncle Junior: Apparently, he came all over the sun visor.
%
Adriana La Cerva: Hey, hun. I already ate. There's a casserole in- (Christopher 
chokes Adriana)
Christopher Moltisanti: (yelling) You fuckin' lyin' bitch!
Adriana La Cerva: Ow! Stop it! What're you doin'?
Christopher Moltisanti: You were suckin' his cock! Georgie told me everythin'. 
The surgeon on the operatin' table said you were moanin' Tony's name!
Adriana La Cerva: What are you talkin' about?
Christopher Moltisanti: You fucking lied ta me! What were you doin' in Dover 
then? See, see, you can't tell me...'cause I know what you were doin'! Your 
other dope dealer's there. Go ahead, deny it!
Adriana La Cerva: Okay, I was goin' out ta see Andre, but I wasn't suckin' 
anybody's cock! How could you say that?
Christopher Moltisanti: Oh, so you two were just gonna go toot up a bunch o' 
lines, go fuckin' birdwatchin'?
Adriana La Cerva: Oh, you son of a bitch. I was gonna stay up all night and 
clean this fucking shithole!
Christopher Moltisanti: Everybody knows about it. Everybody's talkin' about it!
Adriana La Cerva: No, please. (Christopher flips a table)
Christopher Moltisanti: You want me ta use you bitch! You're fuckin' killin' me!
Adriana La Cerva: No, I don't. I love you. (Christopher smacks Adriana hard and 
keeps slapping her on the ground) Stop it. You motherfucker.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuckin' whore.
Adriana La Cerva: Ow, my neck. (Christopher drags Adriana by the hair and 
throws her out of the house)
Christopher Moltisanti: Get the fuck outta here! I never wanna see you again! 
(Chris slams the door shut)
%
Carmela Soprano: There are other things to think about. My husband, for one.
Robert Wegler: Well your husband's goin' to have to get used to the fact that 
your life is movin' on.
Carmela Soprano: I'm not worried about my life.
%
Tony Soprano: What'd that fag want?
Carmela Soprano: Jesus Christ, Tony, everybody's a fag to you. You know, maybe 
you're a fag, you ever think about that?
Tony Soprano: Can I help it if I know one when I see one?
Carmela Soprano: Oh really? What are the signs? Education...culture?
Tony Soprano: Suckin' a guy's cock usually tips me off.
Carmela Soprano: How do you know who sucks whose cock? What, you got a little 
secret?
%
Anthony Junior: Well maybe I don't wanna live in a place where people use 
violence against children.
Tony Soprano: Violence? You're lucky I didn't put my shoe up your ass.
Anthony Junior: You see? Now that's abuse. I know what my rights are. I can 
call social services and they'll send a case worker.
Tony Soprano: Go ahead. He'll get the other shoe!
%
Paulie Walnuts: Why do pissin, shittin', and fuckin' all happen within' a 
two-inch radius?
Christopher Moltisanti: Everybody asks that, Paulie. There's no answer for it.
Vito Spatafore: They're all sources of pleasure though.
Paulie Walnuts: Get the fuck outta here!
%
Paulie Walnuts: So, how many guys you gotta jerk off on a massage table ta make 
that?
Tony Blundetto: I don't know. What do ya charge without the table.
%
Uncle Junior: Five hours they let me out for these funerals. I gotta spend it 
bein' maudlin?
%
J.T. Dolan: Hi, my name is J.T., I'm an alcoholic and an addict. I'm also a TV 
writer, which by default makes me a douchebag.
%
Tony Soprano: (about the absence of his childhood dog) Father told me he took 
him to live on a farm.
Bobby Baccilieri: That's what they always say. That same farm must have 
seventeen billion dogs on it. Dogshit up ta the rafters.
%
Johnny Sack: Tony gets one fifty. Twenty five percent comes from you, the other 
seventy five percent o' that comes from Hesh.
Phil Leotardo: Jesus Christ...that's like forty grand. You gotta be fuckin' 
kiddin' me, John.
Johnny Sack: Am I smilin'?
Phil Leotardo: You got some balls kid, I'll give you that much!
Tony Soprano: You'll give me what I tell you to give me!
Johnny Sack: Whoah Tony...
Silvio Dante: Take it easy...take it easy...
Tony Soprano: Fuck that! This ain't the seventies. And I'm not a kid.
Phil Leotardo: Relax, it's an expression.
Tony Soprano: Well, here's another expression. You got five days ta give me my 
money.
%
J.T. Dolan: What is this, fuckin' "Pulp Fiction"? Am I supposed ta be afraid?
Little Paulie Germani: I don't know, I didn't see it.
J.T. Dolan: You're really bein' a prick, huh. I told you, I need more time.
Christopher Moltisanti: Then fuckin' get it.
J.T. Dolan: Chris, you know me. What could you possibly do ta me that I haven't 
already been through?
Christopher Moltisanti: I'm positive we'll think o' somethin'. (Chris punches 
J.T. in the face, hard, sending him to the ground)
J.T. Dolan: Ow! My God... (Little Paulie Germani keeps kicking J.T. on the 
ground and Chris breaks a glass framed portrait on J.T.'s head) Ow! Oh! 
Oh...auh...
%
Bobby Baccalieri: Brought you some danishes and coffee.
Uncle Junior: Fuckin' medication. I can't think, can't stay awake.
Bobby Baccalieri: It don't have that side-effect. But it'll help your outlook 
if you take it consistently like you're supposed to. What's on?
Uncle Junior: They said in the guide it's an Italian movie, but even with the 
captions I can't tell what's what. They had Jesus hanging off a helicopter, but 
you could tell it was a dummy.
Bobby Baccalieri: You know who I saw at the bakery?
Uncle Junior: How the fuck could I know?
Bobby Baccalieri: Rosalie Aprile. She said they're having a surprise party for 
Carmela's father next week. He's gonna be seventy-five. You get an invite?
Uncle Junior: No but we go back to when Moses wore short pants. I better call 
Hugh. Tell him not to expect me.
Bobby Baccalieri: It's a surprise party, June.
Uncle Junior: What are we, children? Anyway, at our age it's enough surprise 
we're still alive every morning.
%
Hugh DeAngelis: (on phone) Hello?
Uncle Junior: (on phone) Hugo,
Hugh DeAngelis: Who is this?
Uncle Junior: Corrado Soprano.
Hugh DeAngelis: Ohhh...Corrado, how are ya?
Uncle Junior: How am I? I'm a prisoner in my own home is how I am. What do we 
live for?
Hugh DeAngelis: Yeah.
Uncle Junior: Anyhow, I wanna wish you a bona fortuna and also send you my 
regrets. I'd love to be at your jubilee.
Bobby Baccilieri: Junior...
Hugh DeAngelis: Jubilee?!
Uncle Junior: The federal government says I can't leave the house and my family 
keeps me sedated. Bobby told me it was a surprise party, but I told him, I go 
"At our age, it's enough surprise everyday when we get up in the morning. 
Right?"
Hugh DeAngelis: Uhh..I suppose so.
Uncle Junior: So happy birthday my friend and many more. Arrividerci.
%
Carmela Soprano: Did somebody tell you something?
Hugh DeAngelis: I know all about it. You can save the cloak and dagger.
Mary DeAngelis: AJ?!
Anthony Junior: Huh? What?!
Hugh DeAngelis: Junior Soprano told me all about it.
Carmela Soprano: That miserable fuckin' man.
Mary DeAngelis: Ohhh...
Carmela Soprano: You don't know the half!
Hugh DeAngelis: Relax! I'm fine with knowin'. In my age, it's surprise enough 
to be able to get out of bed every mornin'.
%
Hugh DeAngelis: Who else is comin'?
Mary DeAngelis: Freddy Di Novi.
Hugh DeAngelis: Tony'll love him. Who else?
Carmela Soprano: Dad, Tony isn't coming to the party.
Hugh DeAngelis: Why won't he come?
Carmela Soprano: Well, I felt that since we're separated, we should get used to 
the idea of livin' separate lives.
Hugh DeAngelis: Oh, that's a crock of shit!
Mary DeAngelis: You don't talk to her like that. This is very difficult.
Hugh DeAngelis: I've known the man for twenty-somethin' years. It's his house, 
how's it gonna look?!! (angrily)
Carmela Soprano: I talked to Tony about it. He's in agreement with me.
Hugh DeAngelis: Because you put the screws to him!!
Carmela Soprano: Fine, I'll cancel the party!
Hugh DeAngelis: Go right the hell ahead! Because I'm not comin' if the man of 
the house isn't there!!
%
Phil Leotardo: Somethin's off with the seat!
Edward Bonpensiero: What is it Phil?!
Phil Leotardo: Feel's off kilter! Try it, Joey!
Joe Peeps: You're right! it's off it's axis.
Phil Leotardo: It reclines strange too.
%
Phil Leotardo: I don't feel like I'm sittin' at twelve o' clock.
Angie Bonpensiero: You're sittin' at twelve o' clock.
Tony Blundetto: May I?
Phil Leotardo: I don't give a fuck. You can sit in there until fucking 
saginata. It'll still need to be dealt with. This car went through a major 
collision.
Tony Blundetto: Seems okay.
Phil Leotardo: How can it be okay if its askew? What's a matter Joey, you got a 
fuckin' eye problem! You look like Stevie Wonder, your eyes rollin' around!
Joe Peeps: Huh, what I say? I didn't say nuthin'...
%
Tony Soprano: 'Fritto misto baccala, couple of meatballs too...
Hugh DeAngelis: Hey, there he is!
Tony Soprano: Hey! Happy Birthday to you, got salsiccia for you!
%
Silvio Dante: His brains are splattered all over the seat.
Paulie Walnuts: Joey Peeps? Couldn't have been too much to clean up.
%
Tony Blundetto: What's up?
Tony Soprano: Turns out somebody got a look at the guy that did Joe Peeps. All 
they got so far is he's got a bad limp.
Tony Blundetto: Huh...Long John Silver maybe?
Tony Soprano: Where the fuck do you get the balls? I am bendin' over backwards 
tryin' to stay neutral, payin' for fuckin' car seats and you're out there 
acting like a fuckin' free agent. Don't look at me like I'm a fuckin' jerkoff, 
'cuz I'm sick of you leanin' on this cousin thing and that bad hijack like you 
can do whatever the fuck it is you wanna do 'cuz you went away that night and I 
didn't!
Tony Blundetto: You're the one who keeps bringin' that up, I'm fine with it. 
First of all for the record, I had nothin' to do with this.
Tony Soprano: Don't fuckin' lie to me!!
Tony Blundetto: Even if I was, would you really wanna know, that'd just be 
another problem for you with Johnny right?
Tony Soprano: Aight, look, I know you're not earnin' what you expected and you 
got the twins and Nancy...you're a capable guy. Your mother let it slip one 
time, you got an IQ of 158.
Tony Blundetto: She told you that?
Tony Soprano: It's the week you got tested, all the fuckin' nuns were ravin' 
about it.
Tony Blundetto: Lotta good it did me.
Tony Soprano: I had high hopes when you got out!
Tony Blundetto: Yeah...
Tony Soprano: Look a guy like you, brains, balls, if you'd fuckin' be straight 
with me I could use all that.
Tony Blundetto: Put me in, coach.
Tony Soprano: Aight, we got the casino on Bloomfield Avenue above the hardware 
store. Carlo's guy was runnin' it but he just got diagnosed with the Hodgkins.
Tony Blundetto: That's mine?
Tony Soprano: Yeah. Lotta fuckin' money there. And I'll see what I can do about 
gettin' you straightened out...openin' up the books for you, it's long overdue.
%
Vito Spatafore: (After Finn has seen Vito performing oral sex on a male 
security guard in the morning) Badan. Sound like a racehorse pissin' in there.
Finn DeTrolio: Hey, how's it goin'?
Vito Spatafore: You know, I never asked you what your last name is.
Finn DeTrolio: It's DeTrolio.
Vito Spatafore: Finn DeTrolio, my arch nemesis. Enjoyin' yourself here?
Finn DeTrolio: It's alright.
Vito Spatafore: I keep tellin' you, you shouldn't work so hard. Long hours. 
This fuckin' heat. Plus you came in so early today.
Finn DeTrolio: I just do what the job is.
Vito Spatafore: Good. You're strong. That helps. You know you can call me Vito.
Finn DeTrolio: Yeah...I..I know.
Vito Spatafore: So say it. Lemme hear you say, "what's up, Vito?"
Finn DeTrolio: What's up, Vito?
Vito Spatafore: Not much, Finn. 'Cept I got a little surprise for ya. Two 
tickets to see your Padres take a beatin' from the Yanks tonight.
Finn DeTrolio: Whoah...shit...
Vito Spatafore: Third base line, plus it's bat night.
Finn DeTrolio: That's really nice, Vito, but I..I don't know if I can-
Vito Spatafore: Don't pull that aw-shucks shit with me! You're fuckin' goin'! 
I'll see you under the bat tonight, seven sharp. And I don't like to miss the 
National Anthem.
%
Meadow Soprano: So you're just not gonna show up?! You love baseball, what is 
wrong with you!!!?
Finn DeTrolio: I don't like the guy, alright?
Meadow Soprano: Right, I get it. Dr. DeTrolio can't hang with the common folk.
Finn DeTrolio: He came onto me alright! Either that, or he wants to kill me.
Meadow Soprano: What?!
Finn DeTrolio: I saw him blowing some security guard in the parkin' lot.
Meadow Soprano: When? What are you talking about!?
Finn DeTrolio: This mornin' I showed up early, I didn't wanna say anythin' but 
I'm really afraid of this guy.
Meadow Soprano: Vito Spatafore is a married man Finn, I seriously doubt he 
wants to kill you.
Finn DeTrolio: Well maybe he wants to fuck me and then kill me!
Meadow Soprano: Wait a minute, is that why you got out the suitcase.
Finn DeTrolio: I am not going back to the site.
Meadow Soprano: Do you have any idea the strings my father pulled to get you 
that job and you just fuckin' quit! I'm gonna hear so much bullshit!!
Finn DeTrolio: So its all about you right?!
Meadow Soprano: Is that all you can say whenever its anythin' to do with my 
feelin's? So you're going back to Mission Viejo?
Finn DeTrolio: I didn't say that!
Meadow Soprano: Why don't you just admit it!? This whole thing. The fight, this 
stuff with Vito, it's really about you not wanting to commit!
Finn DeTrolio: I'm right here, we fucking live together.
Meadow Soprano: But you got out a suitcase!!
Finn DeTrolio: It's my process! Okay? Look you never can tell!!
Meadow Soprano: Your process?!!
Finn DeTrolio: About anything, the future, I was thinking out loud. Well not 
out loud, but in the action of getting out the suitcase I was thinking.
Meadow Soprano: Thinking of leaving!
Finn DeTrolio: No...well yes...but I'm still here...I didn't go.
Meadow Soprano: Fuck you!!
Finn DeTrolio: Right...great...fuck me..there was no abundant intentionality in 
me getting out the suitcase.
Meadow Soprano: I can leave too you know, my friend Hunter's in Montreal!!!
Finn DeTrolio: Do I know!!! With the French roommate guy who was all over your 
ass the time that we visited, you don't think you keep mentioning him every 24 
hours in a minimum.
Meadow Soprano: Because he's thinking of becoming an oral surgeon and you might 
have had a new friend if you hadn't been so obnoxious to him at the club.
Finn DeTrolio: Can we just stop fighting?
Meadow Soprano: You got out a suitcase!!!!
Finn DeTrolio: I'll put it back okay?
%
Meadow Soprano: So it's not about us, but suddenly you're talking about options.
Finn DeTrolio: Don't paraphrase what I said. I said, this point in our lives is 
a transition period forced on us by external events, school is over for me and 
next year for you. These are difficult choices, what you'd rather not have 
choices...thank god for choices!!
Meadow Soprano: Uh! Stop your bullshit! It's really simple! Are we going to 
stay together or not!!!?
Finn DeTrolio: If you want.
Meadow Soprano: That's not what I asked!
Finn DeTrolio: I said I did.
Meadow Soprano: And then you said, how are we going to keep it together through 
four years of dental school for you and probably med school for me!
Finn DeTrolio: Well, its a good question.
Meadow Soprano: But why ask it now, tonight of all times?!! Are you asleep?!!
Finn DeTrolio: No!
Meadow Soprano: You were. And now you're gonna lie like you did about the 
suitcase!
Finn DeTrolio: I did not lie about the suitcase!!
Meadow Soprano: Then what do you call it!?
Finn DeTrolio: I don't know, I explained it. Jesus, you should quit the law 
center, you're like a prosecutor at 4 in the morning. I can't think!!
Meadow Soprano: How can you sleep when we're in the middle of this!!!
Finn DeTrolio: In the middle of what?!! All I said was I didn't wanna go back 
to the job site and maybe I should go home until this thing with Vito blows 
over.
Meadow Soprano: But you didn't ask me to come. You went right to the closet and 
got out your suitcase!
Finn DeTrolio: Jesus Christ!!!!!!
%
Tony Soprano: Peeps?! It's a fuckin' nickname! His family name is Pepperelli!
Silvio Dante: They're gonna redo it. Fuckin' Jason. He's dyslexic...
Tony Soprano: What's that got to do with it?
%
Tony Soprano: So, to what do I owe this pleasure?
Carmela Soprano: I don't know if you're gonna see it that way. I have asked you 
to lunch to tell you I'm filing for divorce.
Artie Bucco: I hope you brought your appetite...
Tony Soprano: Why don't you give us a minute. (Artie leaves the table) Well 
that's nice. Invite me to a public place so you can ambush me? You think I 
won't make a scene?
Carmela Soprano: Spare me your outrage, Tony. Accept the fact that I'm moving 
on with my life.
Tony Soprano: Moving on? That's what you were doing after the party last week?
Carmela Soprano: I think you and I both know that didn't change anything.
Tony Soprano: Well first of all we're Italian, we don't believe in divorce. We 
believe in the nuclear family.
Carmela Soprano: Are you listening to yourself? Despite your best efforts, I 
have an attorney who is going to aggressively pursue my custody of A.J. an also 
an equitable distribution of our assets.
Tony Soprano: Our assets?
Carmela Soprano: I am through trying to get you to provide beyond the minimum I 
need to live.
Tony Soprano: Oh so it's fuckin' money? That's all this is to you?
Carmela Soprano: After all we've been through is it so hard to own up to 
anything beyond that bullshit tax return?
%
(Artie comes back to the table)
Tony Soprano: Go stand over there, I'll call you when I'm ready.(Artie leaves 
again) You want money? How 'bout my forty grand you stole out of the bird 
feeder, that should be plenty, you're such an investment genius.
Carmela Soprano: You want this to get ugly Tony, because these guys live for 
that.
Tony Soprano: What, you think I don't? (gets up to leave, then comes back) The 
only reason you have anything is 'cause of my fuckin' sweat, and you knew every 
step of the way exactly how it works. But you walk around that fuckin' mansion 
and your five-hundred dollar shoes and your diamond rings, and you act like 
butter wouldn't melt in your mouth. And you don't want it to get ugly. Too late.
Carmela Soprano: I want what I am entitled to.
Tony Soprano: You're entitled to shit. (to Artie): She's ready to order.
%
Janice Soprano: That bitch is lucky I didn't kill her.
Tony Soprano: Well we all know that.
%
Tony Blundetto: They used to call me Ichabod Crane.
Christopher Moltisanti: Who?
Tony Blundetto: Some very sorry people, that's who.
%
Dr. Seepman: Janice, you're angry. What are your actual physical feelings right 
now?
Janice Soprano: I'd like to punch you in the face?
%
Tony Soprano: Carlo was told it was a go. If it didn't happen, how come nobody 
called?
Johnny Sack: A lotta things didn't happen that seem like they happen...your 
cousin didn't whack Joey, the Vespas never got into my hands.
%
Janice Soprano: That bitch is lucky I didn't kill her.
Tony Soprano: Well, we know that.
Bobby Baccilieri: What?
Tony Soprano: You and your fuckin' temper Janice.
%
Tony Soprano: You know douchebag, I realize I'm dreamin'.
Mikey Palmice: I got no opinion, one way or the other.
%
Tony Soprano: You know what I been thinkin' about lately? Charmaine Bucco.
Tony Blundetto: Nice set on her.
Tony Soprano: No, not like that. Well, maybe like that.
%
Tony Soprano: Where are we goin'?
Ralph Cifaretto: Drivin' you ta the job.
%
Vin Makazian: (taking a piss) Oh, that feels good.
Tony Soprano: You don't do this no more, huh?
Vin Makazian: No.
%
Coach Molinaro: I suppose you blame it on your father when you're cryin' ta 
that shrink of yours.
Tony Soprano: No, more my mother.
Coach Molinaro: Of course, even better.
%
Tony Soprano: Like Popeye says, I yam what I yam.
Carmela Soprano: Well I didn't marry a cartoon character.
%
Tony Soprano: First off, let me just say how sorry I am for you're loss. We all 
are.
Phil Leotardo: Take your fuckin' sorrys, and stick in your ass.
Tony Soprano: I could say nothing. Be a heartless prick.
Phil Leotardo: He tried to talk, he couldn't even say his last words. Anybody 
ever die in your arms, you cocksucker? A family member, somebody you love?
Tony Soprano: No.
Phil Leotardo: Well give it time. See if I can't make that happen for you.
Silvio Dante: Whoa whoa whoa...
Tony Soprano: Alright, that's enough.
%
Tony Soprano: Was that fuckin' necessary? He shouldn't even've been here.
Johnny Sack: He's got a right to be here. He's got a right to a lot of things 
right now.
Tony Soprano: My cousin acted alone, I did not sanction this.
Johnny Sack: The 'lone gunman theory'...
Tony Soprano: You know how close he and Angelo were in the can. He flipped the 
fuck out!
Johnny Sack: When he whacked Joey Peeps, what flipped him out that time?
Tony Soprano: W-whaddaya want John, whaddaya want me to say?
Johnny Sack: I want your cousin on a fucking spit!
Tony Soprano: I don't know where he is.
Silvio Dante: Nobody does.
Johnny Sack: Fine. Maybe one of your other relatives then...
Christopher Moltisanti: What, I gotta stand here being threatened now?
Silvio Dante: Right, Chrissy-
Tony Soprano: Alright alright alright, nobody's making threats! Look, Tony's in 
hiding, John.
Johnny Sack: You either deliver that prick to my door, or I will rain a 
shitstorm down on you and your family like you have never fucking seen. We're 
done here.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck this piece of shit! I'm done!! You hear me? Put my 
life on the line, my fuckin' life.
Adriana La Cerva: Baby I hate seein' you like this!
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck family! Fuck loyalty. It costs 'em a dime, you're 
a fuckin' pariah! I gave that fuck pieces of my soul, Adriana. You know what he 
said to me? He said I should have a fuckin' drink!
Adriana La Cerva: When?
Christopher Moltisanti: Up there when we were up in Uncle Pat's farm!
Adriana La Cerva: Well you don't need to listen to him. Isn't that why you have 
a sponsor?
Christopher Moltisanti: Him and Tony B. Breakin' my balls! Teasin' me like when 
I was little. I mean, what kind of fucked up, underminin' shit is that to tell 
someone who's got the disease. You know I could take him out in a second that 
fat fuck! BANG! His kids wouldn't even give a shit!
Adriana La Cerva: Don't talk like that! You're a better man than he is - a 
better person.
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck all this shit with Paulie and all, you know what 
hurts me worse, right to my heart. Him and our asswipe cousin, that two-faced 
cocksucker. He can get us all killed with New York, and him Tony has to think 
about what to do with him now, after all this shit. Me, he don't need to 
fuckin' think! Well, maybe I need to think! Ever thought of that, you fat 
fuckin' scumbag!!!
%
Christopher Moltisanti: That's the guy Adriana. My uncle Tony. The guy I'm 
goin' to hell for.
%
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Billy Leotardo. What the hell was that?
Eddie Pietro: This Blundetto asshole went off the reservation.
%
Phil Leotardo: Ho! 'Scuse me. How ya doin'? You're Joanne right?
Joanne Moltisanti: Who are you?
Phil Leotardo: Well, we're friends o' your son's.
Joanne Moltisanti: My son doesn't live with me.
Phil Leotardo: We're uh...from Alcoholics Anonymous.
Joanne Moltisanti: What's your name?
Phil Leotardo: Well, we're anonymous. I see his car's out front.
Joanne Moltisanti: He went ta California or Vegas, I don't know.
Phil Leotardo: California or Vegas. When did he leave?
Joanne Moltisanti: I'm sorry I have to go to work.
Phil Leotardo: Where the fuck is he?
Jason Masucci: Phil uh...Phil...
Joanne Moltisanti: Leave me alone. (Phil grabs Joanne)
Phil Leotardo: I had a brother your son's age.
Joanne Moltisanti: Please let go o' my hand.
Phil Leotardo: Where the fuck is he you fuckin' cunt? I'll take that Discman 
and I'll ram it up your box.
Jason Masucci: Philly, Philly...please...please. It's the guy's mother Phil. 
It's the guy's mother. (Joanne runs off)
%
Silvio Dante: I've been your consigliere for a lot of years-
Tony Soprano: Don't go through a fuckin' preamble, just tell me what's on your 
mind!
%
Tony Soprano: My cousin Anthony...went into business for himself. We all know 
this. In a way for which there is no excuse. He's got a problem with rage. He 
disappointed me, Anthony, in ways that I can't even begin ta tell you. And he 
put us all at risk. Irregardless, it's been made clear ta me that if they put 
their hands on him, he will not be dealt with quick. We're talkin' torture. For 
that reason, even if I knew where my cousin was, and I do not, I would not 
deliver him up ta them. I am offerin' him the same protection that I would 
offer any of you in similar circumstances. Now I know what you're gonna say, 
you're gonna say "Hey, Ton', I would never do what he did." God bless, I hope 
not. But we are a family, and even in this fucked up day and age that means 
somethin'. So we're gonna deal with this as a family, together. No matter how 
it affects anybody...personal safety-wise, financially-wise, whatever. I see 
that my nephew isn't here and, uh, it's important he lam it now. It's my desire 
that you circle the wagons, you support him. Until and as such.
%
Benny Fazio: Fuckin' somethin', this situation, eh?
Silvio Dante: Right.
Christopher Moltisanti: I can't even get down ta Milt's, fence some jewelry.
Benny Fazio: Everybody with eyes in the back o' their head. Shit, I was Tony's 
driver.
Christopher Moltisanti: It's amazing. You want me ta be honest? The favoritism 
Tony still shows for our fuckin' cousin after what he's done? What does Tony B. 
have on this guy? And I'm supposed ta maybe take a bullet for this skeeve.
Silvio Dante: After all your uncle's done for you? I need ta get into specifics?
%
Eugene Pontecorvo: (next to Benny Fazio's battered body in the hospital) This 
is fucked up.
Vito Spatafore: What do ya wanna do about it?
Eugene Pontecorvo: What do I wanna do about it? I want that man there ta do 
somethin' about it. (referring to Tony) I want 'im ta give us the okay ta drive 
over ta Brooklyn, clean some fuckin' timepieces over there.
Vito Spatafore: Tony Blundetto whacked the brother of a captain. Tony tried ta 
strike at them again, we should take him out.
%
Tony Soprano: (digging with shovel) Halfway ta China...there's nuthin' here.
Uncle Junior: Forty thousand I had. My share of the Bohack's haul from the 
seventies.
Tony Soprano: Did you wrap it right? It gets moldy...it could've disintegrated.
Uncle Junior: Wrap what?
Tony Soprano: The money.
Uncle Junior: He knows I need that money for my fuckin' retrial.
Tony Soprano: Who?
Uncle Junior: You know who.
Tony Soprano: No I don't know who, that's why I asked you.
Uncle Junior: Malanga.
Tony Soprano: Will you stop with that. Pussy Malanga's dead...six years now. I 
should dig him up already!
%
Deanne Pontecorvo: Did you talk ta Tony?
Eugene Pontecorvo: Looks good. He gave me a hug.
Deanne Pontecorvo: Did he like the watches?
Eugene Pontecorvo: Do I know my psychology? (sarcastic)
%
Silvio Dante: He was a good kid, Raymond.
Tony Soprano: The best.
Paulie Walnuts: At least he went fast. Not like Dick Barone, poor fuck.
Bobby Baccilieri: Dick Barone died?
Silvio Dante: Lou Gehrig's disease.
Christopher Moltisanti: You ever think what a coincidence it is that Lou Gehrig 
died of Lou Gehrig's disease?
%
Eugene Pontecorvo: Look, for Tony to-
Deanne Pontecorvo: Tony...Tony...why don't you kill 'im! Put a bullet in his 
fuckin' head!
Eugene Pontecorvo: I can't do that.
Deanne Pontecorvo: What, you think I don't know that you've done it before?
Eugene Pontecorvo: He's the boss Deanne.
Deanne Pontecorvo: The boss of what? He's a piece of shit!
%
Uncle Junior: The phone keeps ringin'. And then they hang up.
Tony Soprano: Probably salespeople.
Uncle Junior: I know who it is.
Tony Soprano: Pussy Malanga...I know. We'll get J. Edgar Hoover right on it.
%
Government Agent: What are these?
Uncle Junior: A watch an' a pencil.
Government Agent: Repeat the following sentence, "No ifs, ands or buts."
Uncle Junior: I'll do it if I fuckin' feel like it. Take your ultimatums and 
stick 'em in your ass.
Government Agent: No...repeat the sentence.
Uncle Junior: (yelling) What is this person talkin' about?!
Perry Benedek: These people are trying to establish for the government, that if 
you shot Anthony Soprano, which we're not conceding, that it certainly wasn't 
intentional. That you were confused and disoriented.
Government Agent: Don't coach him, please.
Uncle Junior: My nephew Anthony?!
Perry Benedek: That's why you're here in custody.
Uncle Junior: Where's Mel?
Perry Benedek: You dismissed Mr. Melvoin as your attorney and hired me, because 
of his paralyzed hand from his stroke, it made you nervous.
Uncle Junior: If somebody shot my nephew, it was him himself. He's a depression 
case.
%
Carlo Gervasi: What do we do about Junior?
Christopher Moltisanti: He's in jail. That puts him out of our reach.
Vito Spatafore: Not necessarily.
Larry Boy Barese: He's a demented old fuck. I say we do nothin'. Let 'im rot, 
sever all ties. End this embarrassment right now.
Vito Spatafore: He "Marvin Gayed" his own nephew, the boss o' this family.
Paulie Walnuts: What happens ta Junior is Tony's call.
Bobby Baccilieri: That's right.
Vito Spatafore: Bobby, all due respect, where the fuck were you that night? Why 
was the skipper babysittin' Junior?
Bobby Baccilieri: I had other family obligations. Ask my wife. Tony volunteered.
%
Vito Spatafore: (about Eugene Pontecorvo committing suicide) I knew 'im better 
than anybody, but still...maybe he was a homo, felt there was no one he could 
talk to about it. That happens too.
Hesh Rabkin: Good thing Tony never heard about him killing himself, at least. 
Got enough on his plate.
%
Ahmed: Chris!
Christopher Moltisanti: Oh. Ahmed. You guys here again? You oughta put up a 
tent on this fuckin' bar.
Ahmed: How's Tony? The girl said that he was hurt pretty bad...
Christopher Moltisanti: He's keepin' his dick up.
Ahmed: His uncle did this to him? I was saying to Muhammad, why the hell-
Christopher Moltisanti: Not somethin' we talk about.
Muhammad: Please, give Tony our best when you talk to him.
Christopher Moltisanti: I will.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Vito already pulls down more scratch than anybody, from 
the unions.
Paulie Walnuts: Let 'im go ta the hospital first. That fat fuckin' kiss-ass. 
I'm buyin' Tony a nice little stereo fer the room.
Christopher Moltisanti: He don't need that.
%
Paulie Walnuts: How's the skip doin'?
Vito Spatafore: Same. You forget somethin'? Like my cut?
Paulie Walnuts: You believe this guy? You should've lost some weight in that 
nose, keep it outta everybody's business. I'm workin' on it.
%
Vito Spatafore: (Vito and Paulie argue in the bathroom while Silvio is on the 
toilet) I was just sayin', I'm gonna get T's piece of my half to Sil for her. 
Of the thing.
Paulie Walnuts: Back up there, Bluto. Your half? I did all the heavy liftin'.
Vito Spatafore: You would never heard about it without my information.
Paulie Walnuts: Big help. It was fuckin' mayham. You said the place was empty. 
Doc says I need an ultrasound on my groin and balls.
Vito Spatafore: Sil, you wanna weigh in here?
Silvio Dante: It breaks half and half. You both kick Tony's to me to deal with.
Paulie Walnuts: I'll have it for you Sil, the whole eighty K.
Vito Spatafore: Ho, ho, ho. Eighty K? How's that twenty percent of a million?
Paulie Walnuts: Have a cookie, you're delirious. It was seven fifty, tops.
Vito Spatafore: Fuck it all, Paulie. Tommy cased that shithole.
Silvio Dante: What's with the fuckin' accountin' out there? That's a hundred 
grand a piece. You got it? We're lookin' after Carmela.
Paulie Walnuts: No question.
Vito Spatafore: Of course. Sooner than later Paulie.
Paulie Walnuts: I gotta piss first, you want half o' that too?
%
Christopher Moltisanti: (After Benny Fazio and James Zancone hit J.T. Dolan and 
dragging him out of a meeting) Give me that fuckin' fisheye! I'm offerin' you a 
way ta wipe your fuckin' obligation! Wasn't me who told you ta start gamblin' 
again.
J.T. Dolan: I can't write a feature now. I just landed a staff job.
Christopher Moltisanti: People are seein' huge profits with these digital 
horror movies. Douchebags who never made a film before.
Benny Fazio: That "Saw" thing, four hundred grand ta make, took in a hundred 
mil worldwide.
J.T. Dolan: I'm a hundred percent well? I deliver this script, I owe you 
nothin'?
Christopher Moltisanti: You hear this dude? Hundred percent well...he's a bad 
boy huh, with that lingo? Real fuckin' dark character. My idea is "Saw" meets 
"Godfather Two." Proven track record, both genres. Young wiseguy, assassin, 
gets betrayed by his people. They whack 'im, leave his body parts in dumpsters 
all around the city. Long story short, he is put back together by science, or 
maybe it's supernatural. And he gets fuckin' payback on everyone who fucked 'im 
over, includin' the cunt he was engaged to. She was gettin' porked by his boss 
the night the hero was killed. We'll have a meeting tomorrow. We hear what 
you've fleshed out before we go ta script. Bing. Two Thirty. Don't make me come 
look fer you.
%
Vito Spatafore: Fuck took you so long?
Paulie Walnuts: I had ta get it together, didn't I? We gotta get that cut ta 
her now.
Vito Spatafore: Easy. That's a fuckin' guilty move.
Paulie Walnuts: Tony's conscious. You capisce? Everybody and his mother was in 
there talking ta 'im when he was in that coma. Carmela. Who knows what the fuck 
they said? Maybe he's expectin' that money.
Vito Spatafore: Jesus Christ.
%
Carmela Soprano: (yelling) I swear ta God, I'm gonna fucking kill you!
Anthony Junior: What the fuck?!
Carmela Soprano: You made a fool of yourself and our family on national fucking 
television!?
Anthony Junior: Look, I didn't even say that shit. Aight, they totally 
misquoted me.
Meadow Soprano: Holy shit...
Carmela Soprano: Well, of course they did! That's what they do! Which is why I 
and everybody else told you, "Don't talk to the press!"
Anthony Junior: Yeah well you're the one who looked like a total asshole. 
Draggin' me around like I was five years old.
Carmela Soprano: You are a cross to bear. That's all you are. To your father, 
to me, to everybody.
Anthony Junior: Fuck this! Alright! Fuck it all! (Anthony Junior leaves)
Hugh DeAngelis: Jesus, Mel, the hell's wrong with you?
Carmela Soprano: What's wrong with me? What's wrong with me? (Carmela leaves)
Meadow Soprano: Mom. It had to happen. She's fried.
%
Nucci Gaultieri: Paulie! I won forty dollars at Keno. (Paulie grabs her) Ow!
Paulie Walnuts: Is there somethin' you wanna tell me about?
Nucci Gaultieri: What?
Paulie Walnuts: I just saw Aunt Dottie, and guess what? Turns out she's not my 
aunt. Turns out she's my mother.
Nucci Gaultieri: No, that's not true.
Paulie Walnuts: Don't bullshit me. You been bullshitting me my entire life!
Nucci Gaultieri: Paulie!
Paulie Walnuts: It's true, isn't it? Isn't it? Son of a bitch!
Nucci Gaultieri: Oh how I dreaded this day.
Paulie Walnuts: I gave you everything! I gave you a son's love, all under false 
pretenses.
Nucci Gaultieri: No!
Paulie Walnuts: You're a fraud and a phony! And she's even worse. She's a 
whore. My mother's a fuckin' whore!
Nucci Gaultieri: Don't say that! She was a young girl. She wanted to be a nun, 
but she got in trouble.
Paulie Walnuts: And you helped her out, cooked up this little scheme. Forget 
who gets victimized!
Nucci Gaultieri: I loved you. I always loved you. Paulie! (Paulie leaves)
%
Tony Soprano: "Wallet biopsy"? Nice. Very nice.
Rudy Diaz: These people are sayin' I took money from your wallet? Fuck that!
Christopher Moltisanti: Whoah. Whoah. Whoah. What'd you say?
Rudy Diaz: I was looking for proof of insurance. I was only doin' my job.
Tony Soprano: They heard a lot o' that at Nuremberg. You owe me two K. It was 
gone from my wallet.
Rudy Diaz: I don't have that kind o' money.
Christopher Moltisanti: One week... (Chris looks at Rudy's name tag) ...Rudy 
Diaz, or you'll need a paramedic.
%
Tony Soprano: Is he fuckin' kiddin' me?! I told them I need that W-2 in 
perpetuity...and 5 percent o' the fuckin' sale price?! He thinks 'cause I'm in 
this weakened condition, he can take advantage. Well, he can go fuck himself!
Paulie Walnuts: I'm just tellin' you what Phil told me, Ton'.
Tony Soprano: You tell Jason before he sells, he better understand his 
obligation!
%
Charles Cinelli: Jason, we shook hands. A deal's a deal.
Jason Barone: There's lifetime employees who expect compensation. It's only 
equitable. Now if you're willing to take care of that, maybe we could still 
work things out.
Charles Cinelli: Tony Soprano, right? Fuck that and fuck him. He's your problem.
Jason Barone: Look, the numbers just don't work.
Helen Barone: (from afar) Jason! I'm going to the buffet table.
Jason Barone: Be right there mom. If I give Tony what he wants, I lose money on 
the sale. I can't do that to my mom.
Charles Cinelli: Kid, you work it out any way you want, but nobody's backin' 
out of the deal.
Jason Barone: Mr. Cinelli, I'm sorry, but the bottom line is, I'm not selling 
the company to you. There are other buyers out there. Tony was quite clear 
about that.
Charles Cinelli: I'll tell you the fuckin' bottom line, laddy buck. The Barone 
routes are now Cinelli routes. That's that.
%
Jason Barone: (Paulie smashes Jason's leg with a steel rod) Aw, fuck! Ahhh!!!! 
Oh. Oh. Oh.
Paulie Walnuts: Guess what, fuckin' mama's boy?! You're kickin' up four grand 
ta me every month. I don't care if you're in Deer Valley or Death Valley! Four 
grand, every goddamn month! And if you ever mention a word o' this ta Tony, 
I'll stick this up your ass... (Paulie takes out his gun) ...and pull the 
trigger till the bullets come out your eyes. (Paulie kicks Jason)
Jason Barone: Ah. Oh. Oh. Oh. Oh.....
%
Prosecutor: The defendant's request for temporary release from federal custody 
to attend his daughter's wedding is ludicrous. Mr. Sacrimoni is a known member 
of organized crime at the helm of a vast criminal conspiracy.
Defendant: I notice you're wearing a wedding ring, Miss Vaughn. Was your father 
at your wedding?
Prosecutor: My father wasn't awaiting trial on forty seven RICO predicates 
including murder.
%
Tony Soprano: Well, here I am. Back.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Yup.
Tony Soprano: So, let me ask you right off, is there any chance of a mercy fuck?
%
Tony Soprano: Gloom is your business and business is good.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You were shot Anthony, by a member of your family.
Tony Soprano: I know.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: And unless I know absolutely nothing about what I'm doing, 
I think you and I'll have a lot to talk about. Are you familiar with the term, 
"post-traumatic stress"?
Tony Soprano: I get it, okay? My uncle tried ta kill me...for the second time. 
Three strikes and I'm out right?
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Allegra... ain't that a cold medicine?
Paulie Walnuts: Means happiness in Italian.
Christopher Moltisanti: The fuck's that got to do with cold medicine?
%
Phil Leotardo: I'll tell ya one thing and I'm not ashamed ta say it. My 
estimation of John Sacrimoni as a man just fuckin' plummeted.
Tony Soprano: Give 'im a break, will ya? It's an emotional day...
Phil Leotardo: Ta cry like a woman? It's a fuckin' disgrace.
Paulie Walnuts: His fuckin' coach turned into a pumpkin. Heh heh.
Phil Leotardo: Well, even Cinderella didn't cry...
Tony Soprano: Look, when it comes to daughters, all bets are off. I've seen 
tougher guys than John cry at weddings.
Phil Leotardo: Yeah, well let me ask you this. If they can make him cry and if 
he's that weak, what the fuck else can they make 'im do?
Christopher Moltisanti: I gotta agree with Phil, Ton'.
Tony Soprano: Oh, you do, do ya?
%
Christopher Moltisanti: You are not gonna fuckin' believe this.
James Zancone: Vito Spatafore's an ass muncher.
Paulie Walnuts: Oh!!!
Silvio Dante: What?
Tony Soprano: What'd you just say?
James Zancone: I'm sorry, it's true.
Christopher Moltisanti: We ran into this kid. Vito was spotted in a fag bar in 
New York.
Tony Soprano: By who?
Christopher Moltisanti: The kid's cousin. Allegedly.
James Zancone: Probably bullshit.
Silvio Dante: He's a married man.
Paulie Walnuts: With a goomar!
Tony Soprano: Aight, back up a second. What'd the kid say exactly?
Christopher Moltisanti: The kid's cousin, Sal Iacuzzo-
Carlo Gervasi: From Yonkers, I know him.
Christopher Moltisanti: Sal was at this place in the city, supposedly on 
business. He saw Vito holdin' hands with a guy in nipple rings.
James Zancone: You're leavin' out the best part.
Christopher Moltisanti: He was wearin' a motorcycle outfit, like the guy in the 
Village People with the leather hat and the vest.
James Zancone: Chaps too.
Paulie Walnuts: I dunno. Fucking slander, ask me.
Tony Soprano: All right, lets take this in the back.
James Zancone: Yeah, that's what Vito did.
Tony Soprano: (to James) You can go. (Everyone except for James goes to the 
back)
Paulie Walnuts: Tell you one thing, if it was me this kid was spreadin' rumors 
about, he'd have somethin' up his own ass. And it wouldn't be no cock either.
Carlo Gervasi: That's the point though. This guy Sal, I know him. He's a friend 
o' ours.
Christopher Moltisanti: I fuckin' called it, long time ago.
Tony Soprano: You knew Vito was a ricchione'?
Christopher Moltisanti: Yes.
Tony Soprano: When?
Christopher Moltisanti: I never said it, but I knew.
Tony Soprano: Eh, get the fuck out, huh. And, and, Enough o' this rush ta 
judgment. For all we know this fuckin' Sal guy's got a hard-on for Vito. (Chris 
laughs) Oh, you think this is funny, huh? There's a man's reputation at stake 
here.
Paulie Walnuts: A married man, with kids.
Carlo Gervasi: Nah, that don't mean shit. Elton John was married.
Silvio Dante: Yeah, Rock Hudson too. I think.
Christopher Moltisanti: So, whatta we gotta do Ton', actually see him take it 
in the ass?
Tony Soprano: Get Vito on the phone. (Patsy tries to call Vito)
Silvio Dante: You know, he called me the other night. Three o'clock in the 
morning after the wedding.
Tony Soprano: And?
Silvio Dante: Eh, honestly, it was weird. He wanted to know what was goin' on.
Christopher Moltisanti: He was fuckin' fishin'. See if we heard.
Patsy Parisi: Straight ta voice mail. (Patsy hangs up)
Silvio Dante: Ton', I mean, he represents us.
Tony Soprano: I'm gonna condemn the man off the word o' some fuckin' douchebag 
from Yonkers.
Patsy Parisi: I could care less, basically.
Paulie Walnuts: Yeah? Maybe you're a flambe? (Patsy sticks his middle finger at 
Paulie)
Carlo Gervasi: Fuckin' nauseating. It's up to me, I'd drag Vito behind my 
fuckin' car right now.
Tony Soprano: Oh, will you take it easy over there, fuckin' Judge Roy Bean?
Silvio Dante: One of my bar girls knows his goomar. We'll check with her. Maybe 
she's seen 'im and knows where he is. Loren. (Patsy leaves)
Carlo Gervasi: Think about it, though, Ton'. Sudden weight loss.
Paulie Walnuts: AIDS?
Tony Soprano: Nobody's got AIDS. Now I don't wanna hear that word in here again.
%
Corky Caporale: I hear fat Vito's been ridin' up the Hershey Highway.
Christopher Moltisanti: Where'd ya get that?
Corky Caporale: Come on.
Christopher Moltisanti: Somebody started a joke. I won't mention any names. 
There's no truth to it.
Corky Caporale: Oh.
Christopher Moltisanti: It's a fuckin' captain you're talkin' about. People 
went to see 'im, he was down the shore with his goomar.
Corky Caporale: So it's bullshit then.
Christopher Moltisanti: As soon as he saw 'em, he took off like a bat outta 
hell.
Corky Caporale: Fuck. (They laugh)
Christopher Moltisanti: You didn't hear it from me.
Corky Caporale: It could be a mid-life thing.
Christopher Moltisanti: Suckin' a cock?
%
Tony Soprano: He's a fa-ag!
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: And?
Tony Soprano: Now what am I supposed ta do?
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: About what?
Tony Soprano: I know what. They're born that way, right? It's not their fault. 
Frankly, I think they go about in pity for themselves.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I don't think they see it as a fault.
Tony Soprano: In your circle, I'm sure you got all kinds of uh, gays, and uh, 
trans-whatevers of all stripes. But not where I come from.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You personally, how do you feel about homosexuality?
Tony Soprano: I find it disgusting. Men kissin' men, holdin' hands in the 
street. Every fuckin' TV show now, they rub your nose in it. Although, that, 
the lesbian thing with the, uh, Jennifer Beals, it's not bad. She a dyke in 
real life? I don't give too much of a shit, what people do behind closed doors 
with the consentin' adults. Although, don't forget, I'm a strict Catholic. I 
agree with that Senator Sanitorium, says if we let this stuff go too far, 
pretty soon we'll be fuckin' dogs.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I hear a lot of ambivalence.
Tony Soprano: This guy that got outed, look, the guys that look for me are 
askin' fer head. (pause) His head, what the fuck. You know, him and me, we're 
in the construction business. Now some o' these union old-timers, the 
contractors, they're not gonna wanna be seen with him. And I'm talkin' huge 
deals, major fuckin' dollars.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: A lot of your circle must have done jail time. They can't 
be strangers to male-male sexual contact.
Tony Soprano: Well you get a pass fer that.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Well, that's nice.
Tony Soprano: Well, what are ya gonna do? There's no women there. Y-y-you're 
there five, ten years. And just for the record, my, uhh, incarceration was very 
short term, so I never had any need for any anal-you know.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: So this fellow who's been outed, what's he saying?
Tony Soprano: You think I'm lyin' don't you? About when I was in jail.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I've given you no indication I think you're lying.
Tony Soprano: What the fuck, I suppose somethin' inside me says God bless, 
a'salut'. Who gives a shit? I mean, I had a second chance. Why shouldn't he?
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Part of your new outlook?
Tony Soprano: Maybe.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I salute it then.
Tony Soprano: Tall fuckin' order, I'll tell ya that.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: How so?
Tony Soprano: Well, you can talk about every day bein' a gift and uh, stoppin' 
ta smell the roses, but regular life's got a way pickin' away at it. Your 
house. The shit you own. It drags you down. Your kids. What they want. One bad 
idea after another. Just tryin' ta work a cell phone menu is enough to make you 
scream.
%
Silvio Dante: Lemme ask you a question. Before he cornered you in the 
porta-potty, when the security guard was suckin' him off-
Finn DeTrolio: Whoah one sec, it-it was the other way around.
Paulie Walnuts: What?!
Finn DeTrolio: Vito was blowing the security guard.
Paulie Walnuts: Son of a bitch!!!
Carlo Gervasi: Catchin', not pitchin'?
Finn DeTrolio: He's not gonna know I told you?
Paulie Walnuts: You ain't gonna have no problem from Vito, believe me.
Finn DeTrolio: What are ya gonna do?
Christopher Moltisanti: It'll be okay. Get him ta pay for some therapy.
Tony Soprano: (to Finn) Look, why don't you, uh, go out front, just get 
yourself a sandwich, any kind ya like huh? Soda. And, when we're done here, 
somebody'll take you back. Alright. (Finn leaves)
Christopher Moltisanti: (laughs) I wanna kill the fat faggot myself! Be a 
fuckin' honor. Cut off his pisciatil' and feed it to 'im.
Tony Soprano: There can be no mistake now.
Paulie Walnuts: I can't believe I stuck up for 'im! I feel like I've been 
stabbed in the heart.
Bobby Baccilieri: Well, we can't have 'im here in our social club no more. I 
mean, that much I do know.
Carlo Gervasi: Social club? He's gotta go!
Tony Soprano: I wanna think about it.
Bobby Baccilieri: Yeah, I-I don't know.
Paulie Walnuts: (Paulie stands up) What the fuck?! What is there ta think about?
Tony Soprano: Sit down. (to Paulie)
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck that! I'll say it again! What the fuck is there ta think 
about?
Tony Soprano: You gonna take care of his kids, huh, after he's gone?
Christopher Moltisanti: It's true. They didn't do nothin'. Poor little guys.
Tony Soprano: Now sit down. (to Paulie)
Paulie Walnuts: I'm sorry if I yelled T, it's just, how much more betrayal can 
I take?
Christopher Moltisanti: (laughing) Vito a fag. Big construction tycoon. Ton', 
when he was always talkin' about "greasin' the union," who knew, that's what he 
meant? (does jerk off notion with his hand and Patsy Parisi laughs hard in 
response)
Tony Soprano: Alright, this stays in these four walls. Understood?
%
Finn DeTrolio: You weren't there for the "grand inquisition" about Vito.
Meadow Soprano: Uh, I knew it. I'm picking the fight.
Finn DeTrolio: I was in the back of a butcher shop with your Uncle Paulie, 
ratting out a guy, I don't really even know. I mean, what do you think's gonna 
happen to Vito, for being gay? And don't give me any of that "poverty of the 
Mezzogiorno" bullshit. We're in fucking Caldwell, New Jersey, and you're on 
your high horse about justice? They are gonna mete it out themselves.
%
Tony Soprano: You lost your fuckin' mind? The shit you're in with that kid, 
which you brought on yourself.
Artie Bucco: Brought on myself? Oh, I suppose you let a certain element into 
your world, you're askin' for it.
Tony Soprano: Oh!
Artie Bucco: Jesus fuckin' Christ. How could you pull that scam at my place?
Tony Soprano: Come on, you know I woulda never let that happen if I'd known.
Artie Bucco: You're innocent. I get it. I'm just another victim of "Benny 
Fazio: Criminal Mastermind."
Tony Soprano: That's right. The moment you found out, instead of puttin' him in 
the ER, you shoulda come to me. He says he's gonna kill you Artie.
Artie Bucco: I can't take American Express now Tony. You know what that means? 
I have to start with the fuckin' "two-fors." My accountant insisted, ya happy? 
Life's not fair, right I know. But somehow, I believed my dad's crap about 
honest work. He used ta say ta me, "You'll see, pay's off in the end." What a 
joke.
Tony Soprano: I hate ta see you like this. You know that. 'Cuz you start 
thinkin' crazy shit!
%
Phil Leotardo: Sure, we break some balls here tonight, but I go way back. And 
in light of recent humiliations, it's an honor to be joined by men, and not 
faggot ass corn-holin' cocksuckers like married my cousin. He should fuckin' 
die!
Tony Soprano: Whoah whoah whoah. Phil!
Gerry Torciano: Take it easy. Phil, you know the wine makes you emotional.
Phil Leotardo: 'Cuz I got an empty fuckin' stomach.
Tony Soprano: So have a breadstick.
Patsy Parisi: Forty Five minutes for some grilled eggplant?
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ. Is there nothin' without this complainin'?
%
Benny Fazio: Hey Artie. Come here.
Artie Bucco: You ready ta order?
Benny Fazio: Why you kickin' her ass like that?
Artie Bucco: If you're referrin' to the fact that she's my employee and I'm 
tellin' her what to do, last time I checked, that's the way it works.
Benny Fazio: She thinks you want her ta cry. I said not true.
Artie Bucco: She told you that? 'Cuz you two talk all the time...
Benny Fazio: Yeah, so what?
Artie Bucco: So maybe you should hire her.
Benny Fazio: I know how to treat people.
Artie Bucco: You're a people person, obviously.
Benny Fazio: I am. And when they're good to me, they get treats. And when 
they're not, well I got this severence thing I do, it's a complete break 
actually.
Artie Bucco: Ohohohohohohohohoho. I get it. Uhuh. See 'cuz you talked around 
that bit so much, I almost missed it.
%
Benny Fazio: Artie? You know what time it is?
Artie Bucco: We need to talk.
Benny Fazio: Now? My wife is pregnant. She needs to sleep.
Artie Bucco: Martina told me about your little credit card business. Step 
outside man.
Benny Fazio: I'll be outside a minute honey. Look, you're upset, alright. But 
it's not my fault that little trick got greedy.
Artie Bucco: Oh, so she's a little trick, huh? (Artie shoves Benny)
Benny Fazio: I was gonna cut you in, but now you're actin' stupid.
Artie Bucco: Regular people are all fuckin' stupid? (Artie heavily shoves Benny 
and Benny reciprocates with a hard punch as the fist fight ensues)
Benny Fazio: You want some more? (Artie lunges at Benny, takes him down, and 
batters his face with an onslaught of heavy punches)
Artie Bucco: Piece of dog shit. Little greasy motherfuckin' meatball dog shit. 
Poo. (Artie spits on Benny's battered body and performs some angry punch moves) 
I'm stupid...? (Artie leaves)
%
Artie Bucco: Benny, can I get you a Martina?
Benny Fazio: 'Scuse me?
Artie Bucco: A Martina. It's like a Martini, but it's from Albania.
Jen Fazio: Hmph. I never heard of it.
Artie Bucco: Well, apparently, they go down real easy, right Benny?
Benny Fazio: (staring at Artie) We're gonna look at the menu.
Artie Bucco: Good enough. (Artie leaves)
%
Marie Spatafore: (she receives a call and the caller i.d. is "Thad McCone") 
Hello?
Vito Spatafore: (on phone) Hey, it's me.
Marie Spatafore: Where are you? Who's Thad McCone?
Vito Spatafore: Some guy.
Marie Spatafore: Oh, my God! Vito...
Vito Spatafore: Not that. I'm just borrowin' his phone. Listen, Marie, I'm 
sorry all this had ta happen. I never meant ta hurt you.
Marie Spatafore: Come back, Vito. Just come back.
Vito Spatafore: It's a little more complicated than that.
Marie Spatafore: Please, Phil said it'll be all right. We could get you help. 
We could get you psychiatric help.
Vito Spatafore: Phil? I trust him least of all.
Marie Spatafore: How can you say that? He's family. He loves you.
Vito Spatafore: Not anymore. Believe me.
%
Tony Soprano: Hey, Mrs. Conte. Como esta? How's the hip?
Mrs. Conte: Hey, Anthony. Oh, I need your help.
Tony Soprano: What?
Mrs. Conte: Those nigger fuckin' whores, they play that music so loud.
Tony Soprano: Now that's not nice. Now those are Puerto Ricans, Mrs. Conte.
Mrs. Conte: I ask 'em nice ta turn it down. They tell me ta go fuck myself.
Tony Soprano: Aight. I'll see what I can do.
Mrs. Conte: Thanks. Hey, how's Junior? Tell 'im I said hello.
Tony Soprano: Yeah.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Sociologists say that twenty six is in fact the new twenty 
one.
Tony Soprano: And the new twenty six is what? I'm forty six, so that means I'm 
what, thirty five?
%
Tony Soprano: What can I do for you Phil?
Phil Leotardo: Vito...do we know where he's at?
Tony Soprano: Well that really doesn't concern you. How's John?
Phil Leotardo: I dunno. Fine, through his vale of tears. But 
seriously...Vito...what's being done about 'im?
Tony Soprano: Well, like I just said, it's none of your fuckin' business 'cause 
he works for me, not you.
Phil Leotardo: He's married to my cousin. He dishonored me personally.
Tony Soprano: What do you want me ta do...put out an APB on the guy 'cause he 
takes it up the ass, huh? It's a victimless crime.
Phil Leotardo: Marie is a victim. Her children are victims. They've done 
nothing. And they're forced to live with the shame and humiliation. I gotta be 
frank, in your father's day, we wouldn't be havin' this conversation. A finook 
in his crew, he knew how ta handle that.
Tony Soprano: I sympathize with Marie, and the children, okay? But don't you 
fuckin' tell me what to do. You're only actin' boss.
Phil Leotardo: I swallowed my pride when your murderin' fuck of a cousin killed 
my brother. Don't think I'm gonna do it twice.
Tony Soprano: Phillip, lets not make a beef where there isn't one. 
Fundamentally, we are in agreement on this issue, but I'll handle it.
%
Anthony Junior: My stomach hurts.
Tony Soprano: (furious) You stupid fuckin' moron. You realize what could've 
happened ta you...if we didn't have connections? Some cop goes by the book and 
they charge you with attempted murder! Your hear me?! Attempted murder! Then 
what? Then what?
Anthony Junior: So he shot you! You just gonna let him fuckin' get away with 
it?!
Tony Soprano: I told you that's my business, not yours! And what did you do? 
Nothin'! Zero! A big fuckin' jerkoff!
Anthony Junior: Fuck you!
Tony Soprano: I oughta break your fuckin' neck! Stop cryin'. Stop cryin'! I 
guess your heart was in the right place, A.J. But it's wrong. Come on.
Anthony Junior: What?
Tony Soprano: It's not in yout nature.
Anthony Junior: No...you don't know me. Aight, you don't know anything about me!
Tony Soprano: You're a nice guy and that's a good thing for Chrissakes!
Anthony Junior: Bullshit!
Tony Soprano: I mean it. You're a good guy. I'm very grateful.
Anthony Junior: Well, you're a fuckin' hypocrite, aight, 'cause every time we 
watch "Godfather," when Michael Corleone shoots those guys at the restaurant, 
those assholes who tried ta kill his dad, you sit there with your fucking bowl 
o' ice cream and you say it's your favorite scene of all time!
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ, A.J. I mean, you make me wanna cry. It's a movie. 
Ya gotta grow up. You're not a kid anymore. You hear me, you...you...you gotta 
grow up. (A.J. throws up) Get in the car. First of all, your mother does not 
find out about this.
%
Paulie Walnuts: (on phone) Yeah.
Little Paulie Germani: (on phone) Paulie, it's me. We had a problem down here, 
the ride...the Teacups...or whatever, a bolt busted. Thing jammed up. Some 
people got hurt.
Paulie Walnuts: Where's the guy who owns it?
Little Paulie Germani: He's talkin' ta the cops.
Paulie Walnuts: Fine. Fuck it. What'dya want from me?
Little Paulie Germani: It's pretty bad Paulie. Lady broke her wrist. Some 
Puerto Rican kid lost some...some teeth.
Paulie Walnuts: Ah...what am I, a fuckin' dentist?
Little Paulie Germani: I don't know, I thought you'd wanna...know. Maybe come 
down or somethin'.
Paulie Walnuts: I gotta be up in the mornin'. I got my fuckin' biopsy.
Little Paulie Germani: A'right. I...I'll take care of it.
%
Bobby Baccalieri: (angrily, at Paulie) Hey cocksucka!!! You hire some 
fly-by-night piece of shit and you don't tell nobody?
Jason Molinaro: Whoa, Bobby!
Paulie Walnuts: What the fuck you talkin' about?
Bobby Baccalieri: You know what I'm talkin' about, you cheap fuck!
Paulie Walnuts: Ohhhh!!!
Patsy Parisi: Bobby, come on!
Bobby Baccalieri: Hey, everybody wants to get rich, but you don't scrimp on 
safety.
Paulie Walnuts: Mind ya business, Bobby!
Bobby Baccalieri: My baby girl was in that car. You owe me money, Paulie!
Paulie Walnuts: I owe you shit!
Bobby Baccalieri: My wife's got nerve damage!
Paulie Walnuts: Fuck her too!
Bobby Baccalieri: Get the fuck off me!
%
Nucci Gualtieri: Is it true what they're saying?
Paulie Walnuts: Who? About what?
Nucci Gualtieri: The ride, the one that broke. You need to make a novena, 
Paulie. Those poor children.
Paulie Walnuts: What are you talkin' about?
Nucci Gualtieri: You let Saint Elzear go without his hat.
Paulie Walnuts: Will you listen ta this? Fuck that voodoo, huh?
Nucci Gualtieri: You cursed your mother, a blessed nun.
Paulie Walnuts: She had it comin'. Ya both did.
Nucci Gualtieri: I didn't bring you up like that.
Paulie Walnuts: You're a fake. That's how you brung me up. Fuck the two o' yous.
%
Liz La Cerva: Carmela Soprano. How's your daughter?
Carmela Soprano: Fine.
Liz La Cerva: Well, mine is dead.
Carmela Soprano: Oh my God, when? What happened?
Liz La Cerva: When? That piece of shit, your nephew.
Carmela Soprano: They broke up, Liz. She ran off.
Liz La Cerva: She doesn't call me for almost two years? My birthday? Christmas?
Carmela Soprano: You two always did have a very difficult relationship.
Liz La Cerva: The FBI came to my home. You'd be amazed at the questions they 
asked me.
Carmela Soprano: Liz...
Liz La Cerva: They admitted...they think that he killed her.
Carmela Soprano: Come on, Liz...you're drunk.
Liz La Cerva: Drunk? It's called depression. I haven't had a drink in years.
%
Carmela Soprano: I ran into Liz La Cerva at the feast.
Tony Soprano: Yeah...
Carmela Soprano: She has got it in her head that Christopher killed Adriana.
Tony Soprano: Uhuh...what? That's insane.
Carmela Soprano: I know. Then again, he does have a history of being free with 
his hands.
Tony Soprano: Oh, that makes him O.J.? She was probably drunk Carm.
Carmela Soprano: I really don't think she was.
Tony Soprano: Alright...let me school you on domestic violence, okay? First and 
foremost, there's always a body. And ninety nine out of a hundred, and this 
comes straight from my cop buddies, it happens either in the bedroom or in the 
kitchen. He killed her, believe me with the forensics they got nowadays, 
the...uh...fibers, we'd know about it.
Carmela Soprano: The FBI came to her house, Liz.
Tony Soprano: That's exactly my point. If they thought he did it, how fast do 
ya think they'd haul his ass in? Sour grapes, Carm. He dumps her daughter, all 
of a sudden he's Scott fuckin' Peterson.
Carmela Soprano: I thought Ade dumped him.
Tony Soprano: You know what I mean. She was a sweet girl, Ade. But the two of 
them together was a toxic relationship.
Carmela Soprano: Yeah, they did have a rough time of it.
Tony Soprano: And he's doin' great, Christopher. He's a different person. He's 
married. He's got a kid on the way. He's focused. Let's not sabotage his 
progress.
%
Janice Soprano: You punish Bobby because he's my husband.
Tony Soprano: Will you stop, huh?
Janice Soprano: To be his age and not to be a captain.
Tony Soprano: Oh...now I see what this little visit's all about.
Janice Soprano: He works so hard for you...and what does he get, merciless 
ridicule...about his weight, about his model railroading.
Tony Soprano: He's a grown man!
Janice Soprano: Oh, but it's okay for Neil Young!
Tony Soprano: He owns Lionel!
%
Carlo Gervasi: Anyway, Bobby's vision's fucked now. They're hopin' the repair 
will take. I mean, he could be a candidate for a cornea transplant.
Tony Soprano: He should be a candidate for a brain transplant.
%
Anthony Infante: Listen, as far as that thing goes...the coffee with the 
chicory...
Johnny Sack: The fuck is that?
Anthony Infante: Oh shit. I suck at talkin' like this John, I'm sorry. Our 
friend with the stomach.
Johnny Sack: In town or near home?
Anthony Infante: Your neighbor. A.S.
Johnny Sack: Yeah, all right. Just say the thing I asked you to do. The coffee 
with the fuckin' chicory. Is he gonna get it for me?
Anthony Infante: Yes. Bad news is that he wants ten cups for himself. Not seven.
Johnny Sack: Alright. Done. Did you pick up the birthday cake for Gin with the 
marzipan flowers?
Anthony Infante: The stuff behind the pool?
Johnny Sack: No, an actual fuckin' cake. It's her birthday.
%
Tony Soprano: Guys her age were always buyin' me ice cream, givin' me baseball 
cards. Kissin' my ass to get in good with her.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Sounds a little like jealousy.
Tony Soprano: No guy wants his sister to be the town pump.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You weren't sexually threatened?
Tony Soprano: Oh, Jesus Christ. Will you make up your fuckin' sick mind? First 
it's my mother, now I wanna fuck my sister?
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: It's normal, not sick. That she functioned as the focus of 
your early sexual feelings. In fact, it was probably mutual.
Tony Soprano: Oh, Jesus Christ.
%
Phil Leotardo: Fuckin' nauseating!
Albie Cianflone: Could've been worse. He could have flipped.
Phil Leotardo: Are you fuckin' kiddin' me?! You don't ever admit the existence 
of this thing. Ever!
Dominic Gamiello: He should've stood trial like a man.
Phil Leotardo: I did twenty fuckin' years.
%
Vito Spatafore: (standing) Tony...hey.
Tony Soprano: (sitting) What the fuck?!
Vito Spatafore: My brother's over there!
Tony Soprano: What's that supposed ta mean?
Vito Spatafore: Nuthin. He's just there, that's all.
Tony Soprano: You sandbag me, I cut your fuckin' throat open.
Vito Spatafore: I'm sorry. I didn't know what else ta do. I want back in. Can I 
sit?
Tony Soprano: No you can't sit!
Vito Spatafore: It was complicated, I was workin' things out.
Tony Soprano: I'm sure it gets complicated, when you're taking it up your fag 
ass.
Vito Spatafore: I'm not a fag, I never was.
Tony Soprano: 'Scuse me?
Vito Spatafore: It was the medication I was on. For my blood pressure. It 
fucked with my head, but I'm over that now. I could probably get a letter from 
my doctor.
Tony Soprano: A note from your doctor sayin' you don't like to suck cock?
Vito Spatafore: First off. I pay my way back in. I got two hundred K that goes 
directly to you, personally. No one else needs to know. Long term...I know 
construction's out. Those guys...but Meth, running girls, a lot more tolerant 
atmosphere. I got contacts in A.C. With your support, I could set myself up 
there. I'd be close, but not too close. Ton'. Please, don't turn your back on 
me. (Tony leaves)
%
Bobby Baccilieri: Vito. He was found beat to death this morning in a motel in 
Fort Lee. My cop up there told me.
Patsy Parisi: Minchia.
Bobby Baccilieri: Plus the homicide detectives told him Vito had a pool cue 
rammed up his ass.
%
Tony Soprano: How 'bout the fact that I hate my son? I come home, he's sittin' 
on the computer in his underwear...wastin' his time in some chitchat room goin' 
back an' forth with some other fuckin' jerkoff... gigglin' like a little school 
girl. I wanna fuckin' smash his fuckin' face in.
%
Dominic Gamiello: That pool cue, I wonder if it was chalked. (about the one 
shoved up Vito's ass when he was killed)
Silvio Dante: Very funny Dom. Very cute. I don't quite get it, but cute.
Dominic Gamiello: Hey you know the autopsy found a three ball in his side 
pocket.
Carlo Gervasi: You're on a run.
Dominic Gamiello: They found a hanky with Carlo's lipstick in his other pocket. 
I'm just breakin' balls. You're right though...shouldn't laugh about a tragedy. 
That old homo actor Raymond Navarro, had an ivory dildo stuck up his ass when 
they found 'im.
Silvio Dante: Pretty up on all this shit, huh Dom?
Dominic Gamiello: Come to think of it, he was from Jersey too.
Carlo Gervasi: What'd they find up your mother's cunt?
Silvio Dante: Time ta hit the trail for Metuchen, huh, whaddya say?
Dominic Gamiello: My mistake. Carlo's lipstick was on Vito's cock.
Silvio Dante: (Silvio slams Dominic in the back of the head and a fight ensues 
where Carlo and Silvio attack Dominic at the same time) Hit 'im! Hit this prick.
Dominic Gamiello: Carlo, no!! Carlo!!! (Carlo stabs Dominic numerous times, 
killing him)
%
Tony Soprano: Tomorrow morning seven a.m. you go to this address, you ask for a 
Mr. Caravalho. I just got off the phone with him.
Anthony Junior: At seven in the morning? For what?
Tony Soprano: You're gonna be workin' construction.
Anthony Junior: What?
Tony Soprano: Ferryin' cement in a wheelbarrow.
Anthony Junior: So it's outdoors?
Tony Soprano: Yeah.
Anthony Junior: Well, it's wintertime.
Tony Soprano: You got a lot o' those hooded sweatshirts. Like the mulignans 
wear that you watch on MTV. You can double up.
Anthony Junior: Come on, this is bullshit.
Tony Soprano: Every penny you make, you keep. We won't charge you any rent. And 
believe me, the pay is good, it's a union job. I just wanna see you do good. 
You're my son and I love you.
Anthony Junior: Look, I'm just gonna have to leave your friend in the lurch 
when I go back to school.
Tony Soprano: That's okay. He deals with that all the time.
Anthony Junior: I'd just as soon keep searching online.
Tony Soprano: I'm sure you would. But if you're not at that site tomorrow 
morning, I'm gonna take away your car, and then I'm gonna take away your 
clothes. And then I'm gonna take away your room and I'm gonna take away your 
mother's cookin'. And pretty soon you're gonna be on the fuckin' street. (Tony 
steps away, grabs a helmet and smashes it into AJ's car window)
Anthony Junior: What the hell are you doing?
Tony Soprano: It might get a little drafty drivin' down there tomorrow. But I 
will have this fuckin' thing towed out o' here and ground up into fuckin' 
Brillo pads. I mean, look at it, you don't take care of it. Don't put me to the 
test.
%
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: As we know, Phil asked me to arrange this meeting 
after the fire in his wire room.
Phil Leotardo: Correction. You asked me to fuckin' attend. I agreed.
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Fair enough. Now I won't call it a sit-down because 
of the inclement negative implications. Let's think of it as...a meeting of 
minds. Now for whatever reason, certain incidents have expired lately that in 
addition to being dangerous could have an adverse impact on our respective 
bottom lines.
Phil Leotardo: I know Vito's bottom was impacted if that's what you're 
referring to.
Tony Soprano: Call him what you will but you're talkin' about one of my 
captains.
Phil Leotardo: Captain? The Good Ship Lollipop, right?
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Phil, please.
Phil Leotardo: Please, my ass. The man was a fuckin' disgrace.
Tony Soprano: Well, before he came outta the closet, he worked for me. And he 
put a lot of money in my pocket. And yours too.
Phil Leotardo: Talk about earners? How 'bout Fat Dom Gamiello?
Silvio Dante: What about 'im?
Phil Leotardo: He's M.I.A. A lot of people are concerned for his well-being.
Tony Soprano: So what the fuck would I know about that?
Phil Leotardo: Well as coincidence would have it, he was last seen in New 
Jersey.
Tony Soprano: So was the Hindenburg. Maybe you wanna look into that too.
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Tony, please. Phil. We're gettin' off point. I grew 
up in this, guys. And I just lost my friend Rusty. And for reasons I will 
discern in time, believe me. If there's one thing my father taught me, it's 
this...a pint of blood costs more than a gallon of gold. My business...all of 
our businesses...this infighting's costing money.
Tony Soprano: I'm willin' ta move forward. Let the past be bygones.
Phil Leotardo: Fine with me.
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: A wise decision...on both your parts. Now what I'd 
love to see is a truce. Wipe the slate clean. The no-shows. The wire room. 
Vito...put it all behind us.
Tony Soprano: Yeah...
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Your brother Billy, whatever happened there...
Tony Soprano: All right then...
Phil Leotardo: "Whatever happened there?"
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: The shooting...
Phil Leotardo: "Whatever happened there?"
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: God rest his soul, huh?
Phil Leotardo: I'll tell you what fuckin' happened. This piece of shit's 
cousin...
Tony Soprano: Calm down Phil.
Phil Leotardo: ...Put six bullets in the kid without any provocation whatsoever!
Tony Soprano: My cousin's dead.
Phil Leotardo: Fuck you!
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: Phil, hey we were makin' headway here. I didn't mean 
to say...
Phil Leotardo: Fuck what you meant, cocksucka! Come on! (Phil and his gang 
leaves)
Tony Soprano: Jesus Christ, Carmine. What the fuck? Why would you possibly 
bring that up?
%
Gerry Torciano: Don't get me wrong, I loved Dom more than anybody. My point is 
we don't know if Tony was behind this.
Phil Leotardo: It's payback for Vito.
Gerry Torciano: So why the fuck did they blow up the wire room?
Albie Cianflone: Balls on this prick...
Butch DeConcini: To blow up a store...you call that balls? Balls is you look a 
guy in the eye while you jam a ice pick through his lung.
Albie Cianflone: I meant balls as in "nerve," "gall."
Butch DeConcini: I know what the fuck you meant. Far as I'm concerned, this is 
like nine eleven. Tony wanted our attention? Fine. He got our attention. Now we 
wipe 'im off the planet.
Phil Leotardo: You know that fat cocksucker says I look like the Shah of Iran?
Butch DeConcini: Who does?
Gerry Torciano: Tony...
Albie Cianflone: I never got that at all...
Phil Leotardo: Fat piece o' shit.
Butch DeConcini: It's irrelevant, Phil. But he's testin' you...all the time. 
And you keep indulgin' him.
Phil Leotardo: You're right. But whack a boss? I won't do that.
Butch DeConcini: It's been done before.
Phil Leotardo: And it was wrong then.
Butch DeConcini: Eye for an eye then, huh? Pick somebody over there.
%
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You came out of that shooting feeling each day is a gift. 
Well, this is a corollary to that.
Tony Soprano: A what?
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You don't have to eat every dish of rigatoni. You don't 
have to fuck every female you meet.
%
Carmela Soprano: I told you. I had another dream about Ade in Paris. A French 
policeman told me she was dead and I had to tell her.
Tony Soprano: I know, Carm. Pepe Le Pew.
%
Julianna Skiff: (after sex with Chris) You ruined my dress.
Christopher Moltisanti: Save it. Like Monica Lewinsky. Show your friends how 
hard you made me come.
%
Tony Soprano: (About killing a person) You know, come ta think of it, you never 
popped your cherry in that regard, right?
Bobby Baccilieri: No.
Tony Soprano: Yet your old man was the fuckin' terminator.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: (about playing Monopoly) You know, the Parker Brothers took 
time ta think this all out. I think we should respect that.
Janice Soprano: Fuck the Parker Brothers. Just play the game.
%
Bobby Baccilieri: (After Tony makes a joke about Janice) Oh! What about my 
wife!?
Tony Soprano: You married her.
Bobby Baccilieri: She's my home. No more talkin' like that!
Janice Soprano: It's okay Bobby.
Bobby Baccilieri: Stay outta this! You Sopranos. You go too far.
Tony Soprano: Alright, you know, Jan. He's right, I'm sorry. I crossed the 
line, I apologize...won't happen again.
%
Janice Soprano: (After Bobby beats Tony up) What the fuck were you thinking?
Bobby Baccilieri: You're my wife. He insulted you.
Janice Soprano: I'm a big girl. I can take care o' myself. Oh God, he is head 
of the family. Do you think he's just gonna wake up tomorrow and forget about 
this?
%
Janice Soprano: (looking at Tony sitting outside after getting beat up by 
Bobby) Fuckin' look at him out there.
Bobby Baccilieri: What?
Janice Soprano: I've seen that sitting in the chair thing.
Bobby Baccilieri: Come on...people sit in chairs...
%
Gerry Torciano: All due respect, he's a great guy Doc, but boss material?
Silvio Dante: Important thing is we all work together, whoever winds up in the 
driver's seat.
Gerry Torciano: Phil will, I'll never get it. The man was my mentor, was right 
there for the taking.
Silvio Dante: His heart Gerry, what's he gonna do?
Gerry Torciano: That's my point though. What you just said. Johnny goes away, 
it's Phil's turn in the driver's seat and his heart gives out.
Silvio Dante: Right.
Gerry Torciano: His heart.
Silvio Dante: I know, what?
Gerry Torciano: It's a metaphor. He lost his balls is what I'm sayin'.
Silvio Dante: Just say it then. Walt fuckin' Whitman over here. (Their goomars 
come by) Ladies.
Gerry Torciano: Hey.
Silvio Dante: You alright?
Gerry Torciano: How you doin'?
Goomar: Should we get some more wine?
Gerry Torciano: Where's this fuckin' waiter, on sabbatical?
Silvio Dante: What's the name o' that sangovaise we had at quadrugate, huh, the 
night you- (Gerry Torciano gets gunned down by an assassin)
%
Tony Soprano: So how was Florida?
Phil Leotardo: Hot and sticky...like my balls.
%
Warren Feldman: (Johnny lies in bed) I don't know if you heard but...Gerry 
Torciano. He was hit last week in Brooklyn.
Johnny Sack: Who?
Warren Feldman: Gerry Torciano. Was all over the news. They whacked 'im in some 
restaurant. Did you know 'im?
Johnny Sack: Yeah...uh...um...good guy. So hard to breathe.
%
Christopher Moltisanti: The whole sequence with Sally Boy bangin' the fiance. 
You gotta tell Tony that was your idea.
J.T. Dolan: It wasn't my idea.
Christopher Moltisanti: What are you, fuckin' stupid now? He probably thinks I 
put it in there to embarrass him.
J.T. Dolan: Why did you put it in there?
Christopher Moltisanti: It was an idea. I don't know. Who knows where they 
fuckin' come from. Isaac Newton invented gravity 'cause some asshole hit 'im 
with an apple.
J.T. Dolan: It's bad enough that I don't get credit for my own ideas. Now I'm 
supposed ta take responsibilty for some shit that's gonna get me in trouble. 
Fuck that man. (Christopher lifts an award from J.T.'s counter)
Christopher Moltisanti: Human-itis award...? What's that?
J.T. Dolan: Humanitas. From the Paulus Brothers, for writing themes of socially 
redeeming- (Christopher slams the award on J.T.'s head) Ow!
Christopher Moltisanti: Look out the window! You see a fuckin' Hollywood sign 
out there? Maybe you talk ta your agent like that, but don't ever get fuckin' 
snippy on me again.
%
Phil Leotardo: That cocksuckin' piece o' shit, Tony Soprano's cousin, I can't 
even say his name, murdered Billy. And what did I do about it? My 
weakness...sometimes I think it's in my DNA. My family took shit from the 
Amerigans the minute we get off the boat.
Butch DeConcini: Come on, fuck you talkin' about?
Phil Leotardo: Leotardo, that's my fuckin' legacy...no more Butchy...no more o' 
this.
%
Carter Chong: Once in third grade, I got a ninety six on my spelling test, 
highest mark in the class, I was so proud. I brought it home to show my 
dad...what happened ta the other four points, he says. (Carter takes a pause) 
Fuck you! Fuck you! (Carter slams his fists together)
%
Tony Soprano: What the fuck is wrong with you?
Paulie Walnuts: What?
Tony Soprano: You tell some fuckin' goober your life story? We're supposed ta 
be layin' low!
%
Carter Chong: (Jameel brings pictures for Uncle Junior to sign) What do you do 
with those Jameel?
Jameel: Autographed pictures of the man who capped Tony Soprano? Shit, them 
mother fuckers go right on ebay.
%
Patient: (Junior is playing checkers with Carter) Heh. Checkers. The thinking 
man's game.
Uncle Junior: You lookin' for a smack in the fuckin' mouth.
Supervisor: Corrado. Language please.
Uncle Junior: What do you want?
Patient: If you'd move, perhaps I can reach the chess set.
Uncle Junior: And if I don't, what the fuck you gonna do then?
Patient: You don't intimidate me.
Supervisor: Corrado?
Uncle Junior: You're lucky she's here you little prick.
Patient: Naturally, you're only tough when there's an authority figure nearby 
so things won't go too far. Oh, how the mighty have fallen- (Uncle Junior beats 
the crap out of the patient) Ahhhh! Ahh!
Supervisor: Corrado!!!
Carter Chong: Get 'im! Get 'im!
Uncle Junior: How do ya like that, huh, fuckin' tough guy?! How do ya like 
that?! I'm gonna kill this prick!
%
Mrs. Chong: How are you feeling?
Carter Chong: Fine.
Mrs. Chong: Maybe you can clear something up. Dr. Mendel says you've been 
acting aggressively toward other patients.
Carter Chong: First of all, that is total fucking bullshit.
Mrs. Chong: Carter.
Carter Chong: And secondly, why don't you just lead off with that?
Mrs. Chong: What are you talking about?
Carter Chong: Instead of pretending you give a shit how I feel.
Mrs. Chong: Now apparently, you are becoming a bully. Dr. Mendel feels you're 
modeling your actions on the wrong people.
Carter Chong: Really, like who?
Mrs. Chong: You know who. That gangster. (Referring to Uncle Junior)
Carter Chong: You of all people should know not to believe what you read in the 
paper...all that crap they wrote about daddy.
Mrs. Chong: That was the Wall Street Journal. It was entirely different.
Carter Chong: It's never enough, is it? My whole time at M.I.T., you told me, 
get out and make friends, now I finally do learn to assert myself a 
little...suddenly that's a negative!
%
Tony Soprano: Listen, I gotta bring this up.
Phil Leotardo: A favor already?
Tony Soprano: 'Scuse me?
Phil Leotardo: Anthony, you always have business on your mind. Take a night. 
Smell the cognac.
Tony Soprano: Marie Spatafore came ta see me. She wants a hundred grand ta 
relocate on the count o' Vito Junior already has his own social worker.
Phil Leotardo: Pattie told me there was doin's. I guess the turd doesn't fall 
far from the faggot's ass.
Tony Soprano: That's beautifully put. But, you're family right? Cousins?
Phil Leotardo: What can you do, throw money at the problem?
Tony Soprano: Well somebody's gonna.
Phil Leotardo: I'll talk ta the kid. Set 'im right.
Tony Soprano: Good.
%
Tony Soprano: I don't know...I look at my key guys...Paulie, Christopher, my 
brother-in-law, what's number one on their agenda, you know? They're all 
fuckin' murderers for chrissakes.
%
Hesh Rabkin: Did you hear the one about the Jewish terrorist? He was gonna 
hijack a plane but he didn't wanna use his miles.
%
Tony Soprano: (to Carlo Gervasi) Maybe you should start suckin' cock instead o' 
watching TV land, 'cause Vito brought in three times what you do on 
construction. Yeah! And I didn't have this fuckin' problem!
%
Bobby Baccilieri: Speakin' o' loads. Hear the latest on Vito Junior.
Christopher Moltisanti: What?
Tony Soprano: Marie called. He got expelled 'cause he took a shit in the shower 
in gym class.
Paulie Walnuts: Oh!!!
Christopher Moltisanti: That sick little fuck!
Tony Soprano: You should see 'im. The makeup. Now without school, Marie says 
he's shut in his room all day.
Christopher Moltisanti: Probably thinkin' about how ta pull a Columbine.
%
Carmela Soprano: Anthony?
Anthony Junior: What?
Carmela Soprano: I am making French Toast.
Anthony Junior: I'm not hungry. Jesus, how many times are you gonna ask me?
Carmela Soprano: You heard the term "Comfort Food." Maybe it'll make you feel 
better.
Anthony Junior: I know this is hard for you to believe, but food may not be the 
answer to every problem.
Tony Soprano: Well, neither is actin' like a whiny little bitch.
%
Paulie Walnuts: What d'ya say we take a ride...little prime rib, on me.
Christopher Moltisanti: Maybe next time.
Paulie Walnuts: What, are you watchin' your cholesterol now too?
%
Paulie Walnuts: Lower your voice! I got neighbors!
Christopher Moltisanti: Fuck your neighbors! When you gonna pay me?
Paulie Walnuts: When you suck the money outta my ass! Now get the fuck out!
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Listen, I gotta talk ta you!
Tony Soprano: Now?
Christopher Moltisanti: It can't wait T, this fuckin' Paulie!
Bobby Baccilieri: What happened?
Christopher Moltisanti: He sent his idiot nephew and Jason Molinaro ta my 
father in law's store. They boosted a power to power source.
Tony Soprano: They did?
Christopher Moltisanti: Yeah. Not exactly, Al caught 'em while they were there.
Tony Soprano: So, they did or did not take the source?
Christopher Moltisanti: They did. Under false pretense.
Tony Soprano: And this is what you couldn't wait ta talk ta me about?
Christopher Moltisanti: They broke inta the guy's store T!
Tony Soprano: Yeah, I hear ya, I get it. But we're in the middle o' talkin' 
about an ongoing potentially multi million dollar proposition here Christopher.
Christopher Moltisanti: It ain't the money Ton'.
Tony Soprano: Oh really? Well I'm glad ya feel that way. Power ta drills, you 
believe this shit? Go have a Live Ricky or whatever the fuck it is you're 
drinkin' these days and we'll be done in a few minutes.
Christopher Moltisanti: Forget it, alright! I got other shit ta do!
%
Christopher Moltisanti: Hey.
Paulie Walnuts: How you doin' kid?
Christopher Moltisanti: How's Little Paulie?
Paulie Walnuts: He's fucked up. He got your flowers though.
Christopher Moltisanti: Good. Listen Paulie-
Paulie Walnuts: Forget it, okay? Shit happens, what are ya gonna do. There's no 
point ruminatin'.
Christopher Moltisanti: You're right, I just wanted ta say I'm sorry.
Paulie Walnuts: Me too.
%
Tony Soprano: (on phone) Alright, listen. Sweetheart, there's been an accident, 
We were comin' back from the city and Christopher's dead.
Carmela Soprano: (on phone) (Gasps) Oh my God!!!
Tony Soprano: Alright...Carm...
Carmela Soprano: What happened?
Tony Soprano: He drove off the road...and...and...and the car flipped over 
and...look, I'll tell you in detail.
Carmela Soprano: Are you okay?
Tony Soprano: I just banged my knee, you know the one from High School, I'm 
fine, but...he wasn't wearin' a belt.
Carmela Soprano: So where are you, Saint Claire's.
Tony Soprano: Listen, they're gonna call Kelli, if they haven't 
already...and...just get Al and Rita on the phone...and get 'em started already.
Carmela Soprano: Alright. Alright. Oh my God, Tony. He's dead?!
Tony Soprano: (pause) Yeah.
%
Silvio Dante: He didn't seem high did he?
Tony Soprano: Are you kiddin'? I've been furious. I woulda fuckin' strangled 
'im.
%
Tony Soprano: Get me a scotch.
Meadow Soprano: Are you serious?
Tony Soprano: Yeah. And have one yourself.
%
Tony Soprano: You alright?
Paulie Walnuts: I know I had my differences with that kid...but maybe I didn't 
do right by him neither. If you were his dad, I was his Dutch uncle. And what 
the fuck did I do but get pissed off? Fight with him over cocksuckin' fuckin' 
money. And break his balls when he tried not to have a drink...or a little 
taste o' snow.
Tony Soprano: It's over Paulie.
%
Tony Soprano: You know what? This is bullshit.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: What?
Tony Soprano: I haven't been able ta tell anybody this, but I'm fuckin' 
relieved.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Really?
Tony Soprano: He was a tremendous drag on my emotions...on my thoughts about 
the future. I mean, ta begin with...every mornin' I wake up thinkin' "is today 
the day that one o' my best friends is gonna dime me ta the FBI." And a weak 
fuckin' snivelin', lyin' drug addict? That's the worst kind o' bet. The biggest 
blunder o' my career is now gone. And I don't have ta be confronted by that 
fact no more. And as a relative, a friend, someone you can count on... (Tony 
does a non-caring notion with his hand)
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: I see.
Tony Soprano: Let me tell you somethin', I murdered friends before, even 
relatives. My cousin Tony...my best friend, Puss'...but this...
%
Anthony Junior: Fine. Bury your head in the sand.
Tony Soprano: How 'bout I bury yours in that fuckin' wall instead.
%
Agent Ron Goddard: You got a minute? We'd like ta show you some pictures.
Tony Soprano: Angelina Jolie, I hope.
%
Phil Leotardo: First off, it wasn't an offer. It's my position. Twenty five 
percent.
Tony Soprano: That's it?
Phil Leotardo: What else would you like me ta say?
Tony Soprano: Come on Phil, what...what's the problem? I come here on good 
faith. I make a reasonable counter.
Phil Leotardo: Which I considered...and rejected.
Tony Soprano: Do we need ta talk in private?
Phil Leotardo: For what?
Tony Soprano: Okay then...in front of everybody. When you were sick, in the 
hospital, we talked. We shared a...uh...an understanding about life.
Phil Leotardo: This is business Anthony.
Tony Soprano: Yeah I...I know. But I'm talkin' ta ya here on a human level. 
There's a limit Phil. Come on. Point where business bleeds into other shit. 
Feelings make things financially unfeasible.
Phil Leotardo: Charles Schwab over here. (everyone laughs)
Tony Soprano: So that's it? No leeway, no compromise, just stupid fuckin' jokes.
Phil Leotardo: You want compromise? How's this? Twenty years in the can, I 
wanted Manicott. I compromised. I ate grilled cheese off the radiator instead. 
I wanted ta fuck a woman but I compromised...I jacked off in a tissue. You see 
where I'm goin'?
Tony Soprano: Yeah... (Tony leaves)
%
Tony Soprano: Alright, lets dispense with the five hundred pound elephant in 
the room huh? My kid tried ta off 'imself. We all fuckin' know it. That's 
it...nobody's got nothin' ta say...
Bobby Baccilieri: How's he doin' Ton'?
Tony Soprano: They got 'im under observation, whatever the fuck that means. 
Stupid fuck! When did I lose this kid. What did I do wrong?
Paulie Walnuts: Whoah, come on.
Silvio Dante: Don't blame yourself T.
Bobby Baccilieri: Lot o' pressure on kids today Ton'.
Tony Soprano: Still, ta try ta kill 'imself.
Bobby Baccilieri: It happens skip.
Tony Soprano: (to Bobby) Happen ta your kids? (to Patsy) Or yours?
Patsy Parisi: They're all different Ton'. My son Patrick, I love 'im ta death, 
but he can be a moody prick sometimes...
%
Coco Cogliano: 'Scuse me. You're Tony Soprano's kid right?
Meadow Soprano: Yeah.
Coco Cogliano: Small world, runnin' into you like this, huh?
Meadow Soprano: I'm sorry, do I know you?
Coco Cogliano: Yeah, you got a little cream on your mouth there sweetie, be 
happy ta add to it.
Meadow Soprano: What?
Patrick Parisi: 'Scuse me.
Coco Cogliano: Lucky guy, her dad, must be fun tuckin' her in at night, huh?
Patrick Parisi: You have a problem?
Coco Cogliano: Not yet. Would you like one?
Albie Cianflone: Coco. Come on.
Coco Cogliano: What, I'm sayin' hello.
Albie Cianflone: Come on, lets go.
Coco Cogliano: Hey, best ta yer dad, eh. (Coco laughs)
%
Butch DeConcini: Tony Soprano, obviously. Plus Silvio Dante, and we think, 
Bobby Baccilieri.
Ray-Ray: That mortadell's number three? He used to be Junior Soprano's driver.
Albie Cianflone: And you used to sell laser printers out the back o' your Crown 
Vic.
%
Tony Soprano: And missin' sessions, unfortunately, is part o' my condition.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: What do you know about your condition? You miss 
appointments because you don't give a shit, about commitments, about what I do, 
about the body of work that's gone into building up this science. Go ahead, 
tell me again I sound like your wife.
Tony Soprano: Well, if the shoe fits. (Melfi stands up) We're makin' progress. 
It's been seven years.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Do you want some names?
Tony Soprano: O...okay, (Tony stands up) I'm...I'm...listen I'm gonna tell you 
somethin', and you're not gonna like it but we can say anything in here-
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Go ahead!
Tony Soprano: Alright...I'm...I'm chalkin' this all up to female menopausal 
situations.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: You're not my gynecologist.
Tony Soprano: Well, you don't need a gynecologist to know which way the wind 
blows. (Melfi walks to her door and opens it) So wait a minute, you're tellin' 
me, after all this time, after everything we shared in here, you're cuttin' me 
loose just as my son got outta the hospital, for trying ta kill 'imself.
Dr. Jennifer Melfi: Since you are in crisis, I don't wanna waste your time.
Tony Soprano: You know, I gotta be fuckin' honest, as a doctor, I think what 
you're doin' is immoral.
%
Carmela Soprano: AJ, how...how are we going ta get him ta go along, he won't 
leave his room, let alone the house.
Tony Soprano: He's gonna leave the house.
Carmela Soprano: Tony...
Tony Soprano: On a piece of plywood if necessary, but he's gonna leave the 
house.
%
Anthony Junior: You just bust in? I mean, we could've been doin' anythin'!
Tony Soprano: Yeah, but, what were you doin'? Nothin'.
%
Anthony Junior: Uncle Bobby's dead...
Tony Soprano: Yeah.
Anthony Junior: You know, this is really depressing to me.
Tony Soprano: He was a good guy.
Anthony Junior: I was already having so much trouble maintaining.
%
Tony Soprano: Thirty thousand dollars for that car!
Anthony Junior: Isn't that what you have insurance for?
Carmela Soprano: What, excuse me? You're not getting another one!
Anthony Junior: Actually, that's good! It'll force me to take the bus.
Carmela Soprano: What?
Anthony Junior: We have to break our dependance on foreign oil.
%
Little Carmine Lupertazzi: It didn't have to be this way.
Butch DeConcini: We agreed. It's gone too far. Phil...I don't know, he's 
changed. You got my word. We'll back off.
Tony Soprano: My price is you help us get a location on Phil.
Butch DeConcini: I can't go there. But you do what you gotta do.
Tony Soprano: One more thing. You hit my brother in-law.
Butch DeConcini: So?
Tony Soprano: This is my sister we're talkin' about. She's gotta see somethin' 
outta this.
Butch DeConcini: We'll come up with a number? (Tony agrees and shakes hands 
with Butch)
%
Carmela Soprano: Okay, as your parents, we don't feel joining the army is in 
your best interest.
Anthony Junior: This country is in a crisis.
Carmela Soprano: How can one soldier stop it?
Anthony Junior: When my enlistment's up, I could join the CIA or something. And 
with a military background, I'd have a leg up. And as an Arabic speaker, I'd be 
really useful.
Tony Soprano: I don't understand. You're gonna ask the Donald for some time off 
from your pilot job to go on CIA missions?
Anthony Junior: Everything's a joke to you!
Tony Soprano: I'm not havin' a good time.
Anthony Junior: Did you, or did you not want me to go to military school!?
%
Tony Soprano: So?
Paulie Walnuts: All due respect, and I mean that from the bottom of my heart, 
I'm gonna pass.
Tony Soprano: I don't fuckin' believe this! Why?
Paulie Walnuts: Every guy who ran that crew died prematurely.
Tony Soprano: Ah, come on!
Paulie Walnuts: I beat cancer once, you got no idea what that does ta you!
Tony Soprano: Yeah, I know, I know, but Jesus, you got-
Paulie Walnuts: Richie Aprile, Ralphie M.I.A., Vito, and who knows what the 
fuck with Carlo and Gigi!
Tony Soprano: Gigi died takin' a shit!
Paulie Walnuts: Doesn't mean it's not part of an overall pat!
Tony Soprano: Paulie, you gonna deny yourself life change o' the money? A 
package to leave your neice who has MS? You know, it's like your bullshit with 
the cat. The fuckin' animal catches mice for us, but you drown it.
Paulie Walnuts: I would.
Tony Soprano: He's not lookin' at Christopher! A rat died in the wall back 
there or some shit.
Paulie Walnuts: I moved the picture, that fuckin' thing came to the new spot, 
and stared.
Tony Soprano: The abstract shapes or somethin'. Tell you this, since his death, 
my gamblin' looks done a one eighty.
Paulie Walnuts: Oh, okay. It's fine for you ta believe that, but I can't worry 
about a jinx? Ton', I never told this to another livin' soul...
Tony Soprano: Yeah?
Paulie Walnuts: One time at the Bing, I was alone ta meet Eddy Lind. I saw the 
Virgin Mary.
Tony Soprano: Why didn't you say somethin'? Fuck strippers, we coulda had a 
shrine. Sold holy water in gallon jugs. Coulda made billions!
Paulie Walnuts: I tell you somethin' deep in my heart, and you laugh it off?
Tony Soprano: I'm not sayin' there's nothin' out there Paulie, but to not live 
your life? What the fuck are you gonna do? Hey, you don't want the job, you 
don't want the job. I could put Patsy in there. He's gonna be part of my family 
now. Be good.
Paulie Walnuts: Prick. You always know what ta say ta me, don't ya?
Tony Soprano: I'm serious.
Paulie Walnuts: I live but to serve you, my leige.
%
Uncle Junior: Hello.
Tony Soprano: What, you don't recognize me?
Uncle Junior: We used to play catch.
Tony Soprano: You don't remember that you shot me? Alright, enough with the 
fuckin' burns. I'm Anthony, Johnny's son.
Uncle Junior: Fuck you want, a boutonniere?
Tony Soprano: Alright, listen to me, Uncle Pat came to see me about Janice, 
about your money.
Uncle Junior: People keep askin' me. I don't know. There's a man from another 
galaxy that came here.
Tony Soprano: That's your accountant.
Uncle Junior: I'm confused.
Tony Soprano: Any money should go to Bobby Bacala's kids, now Janice may not do 
that, but Bobby was with us. He was a made guy. Wouldn't be right.
Uncle Junior: Me, I never had kids.
Tony Soprano: You remember where your stash is, you let Uncle Pat know. Me, as 
the head o' the family, I'll hold onto it as a guardian, for Bobby's kids. You 
remember Bobby?
Uncle Junior: Sure.
Tony Soprano: You don't know who I am, do ya? Remember Johnny? Johnny Boy? Your 
kid brother? This thing of ours.
Uncle Junior: I was involved with that?
Tony Soprano: You and my dad. You two ran North Jersey.
Uncle Junior: We did?
Tony Soprano: Yeah.
Uncle Junior: Hmm. Well, that's nice. (Tony's eyes swell up with tears)
%